# Theoretical and Technological Approaches to Age-Friendly Solutions: A Comprehensive Survey

## 1 Introduction to Age-Friendly Solutions

### 1.1 The Growing Importance of Age-Friendly Solutions

The growing importance of age-friendly solutions is driven by the demographic shifts occurring globally, which highlight the need for innovative approaches to support older adults in maintaining their quality of life and independence. This section critically analyzes the theoretical and technological advancements shaping the landscape of age-friendly solutions, synthesizing insights from various research domains to provide a comprehensive understanding of the current state and future directions.

One of the primary challenges in addressing the needs of an aging population is the integration of technology into daily life in a way that is both accessible and beneficial. The concept of urban agetech, introduced in [4], suggests that beyond-home agetech services can be integral to modern aging-friendly cities. This approach envisions a future where automated systems, such as robots and autonomous vehicles, are normalized city functions, akin to public transportation. Such a vision necessitates a multidisciplinary approach, combining urban planning, technology development, and social policy to ensure that technological advancements are effectively utilized by older adults.

The rise of age-friendly jobs, as highlighted in [1], constructs an "age-friendliness" index for occupations using Natural Language Processing. The findings indicate that many occupations have become more age-friendly over the past three decades, yet older workers have not disproportionately benefited from this trend. This discrepancy underscores the need for policies that consider the heterogeneity among older workers and the similarities between older and younger workers, framing age-friendly jobs within the broader context of labor market trends and imperfections.

Technological advancements in cognitive interaction systems (CISs) offer promising avenues for enhancing the quality of life for older adults. [3] discusses the potential of CISs to extend human and machine capabilities, emphasizing the importance of understanding how these technologies can be effectively integrated into the lives of older adults. This requires a nuanced understanding of the cognitive, emotional, and social needs of older adults, as well as the development of user-centered design principles that prioritize ease of use and accessibility.

The intersection of aging and technology is also evident in the development of assistive technologies aimed at supporting older adults in their homes and communities. [5] highlights the need for a new generation of research that addresses the complexity of supporting the quality of life and independence of a diverse and aging population. This research must consider multiple pathways, including the integration of chronic disease management, comprehensive home health, and wellness initiatives, to create technologies that enhance overall well-being and social connectedness.

In the realm of urban planning and transportation, [1] presents the Age-Friendly Route Planner, an innovative solution designed to improve the city experience for senior citizens. This tool considers various factors, such as the availability of amenities and comfortable elements along routes, to create age-friendly travel options, contributing to the safety and independence of older adults in cities experiencing population aging.

The design and acceptance of technology by older adults is a critical area of research, as highlighted in [6]. This paper investigates user requirements for technologies that encourage an active lifestyle and support self-management of physical, mental, and emotional health. The findings underscore the importance of understanding the sociotechnical context of use and the need for inclusive design practices that avoid negative stereotypes of aging.

Finally, the role of artificial intelligence (AI) in supporting older adults and caregivers is explored in [2]. This paper advocates for the involvement of older adults in the design process, from ideation to deployment, to ensure that technologies are tailored to their needs. It also emphasizes the importance of AI systems that augment resources rather than replace them, particularly in under-resourced communities, recognizing the critical role of caregiver networks and community organizations in supporting older adults.

In conclusion, the growing importance of age-friendly solutions is driven by the need to address the unique challenges and opportunities presented by an aging population. Theoretical and technological advancements are essential in creating solutions that are both effective and accessible, ensuring that older adults can maintain their independence and quality of life.

### 1.2 Multidisciplinary Nature of Age-Friendly Solutions

The development of age-friendly solutions is inherently multidisciplinary, requiring a synthesis of theoretical frameworks and technological innovations to address the complex needs of an aging population. This multidisciplinary approach is evident in the diverse range of studies that explore various facets of age-friendly technologies, from urban planning to assistive robotics.

Urban agetech, as proposed in [13], integrates automated systems into city services to support aging-in-place, suggesting that technological solutions should extend beyond individual homes to encompass entire urban environments. This perspective aligns with the broader need for a holistic approach to aging, as highlighted in [8], which emphasizes the importance of integrating chronic disease management, home health, and wellness initiatives to support the independence and quality of life of older adults. The multidisciplinary nature of these solutions is further underscored by the need to consider not only medical and technological factors but also social and economic dimensions, as discussed in [2].

Assistive technologies for activities of daily living (ADLs) are a critical component of age-friendly solutions, as detailed in [9]. These technologies must be designed with a deep understanding of the diverse needs and challenges faced by older adults, which vary significantly based on factors such as age, gender, and cognitive abilities. The review in [9] highlights the importance of personalized assistance and user-centered design, which are also central to the user requirements model presented in [13]. This model emphasizes the need for inclusive technology that supports an active lifestyle and self-management of health, requiring a nuanced understanding of the sociotechnical context of use.

The acceptance and adoption of technology by older adults is a key concern, as explored in [8], which examines the adoption of technology among very old people and proposes a dynamic technological acceptance model. Similarly, [13] investigates the role of familiarity in design, finding that incorporating familiar elements into technology can significantly improve adoption and satisfaction among elderly users. These findings underscore the importance of user-centered design principles, which are also advocated in [2], where the involvement of older adults in the design process is highlighted as crucial for creating effective and sustainable solutions.

Technological solutions must also consider the broader socio-economic context, as evidenced by the rise of age-friendly jobs discussed in [7]. This paper constructs an age-friendliness index for occupations, highlighting the need to frame technological advancements in the context of labor market trends and imperfections. The integration of human participation in ambient assisted living (AAL) systems, as proposed in [13], further emphasizes the importance of considering social and psychological factors in the design of age-friendly solutions.

The theoretical underpinnings of age-friendly solutions are also explored in [13], which discusses the role of network approaches in understanding the aging process and potential drug design. This paper highlights the complexity of the aging process and the need for multi-target interventions, aligning with the holistic approach advocated in [8] and [2]. The use of socially assistive robots in elderly care, as discussed in [8], further exemplifies the multidisciplinary nature of age-friendly solutions, requiring a synthesis of robotics, human-computer interaction, and social sciences.

In conclusion, the development of age-friendly solutions necessitates a multidisciplinary approach that integrates theoretical insights from various fields with technological innovations. This approach must consider the diverse needs and challenges of older adults, the socio-economic context, and the broader implications for society. By synthesizing information from these diverse sources, we can create more effective and inclusive age-friendly solutions that support the independence, quality of life, and well-being of older adults.

### 1.3 Technological and Societal Impact

The integration of technology into society has profound implications, particularly in the context of age-friendly solutions. The technological advancements and their societal impacts are multifaceted, necessitating a critical analysis that synthesizes various theoretical and empirical perspectives.

The rapid evolution of information and communication technologies (ICT) has transformed societal structures and interactions. However, the lack of a unified theoretical framework to understand these changes poses challenges in predicting and managing their impacts. Theories such as the Social Construction of Technology (SCOT) and Actor-Network Theory (ANT) offer insights but often fall short in fully capturing the essence of the information age, which is deeply intertwined with information, communication, and knowledge. This gap underscores the need for interdisciplinary approaches that can holistically assess the role of technology in human cognitive and social activities.

Technological innovations promise to enhance societal well-being by automating mundane tasks and improving quality of life. Yet, the benefits of technology are not uniformly distributed, and the harms can disproportionately affect certain groups. The ethical dilemma of weighing benefits against harms in the development of socially consequential technologies is a pressing issue. Comparative analyses between human and machine capabilities in various scenarios reveal that societal sentiment, performance, and impacts collectively influence technology adoption decisions. This highlights the importance of considering societal context and equity in technological development.

Generative AI systems, such as those based on large language models (LLMs), have complex and far-reaching societal impacts. These systems can perpetuate biases, stereotypes, and representational harms, while also raising concerns about privacy, data protection, and labor costs. The environmental costs of training and deploying these models are also significant, underscoring the need for sustainable practices. Evaluating these impacts requires a framework that considers both the base system and its broader societal context. This approach can help mitigate harms and ensure that AI technologies are developed and deployed in a manner that aligns with societal values and ethical considerations.

Autonomous Vehicles (AVs) represent another transformative technology with significant sociotechnical implications. The deployment of AVs has the potential to revolutionize transportation systems, affecting social mobility, public infrastructure, and environmental sustainability. However, the sociotechnical specification of AVs must carefully balance technical capabilities with societal needs and ethical considerations. This requires a nuanced understanding of the interplay between technology, society, and the environment, as well as the development of governance frameworks that can manage the complexities of AV deployment.

The Responsible and Inclusive Technology Framework emphasizes the importance of considering social contexts and power dynamics in technology development. This framework calls for critical reflection on the impacts of technology on various communities and the practical decisions that imbue technological artifacts with cultural values. By fostering more intentional and socially-grounded practices, this approach aims to bridge the gap between responsibility and practice, ensuring that technology serves the broader societal good.

Interdisciplinary approaches are crucial for understanding the impact of AI on society. The rapid proliferation of AI technologies has led to a range of socio-technical problems, including bias, surveillance, and inequality. These challenges necessitate a tighter coupling of computer science with disciplines that study society and societal values. By integrating insights from sociology, ethics, and other relevant fields, we can develop AI systems that are more aligned with societal needs and ethical principles.

The potential of quantum computing to impact society is significant, particularly in areas such as cryptography, optimization, and simulation. However, the ethical aspects of these developments must be carefully considered to mitigate risks and ensure that the benefits of quantum computing are equitably distributed. This requires a multidisciplinary approach that includes computer science, ethics, and environmental science to holistically address the societal impacts of quantum computing.

In conclusion, the technological and societal impacts of age-friendly solutions are complex and multifaceted. A critical synthesis of theoretical perspectives and empirical evidence is essential to navigate the challenges and opportunities presented by technological advancements. By adopting interdisciplinary approaches and considering the broader societal context, we can develop technologies that enhance well-being and promote equity.

### 1.4 User-Centric Design and Acceptance

User-Centric Design (UCD) and user acceptance are critical components in the development of age-friendly solutions, ensuring that technologies and services are not only functional but also accessible, usable, and acceptable to older adults. The integration of UCD principles throughout the development lifecycle can significantly enhance the likelihood of successful adoption and sustained use of age-friendly technologies.

UCD emphasizes the importance of understanding and addressing the needs, preferences, and limitations of the end users, particularly older adults who may have diverse physical, cognitive, and emotional requirements. This approach contrasts with traditional development methodologies, such as the Waterfall model, which often prioritize technical feasibility over user needs. By adopting UCD, developers can create solutions that are more intuitive, accessible, and tailored to the specific needs of older users, thereby improving usability and acceptance.

The concept of user acceptance is multifaceted, encompassing not only the initial adoption of a technology but also its continued use over time. Factors influencing user acceptance include perceived usefulness, ease of use, and enjoyment, as highlighted in studies on intelligent personal assistants and blockchain-based research data sharing systems. These factors are often analyzed within the framework of the Technology Acceptance Model (TAM), which posits that perceived usefulness and ease of use are key determinants of user acceptance. However, recent research suggests that additional factors, such as the quality of the system and perceived enjoyment, also play significant roles in influencing user acceptance.

In the context of age-friendly solutions, it is essential to consider the diverse end-user requirements and human-centric aspects that may influence acceptance. Studies have shown that developers often struggle to address these aspects, particularly in software development projects. This challenge is exacerbated in open-source software (OSS) communities, where contributors may have a system-centric rather than a user-centric mindset. To address this, participatory design methods, which involve end users in the design process, can be effective in ensuring that usability concerns are adequately addressed.

Moreover, the acceptance of age-friendly solutions can be influenced by social and contextual factors, such as the familiarity principle, which suggests that acceptance increases with exposure to the technology. This principle is particularly relevant for technologies like connected and autonomous vehicles (CAVs), where simulated experiences can enhance acceptance, especially among older adults. However, customization options, such as the ability to tailor navigation information, can have varying effects on acceptance depending on the user's age and educational background.

The importance of user-centric design extends to the development of explainable AI (XAI) systems, where the transparency and intelligibility of AI decisions are crucial for user acceptance. XAI solutions must be designed with the specific needs and contexts of different user groups in mind, including data science teams, human operators, and individuals affected by algorithmic decisions. This user-centric approach ensures that XAI solutions are not only technically sound but also meaningful and acceptable to the end users.

In conclusion, user-centric design and acceptance are pivotal in the development of age-friendly solutions. By integrating UCD principles and considering the diverse needs and contexts of older adults, developers can create technologies that are not only functional but also accessible, usable, and acceptable. This approach not only enhances the quality of life for older adults but also ensures the long-term success and sustainability of age-friendly solutions.

### 1.5 Policy and Community Support

Policy and community support are critical components in the development and implementation of age-friendly solutions. These elements ensure that the solutions are not only technologically advanced but also socially and politically viable. The interplay between policy frameworks and community engagement can significantly influence the success and sustainability of age-friendly initiatives.

One of the key challenges in implementing age-friendly solutions is the distribution and enforcement of consistent policies across diverse communities [32][30]. Virtual organizations (VOs) and collaborative environments often span multiple policy domains, each with its own capabilities and constraints. The Community Authorization Service (CAS) addresses this challenge by allowing resource providers to delegate policy authority to the VO while maintaining control over their resources [32][30]. This approach ensures that fine-grained access control policies can be maintained and enforced at scale, which is particularly important in age-friendly solutions where the needs and capabilities of different communities can vary widely.

Public policy implementation often faces the challenge of identifying publicly acceptable policy implementations [34]. Citizens may not be able to pinpoint their preferred policy options directly, but their opinions on policy objectives can be inferred through ranking exercises or social media analysis [34]. This approach can be particularly useful in age-friendly initiatives, where the preferences and needs of older adults can be diverse and context-specific. By leveraging models and simulations, policymakers can translate these preferences into actionable policy options that are more likely to gain public acceptance.

The issue of support-deficient data in off-policy learning is another critical area that impacts the effectiveness of age-friendly solutions [31]. Many real-world systems, including those designed for older adults, produce data that does not fully support the action space required for effective learning. This can lead to suboptimal policy outcomes. The approaches identified in [31]—restricting the action space, reward extrapolation, and restricting the policy space—provide practical guidance for addressing these challenges. These methods ensure that policy learning remains effective despite the inherent limitations of support-deficient data, which is often the case in age-friendly contexts where data collection can be challenging.

Community engagement is also a vital aspect of age-friendly solutions, as highlighted in [35][37][36]. The High Energy Physics (HEP) community's engagement with government at various levels demonstrates the importance of advocacy and direct community-driven engagement [35][37][36]. This model can be adapted to age-friendly initiatives, where community involvement is crucial for the development of policies and technologies that meet the specific needs of older adults. Effective community engagement can help bridge the gap between policy expectations and actual outcomes, ensuring that age-friendly solutions are both inclusive and effective.

The role of adaptable systems in supporting the public policy-making process is another important consideration [33]. Age-friendly solutions often require complex policy processes that involve diverse stakeholders and lengthy decision-making cycles. An adaptable system that supports provenance management can assist in tracking the complete process of policy creation, providing valuable insights into the decision-making process [33]. This can enhance transparency and accountability, which are essential for the successful implementation of age-friendly policies.

In conclusion, policy and community support are integral to the success of age-friendly solutions. The integration of advanced technological approaches with robust policy frameworks and active community engagement can ensure that these solutions are both effective and sustainable. By addressing the challenges of policy distribution, support-deficient data, and community engagement, we can develop age-friendly solutions that truly meet the needs of older adults and contribute to their well-being.

## 2 Theoretical Frameworks of Aging

### 2.1 Evolutionary Theories of Aging

Evolutionary theories of aging have long sought to explain why organisms age, despite the apparent disadvantage it poses to individual fitness. These theories often grapple with the paradox that aging, which is detrimental to individuals, persists in populations. Theories such as the "saving resources for group benefit" hypothesis suggest that aging might serve a purpose in resource allocation, yet this idea is challenged by the counterintuitive notion that a more efficient strategy would be to induce rapid death in post-reproductive individuals rather than allowing them to age.

One of the earliest and most influential evolutionary theories is the "mutation accumulation" theory, which posits that deleterious mutations accumulate in post-reproductive individuals because they are no longer subject to strong selection pressures. This theory is supported by mathematical models that predict age-specific mutational effects and their impact on population dynamics. However, it does not fully account for the complexity of aging processes, which involve not only genetic damage but also physiological and environmental factors.

The "damage (fault)-accumulation" theory proposes that aging results from the accumulation of intrinsic damage, such as free radicals causing oxidative stress. While this theory acknowledges the role of damage in aging, it struggles to explain why unrepaired damage would persist in a living organism without causing immediate failure. This limitation is addressed by the "Misrepair-accumulation" theory, which posits that it is not the original damage but the misrepair of that damage that accumulates and leads to aging. This theory provides a more nuanced understanding of how genetic and environmental factors interact to drive the aging process.

Another influential theory is the "chemical kinetic theory of aging," which views biochemical processes in organisms as analogous to chemical reactions. This theory suggests that after reproduction, the organism's biochemical processes are no longer optimized for survival, leading to imbalances and ultimately aging. This perspective aligns with the idea that aging is a consequence of the organism's evolutionary focus on reproduction rather than longevity.

The "Emergent Aging Model" offers a systems-level approach, suggesting that aging is an emergent property of complex biological networks. This model posits that aging arises from the increasing mortality rate over time, which is influenced by numerous genetic and epigenetic factors. The model's quantitative approach allows for predictions of aging dynamics and provides a framework for understanding the stochastic nature of aging.

The "Evolutionary Theories of Aging" review connects microevolutionary models, such as the Eigen model of quasispecies, with macroevolutionary models, such as the Bak-Sneppen model, to biological aging. This connection highlights the role of evolutionary processes in shaping aging dynamics. The Penna model, a bit-string model for aging, is also discussed, demonstrating how genetic inheritance and mutation can influence aging trajectories.

The "Aging as a mean to retain an adaptive mutation rate" theory suggests that aging serves a role in maintaining an adaptive mutation rate in asymmetric reproduction systems. This theory posits that aging allows for the testing of new genetic variations without compromising the fitness of the entire lineage. This perspective aligns with the idea that aging is a byproduct of evolutionary processes that prioritize adaptability over longevity.

The "Demographic Homeostasis and the Evolution of Senescence" theory explores the idea that aging is an adaptation selected for its role in stabilizing chaotic population dynamics. This theory suggests that aging helps to smooth demographic fluctuations, thereby contributing to the long-term survival of the species. This perspective challenges the traditional view that aging is merely a side effect of strong selection for fertility.

In summary, evolutionary theories of aging provide a diverse array of perspectives on why organisms age. These theories range from the accumulation of genetic damage and misrepair to the role of aging in maintaining adaptive mutation rates and stabilizing population dynamics. Each theory offers valuable insights, but a comprehensive understanding of aging likely requires integrating elements from multiple perspectives. Future research should aim to synthesize these theories into a unified framework that accounts for the complexity of aging processes and their evolutionary significance.

### 2.2 Biological Theories of Aging

Biological theories of aging have evolved significantly over the years, with various models attempting to explain the underlying mechanisms that drive the aging process. Traditional theories, such as the evolutionary, cellular senescence, and free-radical theories, have provided foundational insights, but they often fall short in explaining the complexity of aging phenomena. For instance, the free-radical theory suggests that oxidative damage from free radicals is a primary cause of aging, but it fails to account for all aging changes. Similarly, the damage-accumulation theory posits that unrepaired damage leads to aging, yet it overlooks the fact that living organisms cannot sustain unrepaired faults without rapid failure.

Recent advancements have introduced more comprehensive theories that integrate multiple aspects of aging. The chemical kinetic theory of aging, for example, proposes that the post-reproductive biochemical processes in organisms are not optimized for survival, leading to imbalances and subsequent aging. This theory suggests that stabilizing these processes artificially could potentially extend life almost indefinitely. Another innovative approach is the Misrepair-accumulation theory, which emphasizes that it is not the original damage but the accumulation of misrepairs that leads to aging. This theory unifies the roles of environmental damage, repair, gene regulation, and multicellular structure in the aging process, providing a more holistic view of aging.

The Emergent Aging Model (EAM) offers a novel perspective by suggesting that aging is an emergent property of complex biological systems, such as gene networks. EAM defines aging quantitatively using the mortality rate, positing that an increasing mortality rate over time signifies aging. This model is consistent with the observation that aging is stochastic and influenced by numerous genes and epigenetic factors, rather than a single cause. EAM has been successfully applied to experimental results of the replicative lifespan of budding yeast, offering potential insights into the aging process of other species.

Mathematical and computational models have also played a crucial role in advancing our understanding of aging. The simple mathematical model of aging assumes that the body does not have internal clocks that count out chronological time at scales of decades, focusing instead on empirical considerations of biological factors. This model uses a system of autonomous ordinary differential equations to describe the dynamics of aging, providing a framework for organizing experimental data and quantifying causal relationships. Similarly, the network model for cellular aging proposes that cellular aging is an emergent property of a gene interaction network, where the loss of essential gene interactions leads to cell death. This model predicts that the rate of aging is proportional to the average number of active interactions per gene, highlighting the importance of stochastic heterogeneity in the aging process.

Thermodynamic theories of aging, such as the thermodynamic mechanism of life and aging, propose that aging is a consequence of changes in the thermodynamic state of an organism. This theory suggests that entropy, a measure of disorder, is the parameter that best describes aging. The change in entropy over time, driven by various chemical reactions and accumulation of damage, underlies the aging process. This thermodynamic perspective aligns with the observation that aging is a universal phenomenon in both living and inanimate systems.

In summary, biological theories of aging have progressed from focusing on single causes to embracing a more integrative and systemic approach. Theories such as the Misrepair-accumulation theory, the Emergent Aging Model, and thermodynamic models provide a more comprehensive understanding of aging by considering multiple levels of biological organization and the interplay between genetic, environmental, and stochastic factors. These advancements are crucial for developing age-friendly solutions that target the underlying mechanisms of aging, potentially leading to interventions that extend healthspan and improve quality of life.

### 2.3 Free-Radical and Damage-Accumulation Theories

The free-radical and damage-accumulation theories have been pivotal in understanding the biological and physical processes underlying aging. These theories posit that aging is driven by the cumulative effects of molecular damage, primarily caused by reactive oxygen species (ROS) and other free radicals, which lead to the progressive deterioration of cellular and tissue functions.

The free-radical theory, initially proposed by Denham Harman in the 1950s, suggests that ROS, generated as byproducts of normal cellular metabolism, cause oxidative damage to cellular components such as DNA, proteins, and lipids. This damage, if not adequately mitigated by antioxidant defenses, can lead to cellular dysfunction and, ultimately, aging. Molecular dynamics simulations have provided insights into the specific mechanisms of free-radical-induced DNA damage, demonstrating how hydroxyl radicals can abstract hydrogen atoms from the sugar-phosphate backbone of DNA, leading to the formation of carbonyl and hydroxyl groups and subsequent single and double-strand breaks.

The damage-accumulation theory, on the other hand, posits that aging results from the progressive accumulation of various types of molecular and cellular damage over time. This theory is supported by mathematical and computational models that describe the evolution of damage in materials and biological systems. For instance, a cellular automaton model of damage highlights the critical role of stress transfer range in determining the nature of catastrophic failure, with long-range transfer systems exhibiting nucleation-like failure mechanisms, while short-range systems show continuous damage processes akin to critical points. Similarly, a sub-critical model of damage evolution as a phase transition employs statistical mechanics to map damage phenomena onto spin systems, providing a framework for understanding the interactions at crack tips and the effects of external boundary constraints.

In the context of materials science, damage models have been developed to describe the progressive failure of quasi-brittle materials. These models often incorporate non-convex free energy functions to account for the coupling between volumetric and deviatoric parts of the free energy, which is crucial for capturing the large dilatancy observed in concrete under compression. Additionally, phase-field methods have been extended to model progressive damage and rupture in elastomeric materials, recognizing that the free energy of these materials includes both entropic and energetic contributions, with the latter driving the damage process.

The complexity of damage evolution in heterogeneous materials with microstructures has led to the development of multi-scale simulation methods that dynamically refine coarse regions to explicitly model damage at the microstructural level. These methods, however, often restrict damage evolution to fine-scale regions, failing to capture the full breadth of degradation processes. To address this, a damage-preserving transformation approach has been proposed, which combines an orthotropic damage law with a scheme to generate pre-damaged fine-scale microstructures, ensuring consistent damage evolution across all representations.

The interplay between damage and plasticity has also been explored in the context of rate-independent systems. A gradient system in damage coupled with plasticity via structured strains has been developed, where the evolution of both damage and plastic variables is governed by rate-independent processes. This model builds on earlier work by Freddi and Royer-Carfagni and has been shown to provide a robust framework for understanding the combined effects of damage and plasticity in materials.

Thermomechanics of damage and fatigue have been described using phase field models, which incorporate the Ginzburg-Landau equation to study the evolution of the order parameter, representing the constitutive arrangement of the material and the progression of damage. These models have been extended to non-isothermal systems to account for thermal effects that exacerbate material damage during fatigue processes.

In summary, the free-radical and damage-accumulation theories provide a comprehensive framework for understanding the molecular and cellular mechanisms underlying aging. These theories are supported by a range of mathematical and computational models that describe the evolution of damage in materials and biological systems, offering valuable insights into the development of age-friendly solutions.

### 2.4 Physiological and Molecular Models of Aging

The study of aging at the physiological and molecular levels has been significantly advanced by various theoretical models that aim to capture the complexity of the aging process. These models range from simple mathematical frameworks to more intricate network and stochastic approaches, each offering unique insights into the mechanisms of aging.

One of the foundational models is the bit-string model [61], which uses computer simulations to mimic biological aging. This model reflects some features of real populations, providing a basis for understanding the stochastic nature of aging processes. Similarly, the simple mathematical model of aging [47] proposes that the body's aging process can be described by a system of autonomous ordinary differential equations (ODEs). This model suggests that aging can be understood as the dynamics of biological clocks, which are influenced by internal factors rather than chronological time.

The Emergent Aging Model (EAM) [40] posits that aging is an emergent property of complex biological systems, such as gene networks. EAM defines aging quantitatively using the mortality rate, suggesting that an increasing mortality rate over time is a hallmark of aging. This model aligns with the observation that aging is stochastic and influenced by numerous genes and epigenetic factors, offering a parsimonious explanation for the Gompertz model of biological aging.

A network model for cellular aging [48] further extends this concept by proposing that cellular aging arises from the stochastic interactions of gene networks. This model predicts that the rate of aging is proportional to the average number of active interactions per gene, highlighting the importance of network dynamics in the aging process.

Interventions in aging have been modeled to understand how lifespan-extending interventions alter the physiological dynamics of aging [69]. These models provide a framework for interpreting the physiological responses to interventions, helping to move beyond merely identifying statistically significant differences in lifespan to understanding the underlying mechanisms.

Complex computational models of aging [77] emphasize the need for systems-level models that incorporate interactions between measurable aspects of age-associated changes. These models, which must be stochastic and predictive, offer a promising avenue for advancing our understanding of aging.

The theoretical approach to biological aging [58] considers the genetic charge inherited by individuals, which determines their maximum age for death. This model, which can describe different reproductive strategies, provides a framework for understanding the genetic basis of aging.

Population dynamics models for aging [65] introduce the concept of biological age, which represents the true evolution of tissues and organs, as opposed to chronological age. These models account for discontinuous jumps in biological age, which can be positive (rejuvenation) or negative (premature aging), offering a more nuanced understanding of the aging process.

The chemical kinetic theory of aging [44] proposes that aging can be described in terms of the kinetics of chemical reactions and natural selection. This theory suggests that the stabilization of biochemical processes after birth could lead to the continuation of life almost indefinitely.

The Penna model of biological aging [76] is a well-known computer simulation model that has been extensively studied. It provides a framework for understanding the genetic and stochastic aspects of aging.

Modeling of aging processes in insertion compounds [74] focuses on the effects of modifications at the host/guest solution interface and host matrix disordering, offering insights into the aging of complex materials.

Traditional aging theories [41] review various models, including evolutionary, biological, and physical theories, highlighting their strengths and limitations. This synthesis suggests that an advanced theory that incorporates the useful ideas from traditional theories is needed.

The stochastic Penna model [66] bridges the gap between the bit-string Penna model and the Pletcher-Neuhauser approach, reproducing the phenomenon of exponentially increasing mortality at intermediate ages and its deceleration at advanced ages.

Aging and spin-glass dynamics [59] explore the mathematical results about aging in disordered models, providing insights into the complex dynamics of aging.

The aging concept in population dynamics [72] develops a relationship between life spans and the velocity of aging, suggesting that the mean rate of aging is intimately connected with the mean basal metabolic rate.

The thermodynamic mechanism of life and aging [46] proposes that aging is a process characterized by changes in biological and thermodynamic state, with entropy being a key parameter.

Evolution and aging [42] connect different models of evolution to those of biological aging, emphasizing the role of genetic and environmental factors in the aging process.

Dynamic networks reveal key players in aging [60] integrate static biological networks with aging-related gene expression data to construct dynamic, age-specific networks, identifying aging-related genes.

A microscopic model for aging of biocondensates [75] explores the connection between the mechanical properties of condensates and their microscopic structure, proposing a model for the dynamic of stickers and spacers.

The lattice percolation approach to numerical modeling of tissue aging [63] describes a percolation-type approach to modeling aging processes in tissues, confirming that inhibition of senescence can lead to extended lifespan.

Ageing of the 2+1 dimensional Kardar-Parisi-Zhang model [67] contributes to the understanding of the universality class of surface growth models, providing insights into the aging process.

Extremal aging for trap models [70] explains a different aging mechanism in terms of extremal processes, extending α-stable aging to the case α=0.

Network strategies to understand the aging process [13] focus on the role of protein-protein interaction networks in aging, suggesting that hubs and inter-modular elements are key regulators.

Introduction and reconciliation of the ROS and aging paradoxes [73] suggests that aging is influenced synthetically by pro-aging and anti-aging factors, with ROS being more closely correlated with metabolism than aging.

A crash course on aging [62] provides a short introduction to aging dynamics, covering simple examples that allow one to grasp the main results and predictions.

Aging as a consequence of misrepair [39] introduces a novel theory that aging is the result of accumulation of misrepair of tissue, unifying the understanding of the roles of environmental damage, repair, gene regulation, and multicellular structure.

Dynamical network stability analysis of multiple biological ages [71] combines multiple biological ages into a multidimensional network representation, identifying new biomarkers that quantify long-term resilience.

Life equations for the senescence process [64] propose a reaction kinetics model with a time-dependent rate coefficient to describe the survival and senescence processes, explaining the effect of temperature on lifespan and the mortality plateau.

A new approach to understanding ontogenesis and the theory of aging [68] proposes that the competition between the housekeeping and specialized parts of the genome leads to a deficit of reparative and adaptive capacity in post-mitotic cells.

Live young, die later: senescence in the Penna model of aging [57] modifies the Penna model to incorporate senescence, finding that models corresponding to delayed senescence have younger populations that live longer.

These models collectively provide a comprehensive framework for understanding the multifaceted nature of aging, from the molecular to the systemic levels, and offer potential avenues for developing age-friendly solutions.

### 2.5 Computational and Systems-Level Models of Aging

Computational and systems-level models of aging have emerged as powerful tools for understanding the complex dynamics underlying the aging process. These models leverage the interplay between measurable aspects of age-associated changes, incorporating both deterministic and stochastic elements to simulate realistic individual trajectories of health and mortality. The complexity of aging, which spans multiple physiological scales from molecular to cellular to whole tissues, necessitates the use of sophisticated computational models that can capture the variability and predictability inherent in the aging process.

One of the key features of these models is their ability to incorporate individual variability through stochastic processes. This is crucial because aging is not a uniform process; it is influenced by a myriad of genetic, environmental, and stochastic factors. For instance, the bit-string model for biological aging, which has been studied through computer simulations, reflects some features of real populations by incorporating stochastic elements. Similarly, the Penna model of biological aging uses bit-strings to represent genomes and simulates the accumulation of mutations that lead to age-related diseases.

Mathematical models, such as the simple mathematical model of aging, offer a more abstract yet insightful approach by describing the dynamics of aging variables using systems of ordinary differential equations (ODEs). These models, while simplified, can provide a framework for organizing experimental data and quantifying causal relationships that are significant for the development of the aging process. The quadratic nature of the equations in this model suggests that it can be applicable to relatively large time intervals, given its biological interpretation.

Network models provide a more comprehensive view of aging by considering the interactions within a gene network. These models demonstrate that the exponential increase of mortality rate over time, a defining characteristic of biological aging, can arise from the stochastic interactions within a gene network. The emergent property of aging in this context highlights the importance of system-level interactions in understanding the aging process.

The Emergent Aging Model (EAM) further emphasizes the idea that aging is an emergent property of complex biological systems. EAM posits that aging can arise at the system level of an organism, even if the system is composed of only non-aging components. This model is consistent with the observation that aging is largely stochastic, influenced by numerous genes and epigenetic factors.

Population dynamics models offer a different perspective by focusing on the biological age, which represents the true evolution of tissues and organs. These models account for the non-linear and sometimes discontinuous nature of biological aging, which can be influenced by both endogenous and exogenous events.

Monte Carlo simulations provide a powerful tool for studying the aging process by allowing for the parallelization of hundreds of millions of individuals. These simulations can accurately capture the drastic decay of survival probabilities with increasing age, providing insights into the stochastic nature of aging.

The stochastic Penna model bridges the gap between the bit-string Penna model and the Pletcher-Neuhauser approach, reproducing the phenomenon of exponentially increasing mortality function at intermediate ages and its deceleration at advanced ages. This model underscores the importance of stochastic processes in understanding the aging process.

In summary, computational and systems-level models of aging offer a multifaceted approach to understanding the complex dynamics of the aging process. By incorporating elements of stochasticity, network interactions, and population dynamics, these models provide a comprehensive framework for organizing experimental data, quantifying causal relationships, and predicting the outcomes of interventions aimed at extending healthspan and lifespan.

### 2.6 Evolutionary Models with Genetics and Knowledge

Evolutionary models that integrate genetics and knowledge offer a robust framework for understanding how biological and cultural factors interact to shape age-friendly solutions. These models provide insights into how genetic inheritance and accumulated knowledge influence survival, adaptation, and the overall fitness of populations over time.

One of the key approaches in this domain is the use of bit strings to represent the process of learning, where 1-bits signify acquired knowledge [82]. This model distinguishes between individual learning through trial-and-error and social learning, such as copying knowledge from others or parents. The age-structured bit string allows for the study of knowledge accumulation throughout life and its impact on the genetic pool over generations. The Penna model is employed to represent genetic inheritance, and the accumulated knowledge is incorporated to enhance survival rates, particularly in the later years of life when individuals are more susceptible to diseases [82]. This approach reveals that while knowledge improves survival rates, it can also lead to a decline in genetic fitness, highlighting the complex interplay between genetic and cultural factors.

Another significant contribution is the development of models that evolve agents using both genetic and cultural inheritance mechanisms [79]. These models maintain distinct information stores, such as the genome and the memome, to represent different levels of adaptation (phylogenetic, ontogenetic, sociogenetic). This dual inheritance approach allows for divergent gene-culture co-evolution, which is crucial for understanding how genetic and cultural factors interact to shape behavior and adaptation.

The interaction between learning and evolutionary optimization is also a critical area of study [84]. This model explores the genetic assimilation of acquired features through Darwinian evolution, where phenotypes move towards the optimum through learning, and selected genotypes also converge towards the optimum. The hiding effect, where strong learning inhibits evolutionary search for the optimal genotype, is also examined. Additionally, the influence of learning load on the interaction between learning and evolution is analyzed, showing that learning load can significantly accelerate evolution [84].

Genetic algorithms (GAs) have been instrumental in simulating evolutionary processes [80]. These algorithms optimize genetic parameters to simulate natural selection and evolution, providing insights into how species adapt to changing environments. By assigning characteristics such as speed, size, and cloning probability to entities, GAs can simulate real-world scenarios and predict future changes. This approach has practical applications in improving technology, conserving endangered species, and understanding disease spread [80].

The concept of learngenes, inspired by the accumulation of knowledge in biological systems, offers a novel paradigm for machine learning [83]. Learngenes enable learning models to inherit condensed knowledge from ancestry models, facilitating rapid adaptation to new environments. This approach focuses on condensing and inheriting knowledge, leading to faster convergence, less sensitivity to hyperparameters, better performance, and fewer training samples required for convergence [83].

Quantifying information in models of evolutionary dynamics provides a deeper understanding of how biological organisms process information from their ancestors and environment [81]. This approach uses mathematical models to analyze evolutionary dynamics, revealing unique features of information processing by biological populations.

The unification of quantitative genetics and structured population models offers a comprehensive framework for studying eco-evolutionary dynamics [85]. This approach links quantitative genetics with structured population models, allowing for the study of how evolutionary changes in phenotypes affect population dynamics and vice versa. This framework provides a powerful tool for investigating the emergence and maintenance of social behaviors and personality traits, highlighting the importance of genetic complexity in evolutionary models [85].

In summary, evolutionary models that integrate genetics and knowledge provide a comprehensive framework for understanding how biological and cultural factors interact to shape age-friendly solutions. These models offer insights into the complex interplay between genetic inheritance, accumulated knowledge, and survival, adaptation, and overall fitness of populations over time.

### 2.7 Chemical Kinetic Theory of Aging

The Chemical Kinetic Theory of Aging posits that the aging process can be understood through the lens of chemical reaction kinetics, where the biochemical processes within an organism are analogous to chemical reactions governed by kinetic principles [44]. This theory suggests that the evolutionary drive for survival and reproduction leads organisms to optimize their biochemical processes during their reproductive phase. However, once reproduction is achieved, the continued regulation of these processes is no longer advantageous from an evolutionary perspective, leading to a lack of stabilization in biochemical reactions post-reproduction. This lack of regulation results in imbalances and the accumulation of detrimental biochemical processes, ultimately contributing to the aging process.

The theory emphasizes the importance of identifying key biochemical processes that regulate vital activities in organisms. By artificially balancing these processes, it is hypothesized that the kinetics of biochemical reactions could be stabilized, potentially extending life almost indefinitely [44]. This perspective aligns with the broader understanding that aging is not an inevitable consequence of time but rather a result of the cumulative effects of unregulated biochemical processes.

The Chemical Kinetic Theory of Aging is not without its criticisms and limitations. For instance, it does not fully account for the role of genetic factors and epigenetic modifications in the aging process. Additionally, the theory assumes a linear relationship between biochemical imbalances and aging, which may not capture the complexity of interactions within biological systems. Despite these limitations, the theory provides a valuable framework for understanding aging from a mechanistic perspective, focusing on the kinetics of biochemical reactions as a central factor.

In contrast, the Isomorph Theory of Physical Aging [88] and related approaches [12, 16] describe aging in terms of physical properties such as temperature, density, and pressure, rather than biochemical processes. These theories are more applicable to non-biological systems, such as glasses and polymers, where aging is characterized by changes in physical properties over time. The systemic temperature, defined as the thermodynamic equilibrium temperature of the state point with a given density and potential energy, plays a crucial role in these theories [88]. The aging phase diagram, which traces the system's path over time, provides a visual representation of how these physical properties evolve.

The concept of material time, introduced in these theories, offers a novel way to understand the temporal dynamics of aging. Material time is not equivalent to chronological time but rather reflects the distance traveled by the system's particles in configuration space [87]. This perspective suggests that the aging process can be described in terms of geometric properties, such as the mean-square displacement of particles, rather than purely temporal measures.

The application of chemical kinetics to biological systems is further explored in the context of time dilation in chemical reactions [86]. This theory posits that the rates of chemical reactions are not absolute but depend on the relative speeds of moving observers, aligning with the principles of special relativity. The Lorentz transformation of rate constants and collision frequencies introduces a relativistic component to chemical kinetics, suggesting that the observed rates of biochemical reactions could be influenced by the relative motion of molecules. This idea is particularly relevant in the context of biological systems, where molecular motion and energy levels are influenced by environmental factors such as temperature and pressure.

The Life Equations for the Senescence Process [64] provide a mathematical framework for understanding the Gompertz law of mortality, which describes the exponential increase in mortality rate with age. This model proposes a time-dependent rate coefficient for mortality, which can account for the effects of temperature on lifespan and the mortality plateau at advanced ages. The theory suggests that senescence results from an imbalance between damaging and protective energies for critical chemical substances in the body, with the rate of senescence increasing as protective energy decreases [64]. This perspective highlights the importance of energy dynamics in the aging process, complementing the chemical kinetic approach by focusing on the balance of energy inputs and outputs.

The Aging Concept in Population Dynamics [72] explores the relationship between life spans and the velocity of aging, suggesting that the mean extent of aging advancement is conserved over an individual's life. This conservation principle implies that the product of mean life span and mean rate of aging is constant, providing a mathematical basis for understanding the variability in life spans across different species and populations [72]. This theory aligns with the broader understanding that aging is a conserved process, influenced by both genetic and environmental factors.

In summary, the Chemical Kinetic Theory of Aging offers a mechanistic approach to understanding the aging process by focusing on the kinetics of biochemical reactions. While it has its limitations, it provides a valuable framework for identifying key processes that could be targeted to extend lifespan. The integration of this theory with other approaches, such as the Isomorph Theory of Physical Aging and the Life Equations for the Senescence Process, offers a more comprehensive understanding of aging, highlighting the importance of both biochemical and physical factors in the aging process.

### 2.8 Theoretical Approaches to Biological Aging

The theoretical approaches to biological aging are diverse and multifaceted, reflecting the complexity of the aging process itself. One prominent model is the genetic charge model [58], which posits that an individual's maximum age is determined by an inherited genetic charge. This model introduces mutations through a transition matrix, allowing for different reproductive strategies and providing an exact solution for the bit-string model of aging. This approach aligns well with numerical simulations, suggesting a robust framework for understanding the genetic underpinnings of aging.

Traditional aging theories have sought to answer fundamental questions about the causes and mechanisms of aging [41]. Evolutionary theories propose that aging serves an evolutionary advantage, such as resource allocation for the group. However, a more economical strategy might involve rapid death after reproductive age rather than gradual aging. Biological theories, including cell senescence, telomere, gene-controlling, and developmental theories, have often overlooked the role of damage in aging. The free-radical theory suggests that free radicals cause intrinsic damage, contributing to aging, but this damage is not universally responsible for all aging changes. The damage-accumulation theory predicts that faults accumulate, leading to aging, but unrepaired faults would likely cause rapid failure rather than gradual aging. Despite their limitations, developmental and damage-accumulation theories are more useful as they recognize the importance of damage and the developmental process in aging.

The chemical kinetic theory of aging [44] proposes that biochemical processes can be described using chemical reaction kinetics. This theory suggests that after birth, biochemical processes are not stabilized, leading to imbalances and processes that do not contribute to health, resulting in aging. Balancing these processes post-birth could potentially stabilize biochemical reactions and extend life. This approach highlights the need to identify key biochemical processes that regulate vital activity.

Mathematical models of aging, such as the simple mathematical model [47], assume that the body does not have internal clocks that count chronological time at scales of decades. Instead, biological factors act as biological clocks, and their dynamics are described using systems of autonomous ODEs. This model, particularly in its quadratic form, provides a simplified empirical framework for organizing experimental data and quantifying causal relationships in the aging process.

The Emergent Aging Model (EAM) [40] posits that aging is an emergent property of complex biological systems, exemplified by gene networks. EAM defines aging quantitatively using the mortality rate, distinguishing between non-aging (constant mortality rate) and aging (increasing mortality rate over time). This model is consistent with the stochastic nature of aging, influenced by numerous genes and epigenetic factors, and can predict the Gompertz model and the Strehler-Mildvan correlation.

The network model for cellular aging [48] proposes that cellular aging arises from the stochastic loss of gene interactions. Death occurs when an essential gene loses all interactions, leading to an exponential increase in mortality rate over time. This model suggests that the rate of aging is proportional to the average number of active interactions per gene and highlights the importance of stochastic heterogeneity in the aging process.

The Misrepair-accumulation theory [39] introduces the concept of Misrepair, emphasizing that it is Misrepair, not the original damage, that accumulates and leads to aging. This theory unifies the roles of environmental damage, repair, gene regulation, and multicellular structure in the aging process, providing explanations for various aging phenotypes and differences in longevity among species.

In summary, the theoretical approaches to biological aging encompass genetic, biochemical, mathematical, and network-based models, each offering unique insights into the mechanisms and processes underlying aging. These theories collectively contribute to a comprehensive understanding of aging, highlighting the complexity and multifaceted nature of this fundamental biological phenomenon.

### 2.9 Coevolution and Aging

Coevolution and aging are intricately linked through the processes of evolutionary adaptation and the gradual deterioration of biological systems over time. The concept of coevolution, which involves the reciprocal evolutionary changes between two or more species or populations, can be extended to understand the mechanisms underlying aging within a biological context. This subsection critically analyzes and synthesizes the information from the provided references to elucidate the theoretical frameworks that connect coevolution and aging.

The Penna model [42] for biological aging and its extensions provide a computational framework to explore the concept of coevolution in aging. This model simulates the accumulation of genetic damage over time, which parallels the coevolutionary dynamics observed in species interactions. The model's results highlight how the accumulation of genetic errors can lead to a decline in fitness, mirroring the coevolutionary arms race where species adapt to exploit each other's vulnerabilities.

The idea of co-aging [91] introduces a novel perspective by suggesting that the demographic trajectories of multiple cohorts can couple together, leading to anomalous hazard curves observed in some species. This concept aligns with the coevolutionary dynamics where the interdependency networks inflict damage proportional to their number of functional nodes. The model's application to empirical datasets, including co-aging worm-pathogen populations and competing tree species, demonstrates that co-aging dynamics are not exclusive to biological systems [91]. This suggests a broader applicability of coevolutionary principles to understand aging across various complex systems.

Sex and coevolution [93] further elucidate how evolutionary processes can influence aging. The NKCS model used in this study shows how varying fitness landscape size, ruggedness, and connectedness can affect the conditions under which eukaryotic sex proves beneficial over asexual reproduction in a coevolutionary context. This analysis underscores the sensitivity of eukaryotic sex to the relative rate of evolution exhibited by partnering species, which can be analogous to the selective pressures that drive aging processes.

Coevolutionary games [96] provide a theoretical framework for understanding the challenges faced by cooperators when competing with defectors. The introduction of coevolutionary rules to evolutionary games implies that properties such as interaction network, reproduction capability, reputation, mobility, or age can simultaneously evolve. This framework can be extended to understand how aging strategies evolve in response to environmental pressures and inter-species interactions.

The Multi-Strategy Coevolving Aging Particles (MS-CAP) algorithm [89] offers a computational approach to black-box optimization, combining components with complementary algorithm logics. This algorithm's success in outperforming state-of-the-art optimization algorithms suggests that coevolutionary dynamics can be harnessed to develop robust and versatile solutions, which can be analogous to the adaptive strategies organisms employ to manage aging.

The concept of increased network interdependency leading to aging [92] provides a compelling argument that aging may be an emergent finite-size effect in networks with dynamical dependencies. This model's simulations show that the network accumulates damage and then catastrophically collapses, fitting experimental data for time-dependent mortality rates of various organisms. This suggests that the qualitative and quantitative features of aging are not sensitively dependent on the details of system structure, aligning with the coevolutionary principles where systemic interdependencies play a crucial role.

The mathematical link between evolving aging and complexity [90] proposes a flexible survival function derived from the stretched exponential function, linking aging dynamics and complexity evolution. This function's ability to depict a general feature in survival curves, such as the tendency to evolve towards rectangular-like survival curves in healthy populations, underscores the importance of complexity in understanding biological aging.

The accumulation theory of aging [94] and the Misrepair-accumulation theory [95] provide complementary perspectives on how aging can be understood through the accumulation of genetic anomalies or misrepairs. These theories suggest that aging is a result of the progressive accumulation of damage or misrepairs, which can be analogous to the coevolutionary dynamics where species accumulate adaptations to exploit each other's vulnerabilities.

In summary, the theoretical frameworks of coevolution and aging are deeply intertwined, with coevolutionary dynamics providing a robust framework to understand the mechanisms underlying aging. The models and theories discussed here highlight how the accumulation of genetic damage, interdependency networks, and the evolution of complexity are key factors that connect coevolution and aging, offering valuable insights into the development of age-friendly solutions.

### 2.10 Stochastic Models of Aging

Stochastic models of aging have emerged as a critical framework for understanding the complexities of aging processes, particularly in the context of age-friendly solutions. These models incorporate randomness to capture the inherent variability and unpredictability observed in biological aging, providing a more nuanced understanding compared to deterministic approaches.

One of the foundational models in this domain is the stochastic Penna model for biological aging [66], which bridges the gap between the bit-string Penna model and the Pletcher-Neuhauser approach. This model successfully reproduces the phenomenon of exponentially increasing mortality at intermediate ages and its deceleration at advanced ages, both in evolutionary steady-state populations and genetically homogeneous individuals. The stochastic nature of this model allows it to account for the variability in genetic predispositions and environmental factors that influence aging trajectories.

The potential for complex computational models of aging is highlighted in [77], where the authors emphasize the need for systems-level models that incorporate interactions between measurable aspects of age-associated changes. These models must be stochastic to capture individual variability in the aging process and predictive to be useful in practical applications. The paper outlines the evolution of such computational models, from their inception to their current state and future potential, underscoring their importance in advancing aging research.

A simpler mathematical model of aging is presented in [47], which considers the aging process for long-lived organisms without relying on internal clocks that count chronological time. Instead, it focuses on empirical considerations of biological factors, described using a system of autonomous ODEs. This model, while simplified, provides a robust framework for organizing experimental data and quantifying causal relationships significant for the development of the aging process.

The population dynamics model for aging in [65] introduces the concept of biological age, which represents the true evolution of tissues and organs, often proceeding by discontinuous jumps. This model mathematically defines a valid model for these jumps, analyzing their temporal dynamics using moments equations and individual-based stochastic simulations. This approach provides a more accurate representation of the nonlinear and sometimes discontinuous nature of biological aging.

Stochastic frailty models are explored in [97] to improve the modeling and forecasting of old-age mortality. The "fragilization" method introduced in this paper adds frailty to standard mortality models, enhancing their ability to capture changing rates of improvement and the deceleration of mortality at old ages. This method is applied to the Lee-Carter model and a parametric time-series model, demonstrating its effectiveness with US male mortality data.

The network model for cellular aging in [48] proposes a mathematical model based on a gene interaction network, where gene interactions are stochastic. This model demonstrates that the exponential increase of mortality rate over time, a defining characteristic of biological aging, can arise from the early stages of aging in this network. The stochastic heterogeneity of gene interactions is highlighted as a crucial factor in the dynamics of the aging process.

Aging in the context of random energy models and spin-glass dynamics is extensively studied in [11, 15, 16, 21, 27], where the phenomenon of aging is characterized by the strong dependence of dynamical correlation functions on waiting time. These studies provide insights into the different aging regimes and the mechanisms behind them, contributing to a deeper understanding of the complex dynamics involved in aging processes.

In summary, stochastic models of aging offer a robust framework for understanding the variability and complexities inherent in aging processes. By incorporating randomness and systems-level interactions, these models provide more accurate and predictive insights, which are crucial for developing age-friendly solutions. The diverse range of models discussed here, from genetic and biological to demographic and network-based approaches, collectively enhance our ability to model and predict aging trajectories, ultimately contributing to more effective interventions and policies aimed at improving the quality of life for older adults.

## 3 Technological Innovations in Age-Friendly Solutions

### 3.1 Smart Homes and the Internet of Things (IoT)

Smart homes, powered by the Internet of Things (IoT), represent a significant advancement in creating age-friendly environments. The integration of IoT in smart homes allows for the remote monitoring and control of household appliances, enhancing the quality of life for older adults by promoting independence and safety. This subsection critically analyzes the technological innovations and theoretical approaches that underpin smart homes and the IoT, synthesizing insights from various references.

One of the primary challenges in IoT-based smart homes is ensuring robust security measures. [103] highlights the importance of multi-factor authentication, including face recognition, to mitigate unauthorized access. This approach is particularly relevant for older adults, who may find traditional authentication methods cumbersome. The paper proposes a software architecture that enhances user registration and log-in authentication, addressing gaps in existing systems. This focus on security is crucial, as unauthorized access can lead to significant risks, such as cyber-attacks that control sensors and actuators, potentially endangering residents.

Health monitoring is another critical application of IoT in smart homes. [99] discusses the integration of medical devices with IoT, which can alleviate the strain on healthcare systems by enabling older adults to receive treatment or recover at home. The paper examines state-of-the-art research and proposes the integration of IoT with an existing smart home testbed for further study. This approach not only enhances the efficiency of healthcare delivery but also provides personalized treatment options, which are essential for older adults with varying health needs.

The Web of Things (WoT) extends the capabilities of IoT by enabling smart homes to manage and share information produced by physical things and residents. [101] presents a layered framework for a smart home system, focusing on a research prototype that helps elderly residents live independently and safely. The system leverages WoT technologies to build context-aware, personalized services, unobtrusively monitoring residents in a real-world environment. This approach underscores the potential of WoT to enhance the functionality and adaptability of smart homes, particularly for older adults.

Data privacy and security are paramount concerns in smart homes equipped with IoT devices. [98] identifies vulnerabilities such as default and weak passwords, cheap materials, and unencrypted communication as significant threats. The paper proposes solutions, including strong authentication mechanisms and encrypted communication protocols, to mitigate these risks. Ensuring data privacy is essential for older adults, who may be more vulnerable to privacy breaches and misuse of personal information.

The interoperability of IoT devices in smart homes is another critical issue. [102] discusses Matter, a connectivity solution intended to become a universal standard for smart home devices. The paper evaluates Matter's design, features, and potential future directions, highlighting its role in overcoming interoperability challenges. A standardized approach to IoT connectivity is vital for creating seamless and user-friendly smart home environments, which are particularly beneficial for older adults who may have difficulty navigating complex systems.

Challenges related to system design and implementation are also addressed in the literature. [100] studies the design of an IoT system for a residential smart grid, focusing on the messaging protocol of a universal IoT home gateway. The paper discusses the features of such a system to support large-scale deployment and real-time applications, which are essential for the efficient operation of smart homes. This focus on system design and implementation is crucial for ensuring that smart homes are reliable and effective in meeting the needs of older adults.

In conclusion, the integration of IoT in smart homes offers numerous benefits for older adults, including enhanced security, health monitoring, and personalized services. However, ensuring robust security measures, addressing data privacy concerns, and achieving interoperability among IoT devices remain critical challenges. The insights from the referenced papers provide a comprehensive understanding of the technological innovations and theoretical approaches that underpin smart homes and the IoT, offering valuable guidance for the development of age-friendly solutions.

### 3.2 Wearable Devices and Health Monitoring

Wearable devices have become pivotal in the development of age-friendly solutions, providing continuous health monitoring and real-time data analysis that significantly enhance the quality of life for older adults. These devices capitalize on advancements in miniaturization, low-power electronics, and wireless communication technologies to create efficient and user-friendly systems.

One of the key innovations in wearable health monitoring is the use of Human Body Communication (HBC) [110]. HBC leverages the human body as a communication medium, offering superior energy efficiency and inherent security compared to traditional Wireless Body Area Networks (WBANs). This approach not only minimizes energy consumption but also enhances the reliability and security of data transmission, making it ideal for long-term health monitoring applications.

The integration of diverse sensors into wearable devices is another critical aspect of their effectiveness. These sensors can monitor a wide array of physiological parameters, including heart rate, blood pressure, oxygen saturation, and more complex signals like electrocardiograms (ECG) and electroencephalograms (EEG) [106]. This comprehensive data collection enables a holistic view of an individual's health status, facilitating early detection of potential health issues and proactive intervention.

Furthermore, the incorporation of machine learning and artificial intelligence (AI) into wearable health monitoring systems has opened new avenues for personalized healthcare [108]. These technologies analyze vast amounts of data collected from wearables to provide tailored health recommendations and predictive insights. For example, AI models can identify patterns in health data that may indicate an increased risk of chronic diseases, allowing for timely medical intervention.

Energy autonomy is also a significant area of research, focusing on developing energy-harvesting technologies that can power sensors continuously [104]. This is crucial for the long-term viability of wearable health monitoring systems, as it eliminates the need for frequent battery replacements and ensures uninterrupted data collection.

Despite these advancements, challenges remain in the widespread adoption of wearable health monitoring technologies. Issues such as data privacy, security, and the reliability of sensor data are critical concerns that need to be addressed [109]. Additionally, the accuracy and robustness of wearable devices, particularly in dynamic environments, are ongoing areas of research [111].

During the COVID-19 pandemic, wearable devices demonstrated their potential in remote health monitoring and early detection of symptoms [107]. These devices continuously monitor vital signs such as temperature and oxygen saturation, providing real-time data that is crucial for early diagnosis and management of the disease.

The future of wearable health monitoring lies in the integration of multi-modal data and advanced analytics to provide more comprehensive and accurate health assessments [105]. By combining data from various sources, including wearables, mobile applications, and clinical records, it is possible to create a holistic view of an individual's health, enabling more precise and personalized healthcare.

In conclusion, wearable devices represent a transformative approach to health monitoring, offering continuous, real-time data collection and analysis that significantly enhance the quality of life for older adults. While challenges remain, ongoing research and technological advancements are poised to overcome these obstacles, paving the way for a future where wearable health monitoring is an integral part of personalized and proactive healthcare.

### 3.3 Robotics and Assistive Technologies

Robotics and assistive technologies are rapidly evolving to address the needs of an aging population, offering innovative solutions that enhance the quality of life for the elderly and individuals with disabilities. The integration of robotics into age-friendly solutions is multifaceted, encompassing a range of applications from social interaction to physical assistance. This subsection critically analyzes the current state of robotics and assistive technologies, synthesizing insights from various research domains to provide a comprehensive understanding of their potential and challenges.

One of the primary areas of focus is the development of robotic systems that can assist with Activities of Daily Living (ADLs). Studies such as [119] and [115] emphasize the importance of understanding the frequency and nature of ADLs to guide the development of assistive robots. These studies highlight the need for a robotics-relevant taxonomy derived from quantitative ADL data, which can inform the design of robots that meet the true demands of the healthcare community. The findings suggest that humans perform repetitive tasks such as reaching, opening drawers, and retrieving objects hundreds of times a day, underscoring the potential for assistive robots to significantly alleviate the burden on individuals with disabilities.

The role of robotics in healthcare extends beyond physical assistance to include therapeutic applications. For instance, [120] introduces a project aimed at using social assistive robotics for autistic children, where the robot adapts its behavior based on the child's emotions and specific features. This approach not only supports the operators in their work but also introduces a personalized therapeutic experience. Similarly, [116] proposes an edge computing-based human-robot cognitive fusion framework for autism spectrum disorder therapy, integrating real-time computing and analysis to achieve seamless remote diagnosis and therapy alteration.

The design and control of robotic systems for assistive purposes are also critical areas of research. Studies like [118] and [121] discuss the integration of 6 Degrees of Freedom (DOF) robotic arms in rescue robots, emphasizing the importance of precise motion control and low power consumption. These studies highlight the technical challenges in designing robust and efficient robotic systems that can operate in hazardous environments. Additionally, [113] presents a framework for motor imagery-based 3-dimensional assistive robotic control, reducing the number of motor imagery classes required for complex movements, thereby making the system more accessible to users.

Human-robot interaction (HRI) is another key aspect that influences the acceptance and effectiveness of assistive robotics. Workshops such as [114] and research directions outlined in [112] address the challenges and dynamics of HRI, particularly in fostering trust and acceptance. The workshop on trust, acceptance, and social cues in HRI [114] underscores the importance of short interactions and long-lasting relationships between people and robots, which is crucial for the adoption of assistive technologies in various fields. [112] outlines research directions for enabling an Autonomous Physical System (APS) to learn the physical and information skills necessary to perform tasks with independence and flexibility, emphasizing the need for robust autonomy in assistive robotics.

The integration of emerging technologies such as augmented reality (AR) and artificial intelligence (AI) is also transforming the landscape of assistive robotics. For example, [117] demonstrates the use of AR in enhancing explainability and efficiency in human-robot interaction, particularly in teaching robots tasks and validating their plans. This approach not only improves the usability of assistive robots but also enhances the user's understanding of the robot's capabilities and intentions.

In conclusion, the field of robotics and assistive technologies is advancing rapidly, driven by a combination of technological innovations and a deeper understanding of user needs. The integration of robotics into age-friendly solutions holds significant promise for enhancing the quality of life for the elderly and individuals with disabilities. However, challenges remain in terms of design, control, and human-robot interaction, which require ongoing research and collaboration across multiple disciplines.

### 3.4 AI-Driven Healthcare Systems

AI-driven healthcare systems represent a transformative force in the realm of age-friendly solutions, offering unprecedented opportunities to enhance patient care, improve diagnostic accuracy, and optimize treatment protocols. However, the integration of AI into healthcare is not without its challenges, particularly concerning safety, efficacy, and regulatory compliance.

Ensuring the safety and efficacy of AI systems in healthcare is paramount. [127] emphasizes the need for a robust framework to evaluate AI systems, encompassing pre-clinical, exploratory, definitive, and post-market surveillance phases. This multi-phase approach ensures rigorous testing and continuous monitoring, mitigating risks associated with deployment. The framework proposed in [127] is crucial for guiding developers, policymakers, and regulators, fostering trust and acceptance among healthcare professionals and patients.

The potential of AI to revolutionize healthcare is further underscored by its ability to leverage multimodal data sources. [126] introduces the Holistic AI in Medicine (HAIM) framework, which integrates various data modalities—tabular, time-series, text, and images—to enhance predictive accuracy. The HAIM framework demonstrates that multimodal AI systems can outperform single-source approaches, offering a more comprehensive and accurate assessment of patient conditions. This approach not only improves diagnostic outcomes but also supports personalized treatment plans, aligning with the principles of age-friendly healthcare.

Despite promising advancements, the translation of AI technologies from research to clinical practice remains a significant challenge. [122] presents a practical framework for AI product development in healthcare, emphasizing clinical validation, regulatory compliance, and data strategy. This framework addresses the complexities of AI development, highlighting the importance of interdisciplinary collaboration and stakeholder engagement. By providing a roadmap for AI product development, [122] offers valuable insights for overcoming barriers to AI implementation in healthcare.

Ethical and regulatory considerations are also critical. [128] discusses the evolution of personalized healthcare services, emphasizing the need for reliable and resilient AI systems that consider diverse health conditions. The paper proposes a methodology to develop AI-driven healthcare services that address existing weaknesses, ensuring equitable and sustainable healthcare delivery. Similarly, [125] outlines a framework for enhancing healthcare sustainability and fairness through AI, particularly in low- and middle-income countries. This framework emphasizes large-scale public health datasets and human-centric decision-making systems, promoting universal access to healthcare.

Explainability and transparency are paramount in gaining the trust of healthcare professionals and patients. [123] reviews various explainable AI (XAI) methods and their challenges in healthcare, highlighting the need for AI systems to provide interpretable and understandable outputs. The paper underscores the importance of model explainability in high-stakes decision-making situations, such as medical diagnosis and treatment planning. By fostering transparency, XAI can enhance the adoption of AI technologies in healthcare, ensuring clinicians can trust and effectively use AI-driven insights.

The regulatory landscape for AI in healthcare is evolving, with efforts to establish standardized assessment frameworks. [124] discusses the establishment of the Focus Group on Artificial Intelligence for Health (FG-AI4H) by the International Telecommunication Union (ITU) and the World Health Organization (WHO). The FG-AI4H aims to develop a standardized framework for evaluating AI-based healthcare methods, promoting international harmonization and fostering the global adoption of AI in healthcare. This initiative is crucial for addressing regulatory challenges, ensuring AI systems are safe, effective, and compliant with international standards.

In conclusion, AI-driven healthcare systems hold immense potential to enhance age-friendly solutions by improving diagnostic accuracy, personalizing treatment plans, and optimizing healthcare delivery. However, successful integration requires a comprehensive approach addressing safety, efficacy, regulatory compliance, and ethical considerations. By leveraging frameworks such as those proposed in [127], [126], [122], [128], [125], [124], and [123], stakeholders can navigate the complexities of AI implementation, ensuring AI technologies deliver tangible benefits to patients and healthcare providers alike.

### 3.5 Ambient Assisted Living (AAL) Technologies

Ambient Assisted Living (AAL) technologies represent a significant advancement in supporting the independence and quality of life for older adults and individuals with disabilities. These technologies leverage a combination of Ambient Intelligence (AmI), Internet of Things (IoT), and other ICT-based solutions to create environments that are responsive to the needs of their inhabitants [131][129]. Despite the potential benefits, the adoption of AAL technologies in real-world settings remains limited, primarily due to issues related to user acceptance, privacy concerns, and the lack of personalized solutions [131][134].

One of the key challenges in the development of AAL systems is ensuring that they are designed with the end-users in mind. This involves not only understanding the functional requirements but also addressing the psychological and social aspects that influence user acceptance [131]. For instance, older adults may be reluctant to adopt new technologies due to concerns about complexity, privacy, and the perceived intrusiveness of monitoring systems [134]. Therefore, AAL systems must be designed to be user-friendly, transparent, and respectful of user autonomy [137].

Privacy and data protection are critical considerations in the deployment of AAL technologies. As these systems often involve the collection and processing of sensitive personal data, ensuring that privacy is maintained is paramount [134][137]. The GoodBrother COST Action, for example, has highlighted the importance of ethical considerations and data protection in the use of video and audio monitoring in care settings [134]. This underscores the need for inclusive privacy design that considers the perspectives of both users and bystanders, such as caregivers and service providers [137].

Intelligent AAL systems have the potential to provide personalized care by leveraging machine learning and semantic web technologies to aggregate and interpret data from various sources [130]. These systems can adapt to the specific needs of individual users, offering tailored support that enhances independence and safety [130]. However, the effectiveness of such systems depends on their ability to accurately interpret user behavior and context, which requires sophisticated data processing and analysis techniques [130][135].

The integration of human participation in AAL systems is another critical aspect that can enhance their effectiveness. Human involvement can provide a level of care and support that technology alone cannot achieve, particularly in terms of social interaction and emotional support [11]. Mutual assistance communities, for example, can leverage human tasks to provide timely and cost-effective care, thereby reducing the reliance on professional services [11]. This approach not only addresses the practical needs of older adults but also contributes to their psychological well-being by fostering a sense of community and belonging [11].

Technological advancements such as IoT and Augmented Reality (AR) are also playing a significant role in the development of AAL solutions. IoT devices can monitor various aspects of a user's environment, providing real-time data that can be used to detect changes in health status or to assist with daily activities [136][132]. AR technologies, on the other hand, can offer immersive and interactive experiences that help users navigate their environment, access information, and receive guidance in real-time [136][133]. These technologies can be particularly beneficial for individuals with cognitive impairments, such as Alzheimer's disease, by providing visual and auditory cues that aid in memory and orientation [136].

Despite the promising developments, there are still significant challenges that need to be addressed to fully realize the potential of AAL technologies. These include the need for more robust and scalable systems, the integration of multimodal data sources, and the development of user-centered design approaches that prioritize usability and privacy [129][130][137]. Additionally, there is a need for ongoing research to explore new applications and to address the ethical and social implications of deploying AAL technologies in diverse settings [134][137][132].

In conclusion, AAL technologies offer a promising avenue for enhancing the quality of life for older adults and individuals with disabilities. However, their success depends on a multidisciplinary approach that integrates technological innovation with a deep understanding of user needs, privacy concerns, and social dynamics. By addressing these challenges, we can develop AAL systems that are not only technologically advanced but also ethically sound and user-centered.

### 3.6 Smart Home Goal Feature Model (SHGFM)

The Smart Home Goal Feature Model (SHGFM) represents a structured approach to designing and deploying smart home technologies that cater specifically to the needs of the elderly, aiming to support their ability to age in place [140]. This model addresses the heuristic approaches traditionally used by Subject Matter Experts (SMEs) and healthcare researchers, providing a more systematic method to establish goals and identify features necessary for the effective implementation of smart home solutions. The SHGFM is particularly valuable in its ability to map personalized needs to specific technological features, ensuring that the smart home environment is both functional and user-friendly for elderly residents.

One of the key advantages of the SHGFM is its focus on goal-oriented design, which allows for a more tailored and effective integration of smart technologies into the living environment of the elderly. By defining a set of goals at different levels and mapping these to corresponding features, the model facilitates the creation of smart homes that are not only technologically advanced but also aligned with the unique requirements of elderly users [140]. This approach is crucial in addressing the challenges associated with the usability and adaptability of smart home technologies, which are often complex and difficult for elderly users to navigate.

The SHGFM also contributes to the broader smart home ecosystem by integrating with extended smart home architectures, such as the Smart Home Extended Architecture (SHEA), which extends beyond the physical home to include cloud-based platforms and mobile devices [138]. This integration is essential for creating a cohesive and responsive smart home environment that can adapt to the changing needs of its residents. The SHEA's ability to manage the variability in home configurations and application services through feature modeling is particularly relevant in the context of the SHGFM, as it allows for a more flexible and scalable deployment of smart home solutions.

In addition to its goal-oriented design, the SHGFM benefits from advancements in artificial intelligence and machine learning, which are increasingly being leveraged to enhance the functionality and responsiveness of smart home systems. For instance, models like SAGE (Smart Home Agent with Grounded Execution) utilize Large Language Models (LLMs) to interpret user requests and execute a sequence of actions to fulfill them [139]. This approach not only enhances the system's ability to understand and respond to user commands but also extends its capabilities to manage user preferences, monitor device states, and even identify and address potential emergencies.

The integration of multi-channel sensor networks and data fusion methods further enhances the SHGFM's potential to create a comprehensive and responsive smart home environment. The Smart Home Data Fusion Method (SHDFM) proposed in [141] provides a structured approach to integrating multi-modal data from various sensors, improving the quality and efficiency of data collection and reducing the complexity of data fusion. This is particularly important in smart homes, where the accurate and timely collection of data can significantly impact the effectiveness of the system in monitoring health, detecting emergencies, and ensuring safety.

Moreover, the SHGFM's ability to incorporate user feedback and preferences is crucial for creating a personalized and user-centric smart home environment. Models like Sasha, which use LLMs to reason about user goals and create automation routines, demonstrate the potential for enhancing user experience through creative and context-aware responses [142]. This approach is particularly relevant in the context of the elderly, where the ability to understand and respond to nuanced user commands can significantly enhance the quality of life and independence of residents.

In conclusion, the Smart Home Goal Feature Model (SHGFM) represents a significant advancement in the design and deployment of smart home technologies for the elderly. By providing a structured approach to goal-oriented design and feature identification, the SHGFM facilitates the creation of smart homes that are both technologically advanced and user-friendly. The integration of AI, machine learning, and multi-channel sensor networks further enhances the model's potential to create a comprehensive and responsive smart home environment that meets the unique needs of elderly residents.

### 3.7 Sociotechnical Smart Systems and Community Integration

Sociotechnical smart systems represent a paradigm shift in the integration of technology and community dynamics, particularly in the context of age-friendly solutions. These systems leverage the convergence of cyber-physical systems (CPS) and social computing to create smart communities where various entities, including human individuals and physical objects, interact and cooperate. This integration promises innovative applications and services that enhance the quality of life, especially for aging populations.

The concept of smart communities is not merely about technological advancement but also about fostering social intelligence and collective decision-making. For instance, the development of self-integration testbeds for decentralized socio-technical systems addresses the challenges of large-scale experimentation and operation in IoT environments. These testbeds enable autonomous agents to interact locally with users and remotely with other agents, facilitating intelligent collective choices that self-regulate resource consumption and production. This decentralized approach is crucial for maintaining trust, transparency, and alignment with social values such as privacy, autonomy, and fairness.

Moreover, the integration of social technologies into networked projects aims to develop collective intelligence in a networked society. These projects include tools for collective decision-making and innovation mechanisms that encourage creativity, entrepreneurship, and online collaboration. By considering these networked projects as catalysts for the emergence of collective intelligence, researchers can influence the more sophisticated application of social technologies in practice.

The design and management of complex socio-technical systems benefit from an integrated approach that reconciles the complexities of systems engineering with the tools for understanding natural and social systems. This integrated approach can enhance the design of complex systems, such as transportation networks, by using biological network growth models to produce optimal networks in terms of cost and efficiency. Such hybrid approaches can bridge the gap between technical and social disciplines, leading to more robust and resilient systems.

The concept of a Cyber-Human Social System (CHSS) extends the traditional Cyber-Physical System (CPS) by incorporating diverse and pluralistic 'mixed-life society' elements. This concept enhances the CPS by intervening in individual behavior pro-socially and supporting consensus building. The Cyber-Human Social Co-Operating System (Social Co-OS) embodies this concept by combining cyber and human systems through fast and slow loops, contributing to mutual aid communities and platform cooperatives.

In the context of smart cities, the deployment of extensive IT technology, particularly IoT, plays a key role in improving the quality of life, strengthening business, and aiding government agencies in serving citizens better. However, the challenges of IoT in smart cities, such as interoperability and stakeholder engagement, necessitate a framework that considers both physical infrastructures and human stakeholders.

The integration of technology and society is also evident in the development of intelligent infrastructure to enhance disaster management, community resilience, and public safety. Modern societies are understood as intersections of natural, built, social, and information ecosystems. Intelligent infrastructure, including embedded sensors, IoT, and machine-learning-based decision support, holds the potential to enhance public safety and emergency management while addressing new and emerging threats.

The socio-technical ecosystem approach is essential for the design of sustainable scientific software, where scientists and developers can trade off continuously evolving systems with sufficiently stable requirements. This approach ensures that both technical and social issues are addressed, leading to more robust and resilient systems.

The intelligent sociotechnical systems (iSTS) framework extends traditional sociotechnical systems (STS) theory to meet the demands of AI integration. This framework emphasizes human-centered joint optimization across individual, organizational, ecosystem, and societal levels, proposing a hierarchical HCAI (hHCAI) approach to address challenges in HCAI practices from a broader sociotechnical perspective.

In conclusion, sociotechnical smart systems and community integration are pivotal in creating age-friendly solutions. By leveraging the convergence of cyber-physical systems, social computing, and collective intelligence, these systems can enhance the quality of life for aging populations. The integration of social technologies, decentralized testbeds, and intelligent infrastructure ensures that both technical and social aspects are addressed, leading to more robust and resilient systems.

### 3.8 Design and Ethical Considerations

The design and ethical considerations in the development of age-friendly technological solutions are critical to ensuring that these innovations not only enhance the quality of life for older adults but also respect their autonomy, dignity, and rights. The integration of ethics into the design process is not merely a regulatory requirement but a fundamental aspect that shapes the functionality, acceptability, and long-term impact of these technologies.

One of the primary challenges in this domain is the elicitation and prioritization of values that align with the ethical principles of respect, beneficence, and justice. This process is complicated by the diverse and often conflicting values held by different stakeholders, including designers, users, caregivers, and policymakers. For instance, while designers might prioritize technological efficiency, users might value simplicity and ease of use, and policymakers might focus on compliance with regulatory standards. Therefore, a multidisciplinary approach that incorporates insights from philosophy, sociology, and engineering is essential to navigate these complexities.

The concept of "Value-based Engineering" offers a structured methodology for integrating ethical considerations into the design process. This approach involves systematically eliciting, conceptualizing, and respecting values throughout the system design lifecycle. It recognizes the need for compatibility with agile development methodologies, which are increasingly popular in the tech industry. Agile methods emphasize iterative development and continuous feedback, which can be leveraged to incorporate ethical considerations in a more dynamic and responsive manner.

Tools such as the Moral-IT Cards provide practical support for designers to reflect on the normative aspects of technology development. These cards facilitate discussions on emerging risks, appropriate safeguards, and challenges in implementing ethical considerations. Empirical evaluations of such tools have shown that they can structure ethical reflection practices and level the playing field for debate among diverse stakeholders. This is particularly important in the context of age-friendly technologies, where the involvement of older adults in the design process is crucial to ensure that their needs and preferences are adequately addressed.

The development of autonomous systems, such as intelligent robots and AI-driven platforms, necessitates a rethinking of ethical implications. These systems must be designed to integrate moral, societal, and legal values, both during the design phase and as part of their operational algorithms. The challenge lies in making these values explicit and measurable, especially in contexts where they are often implicit and context-dependent. For example, the ethical behavior of an autonomous robot in a healthcare setting must consider not only the technical robustness of its decision-making processes but also the emotional and psychological impact on patients.

Transparency and accountability are critical issues in the design of ethical autonomous systems. These systems must be able to explain their decisions and actions in a manner that is understandable to human users, particularly older adults who may have varying levels of technological literacy. The concept of "explainable AI" (XAI) has gained traction as a means to address these concerns, but its implementation remains a significant challenge. Designers must also consider the potential for intentional misuse of these systems, which could lead to unethical behavior if not adequately mitigated.

The ethical considerations in the design of age-friendly technologies are not static but evolve with technological advancements and societal changes. For instance, the integration of Large Language Models (LLMs) into social robotics introduces new ethical challenges related to misinformation, emotional disruption, and biases. These challenges require innovative approaches that go beyond traditional ethical frameworks and incorporate empirical design justice methodologies.

In conclusion, the design and ethical considerations in age-friendly technological solutions necessitate a holistic and multidisciplinary approach. This involves integrating ethical principles into the design process, leveraging tools and methodologies that facilitate ethical reflection, and ensuring transparency and accountability in autonomous systems. By doing so, we can develop technologies that not only meet the functional needs of older adults but also respect their dignity, autonomy, and rights.

### 3.9 Future Prospects and Research Directions

The future of age-friendly technological solutions is poised to be shaped by a confluence of theoretical advancements and innovative technological developments. As we look ahead, several key areas emerge as critical for driving progress in this field.

One of the primary challenges in current age-friendly technologies is the limitation of existing instruments and methodologies. These limitations span various domains, including signal processing, environmental factors, and scientific understanding. Overcoming these hurdles will require not only incremental improvements but also transformative shifts in how we approach the detection and characterization of age-related signals. The push towards a full characterization of parameter spaces, particularly in probing larger volumes of k-modes, represents a significant step forward. This approach will enable a more comprehensive understanding of the underlying mechanisms that contribute to age-related changes, thereby facilitating the development of more effective and personalized solutions.

Forecasting scientific research trends is another crucial aspect that will guide the future of age-friendly technologies. The ability to predict and adapt to emerging trends is vital for ensuring that technological innovations remain relevant and impactful. Techniques such as the use of historical publication data, pre-trained language models, and patent analysis can provide valuable insights into the temporal dynamics of scientific topics. For instance, the ratio of reviews to original research articles can serve as an indicator of increasing or declining interest in specific areas, which can inform strategic investments and research directions. Tools like SciTrends offer a user-friendly platform for predicting these trends, enabling stakeholders to make informed decisions about future research priorities.

The development of new research facilities and infrastructures will also play a pivotal role in advancing age-friendly technologies. The construction of facilities like the new research facility in Andrate, with its unique environmental conditions, underscores the importance of specialized infrastructures for conducting high-quality research. Similarly, the future plans for facilities such as the AGS and HL-LHC highlight the need for sustained investment in cutting-edge technologies to maintain and extend the discovery potential in this field. These facilities will not only enhance our ability to conduct detailed studies but also foster international collaboration, which is essential for tackling complex challenges in age-friendly technologies.

In addition to infrastructure, the evolution of theoretical frameworks and computational tools will be critical. Theoretical advancements in areas such as formal aspects of high-energy physics and cosmology can provide new insights and methodologies that can be applied to age-related research. The integration of these theoretical breakthroughs with experimental data will be key to unlocking new frontiers in understanding age-related phenomena. Furthermore, the development of new computational tools will enhance our ability to analyze complex datasets and model intricate systems, thereby enabling more precise and effective age-friendly solutions.

The role of interdisciplinary collaboration cannot be overstated. The convergence of expertise from various fields, including physics, biology, computer science, and engineering, will be essential for addressing the multifaceted challenges of aging. For example, the application of high-energy physics concepts to age-related research can lead to novel approaches in detecting and mitigating age-related changes. Similarly, advancements in detector technology will be crucial for developing more sensitive and accurate instruments for studying age-related phenomena.

Finally, the importance of strategic planning and prioritization in research cannot be undermined. The formulation of compelling questions and the identification of research priorities will guide the direction of future efforts in age-friendly technologies. By focusing on the most pressing and impactful areas, researchers can maximize the efficiency and effectiveness of their work, ultimately leading to more meaningful and transformative outcomes.

In conclusion, the future of age-friendly technological solutions will be driven by a combination of theoretical advancements, technological innovations, and strategic research planning. By addressing current limitations, leveraging predictive analytics, investing in specialized infrastructures, fostering interdisciplinary collaboration, and prioritizing research efforts, we can pave the way for a new era of age-friendly technologies that significantly enhance the quality of life for older adults.

## 4 Case Studies and Practical Applications

### 4.1 Familiarity-Based Design Approaches

Familiarity-based design approaches have emerged as a critical strategy in creating age-friendly solutions, particularly in addressing the cognitive and physical challenges faced by the elderly. These approaches leverage the principle of familiarity to bridge the gap between the elderly's mental models and the technologies they interact with, thereby enhancing usability and adoption.

The concept of familiarity in design is deeply rooted in understanding the cognitive processes of the elderly and adapting technologies to align with their existing knowledge and experiences. Studies have shown that the elderly often struggle with new technologies due to a mismatch between their mental models and the unfamiliar interfaces. By incorporating familiar elements, such as recognizable icons, intuitive navigation, and consistent interaction patterns, designers can significantly improve the perceived satisfaction and adoption likelihood among elderly users.

One of the key methodologies in familiarity-based design is the use of generative design ideation, which employs advanced AI techniques to create user-friendly interfaces. A generative approach using pre-trained language models can fine-tune design concepts, ensuring that the generated ideas are not only concise and understandable but also capable of synthesizing external knowledge sources. This method has been successfully applied in various design contexts, including rolling toy design, demonstrating its potential in generating novel yet familiar design solutions.

Another important aspect of familiarity-based design is the integration of knowledge distance into the design process. A knowledge-based expert system can guide the retrieval and use of design stimuli according to the knowledge distance, enabling designers to explore and retrieve multilevel inspirational stimuli from diverse fields. This approach not only enhances creativity but also ensures that the resulting designs are grounded in familiar concepts, making them more accessible to the elderly.

The role of familiarity in design extends beyond individual interfaces to encompass collaborative and crowdsourced design methodologies. A crowdsourcing algorithm, such as CrowdAsm, dynamically assembles teams of workers to complete tasks requiring collaboration among workers with heterogeneous skills. By leveraging familiarity in design, this algorithm improves the efficiency of collaborative crowdsourcing, making it a valuable tool in the development of age-friendly solutions.

Moreover, the integration of deep learning techniques in concept identification for generative design further enhances the effectiveness of familiarity-based approaches. A framework using deep learning can cluster design alternatives into categories, reducing the cognitive burden on designers and facilitating the selection of familiar yet innovative design options. This approach is particularly beneficial in the context of age-friendly design, where the goal is to create solutions that are both intuitive and adaptable.

In addition to these technological advancements, the theoretical underpinnings of familiarity-based design are supported by studies that explore the cognitive and socio-cognitive mechanisms of design. The role of memory of past designs in individual and collective design highlights the importance of reusing familiar concepts to facilitate problem-solving and innovation. This perspective aligns with the principles of familiarity-based design, which aim to leverage existing knowledge to create user-friendly solutions.

Furthermore, the application of large language models (LLMs) in conceptual design generation offers new possibilities for familiarity-based design. LLMs can generate solutions for design problems, often resulting in higher feasibility and usefulness compared to crowdsourced solutions. This capability allows designers to explore a wide range of familiar yet novel concepts, enhancing the creative process and resulting in more age-friendly designs.

In conclusion, familiarity-based design approaches are pivotal in creating age-friendly solutions that are intuitive, accessible, and adaptable to the needs of the elderly. By leveraging advanced AI techniques, integrating knowledge distance, and incorporating collaborative methodologies, designers can create technologies that align with the cognitive and physical capabilities of the elderly, ultimately enhancing their quality of life.

### 4.2 Touchscreen and Interface Design Guidelines

The design of touchscreens and interfaces for older adults presents unique challenges and opportunities, necessitating a tailored approach to ensure usability and accessibility. A critical analysis of the existing literature reveals several key considerations and guidelines that can enhance the interaction experience for this demographic.

Firstly, the distinct cognitive and physical abilities of older adults must be taken into account when designing touchscreens. [180] highlights the need for clear, simple, and intuitive interfaces that minimize cognitive load. This aligns with the principles outlined in [173], which emphasizes the importance of a robust, concise, and lucid user interface (UI) to enhance operability. The adoption of these guidelines, however, has been limited, as noted in [180], suggesting a need for better dissemination and implementation strategies.

Technological advancements in touchscreen interfaces, such as those discussed in [182], offer potential solutions to the limitations of small screens and the need for compact systems. Innovations that eliminate the need for physical keyboards and mice can make interfaces more accessible to older adults who may have dexterity issues. However, the integration of these technologies must be done thoughtfully to avoid overwhelming users with too many options or complex interactions.

Guidelines for interface design, as presented in [174], provide a structured approach to creating consistent and effective UIs. These guidelines are particularly valuable when designing systems that will be used by multiple users over extended periods, as they ensure a cohesive user experience. For older adults, who may have varying levels of technological proficiency, consistency in design can significantly reduce the learning curve and improve overall satisfaction.

The emergence of natural user interfaces (NUIs), such as gesture-based interactions, presents another avenue for enhancing usability. [175] and [181] discuss the potential of NUIs to create more intuitive and immersive experiences. For older adults, these interfaces can provide a more natural way to interact with technology, reducing the need for precise motor skills. However, the design of these interfaces must be carefully considered to ensure they are accessible and easy to learn.

The importance of user experience (UX) in the design of interfaces for older adults cannot be overstated. [176] emphasizes the need for prioritizing UI design principles that enhance UX, particularly for non-expert users. Sensitivity and flexibility are identified as key principles, which can be particularly beneficial for older adults who may have specific needs or preferences.

In addition to these considerations, the integration of touchless interfaces, as explored in [178], offers a hygienic and potentially more accessible alternative for older adults. These interfaces can reduce the risk of physical strain and provide a more comfortable interaction experience. However, as noted in [177], the usability of touchless interfaces must be carefully evaluated to ensure they are not only feasible but also user-friendly.

Finally, the design of interfaces for older adults must consider the broader context of use, including environmental factors and user preferences. [179] discusses the importance of adaptive app design that accounts for handedness and one-handed usage, which can be particularly relevant for older adults who may have mobility limitations.

In conclusion, the design of touchscreens and interfaces for older adults requires a multifaceted approach that considers cognitive, physical, and technological factors. By synthesizing the insights from the referenced literature, designers can create interfaces that are not only accessible and usable but also enhance the overall quality of life for older adults. This approach not only aligns with the principles of familiarity-based design but also paves the way for future innovations that address the unique needs of older users, ultimately fostering a more inclusive and supportive technological environment.

### 4.3 Motivation and Adoption Strategies

The motivation behind the adoption of age-friendly solutions is multifaceted, involving both individual and collective factors that influence the decision-making process. Understanding these motivations is crucial for designing effective strategies to promote the uptake of technologies and practices that enhance the quality of life for older adults. The interplay between personal preferences, social influences, and technological advancements plays a significant role in shaping adoption behaviors.

One key finding from [184] is the interdependence among different active mobility choices, such as walking, cycling, and bike-sharing. The study highlights that psychological and neighborhood variables generate more coupling among active modes than individual and household factors. This suggests that creating supportive community norms and enhancing navigational skills can drive joint adoption decisions, fostering a more active and engaged lifestyle among older adults.

The adoption of supplementary network technologies, as explored in [189], provides insights into how users make decisions based on the intrinsic qualities of technologies, congestion externalities, and access rates. The study's findings underscore the importance of understanding user behavior to optimize technology adoption strategies. For age-friendly solutions, this implies that offering technologies that are easy to use, reliable, and accessible can significantly enhance their adoption among older populations.

Social networks play a pivotal role in the adoption of innovations, as evidenced by [186]. The study introduces a method to predict adoption probabilities in social networks, emphasizing the significance of social influence, structural equivalence, and confounding factors. For age-friendly technologies, this implies that leveraging social networks to promote adoption can be highly effective. Community-based initiatives and peer support programs can facilitate the spread of new technologies, making them more appealing and accessible to older adults.

The integration of behavioral experimental findings into dynamical models, as discussed in [187], offers a framework for understanding how individual adoption choices propagate through social networks. This approach can inform seeding policies to facilitate large-scale adoption of age-friendly behaviors and products. By identifying key behavioral drivers and integrating them into computational simulations, policymakers can design interventions that maximize the spread of beneficial behaviors among older adults.

The dual nature of adoption processes in complex networks, as described in [183], highlights the importance of both social contagion and exploration in the adoption of innovations. This dual perspective can inform strategies for promoting the adoption of age-friendly solutions by considering both the social influences that drive adoption and the individual exploration of new technologies.

The search and matching model for adoption from foster care, presented in [190], provides a novel approach to understanding adoption behaviors. This model can be adapted to the context of age-friendly solutions by considering how different search strategies and matching processes influence the adoption of technologies and services. For instance, caseworker-driven strategies that directly engage older adults in the adoption process may be more effective than passive approaches.

The competition of simple and complex adoption processes on interdependent networks, as explored in [193], reveals how different adoption dynamics can coexist and interact. This has implications for the design of age-friendly solutions, suggesting that a combination of simple, intuitive technologies and more complex, multifunctional solutions may be necessary to meet the diverse needs of older adults.

The study on the uptake of software technologies among developers, as described in [185], provides insights into the factors that drive technology adoption. The findings suggest that quick response to issues, overall deployment, and high-quality community support are critical for adoption. For age-friendly technologies, this implies that continuous improvement and strong community support can enhance their appeal and adoption.

The adoption of Web 3.0, as analyzed in [196], highlights the importance of digital dexterity and electronic word-of-mouth in driving adoption behaviors. For age-friendly solutions, this suggests that enhancing digital literacy and fostering positive word-of-mouth can significantly boost adoption rates.

The study on the adoption of low-carbon technologies, as presented in [194], provides a decision framework that considers the traits of decision-makers and objects. This framework can guide the development of age-friendly solutions by identifying the key factors that influence adoption decisions among older adults.

The adoption of green technologies, as discussed in [188], underscores the role of social identities and outgroup aversion in adoption behaviors. This has implications for the design of age-friendly solutions, suggesting that addressing social identity and fostering inclusivity can enhance adoption.

The study on the adoption of enabling I4.0 technologies, as described in [191], identifies barriers and benefits in the supply chain. This provides a framework for understanding the adoption process of age-friendly technologies, highlighting the need for addressing barriers and leveraging benefits to promote adoption.

The study on the adoption of electric vehicles, as presented in [195], shows that increasing familiarity with a new technology can facilitate adoption. For age-friendly solutions, this suggests that providing opportunities for older adults to experience and familiarize themselves with new technologies can enhance their adoption.

The model for the dynamics of service adoption on a two-layer multiplex network, as described in [192], provides insights into how social interactions and power-grid connections influence adoption behaviors. This can inform strategies for promoting the adoption of age-friendly technologies by considering the interplay between social networks and technological infrastructure.

### 4.4 Security and Safety in Mobile Technology

The integration of mobile technology into various aspects of daily life, including healthcare, enterprise, and personal safety, has necessitated a robust framework for security and safety. This subsection critically analyzes the theoretical and technological approaches to ensuring security and safety in mobile technology, synthesizing insights from the provided references.

Mobile devices are not merely communication tools but multifunctional gateways that handle sensitive data, including financial transactions and personal information. As highlighted in [203], these devices are vulnerable to cyber-attacks, which can compromise not only the device but also the broader digital ecosystem. The paper underscores the importance of mobile data cryptography and two-step protection mechanisms, such as two-factor authentication, to secure online transactions and user authentication.

In the enterprise context, mobile security is paramount due to the handling of sensitive data and compliance with regulatory standards. [197] discusses the implementation of multi-factor authentication and virtual private networks within enterprise mobile environments. The paper emphasizes the need for an integrated security solution that encompasses physical fuses on devices, network layer security components, and application-level protections like encryption and secure containers. This holistic approach ensures that security measures are not siloed but work in concert to provide comprehensive risk coverage.

The security of mobile devices in healthcare environments is particularly critical due to the sensitive nature of the data they handle. [207] examines the vulnerabilities introduced by mobile devices in healthcare settings and proposes countermeasures to mitigate these risks while maintaining regulatory compliance. The paper uses Epic Rover, a mobile application for managing electronic medical records, as a test case to illustrate the security challenges and potential solutions.

Data security on mobile devices is a multifaceted issue that requires continuous improvement. [208] provides a comprehensive analysis of the current state of mobile device security, focusing on platforms like iOS and Android. The paper identifies concrete security measures, such as encryption, that effectively prevent unauthorized access to user data. It also discusses the ways modern mobile devices are accessed by unauthorized parties and proposes solutions to enhance device security, emphasizing the importance of reliable encryption.

A tiered security system for mobile devices, as described in [206], offers a user-friendly interface that allows users to define and configure security triggers and actions based on context. This system can be activated from any browser or directly on the mobile device, providing flexibility and ease of use. The paper highlights the versatility of the system, which can address security circumstances ranging from temporary misplacement to malicious theft.

The application layer of mobile technology in enterprise setups is another critical area for security. [202] discusses the application security framework for mobile app development, emphasizing the need for security measures at the application level to reduce enterprise risk. The paper underscores the importance of network security but argues that application-level security is equally vital for comprehensive protection.

Personal safety in mobile technology is addressed in [204], which introduces an emergency-based remote collateral tracking system using the Android platform. The application monitors heart rate and uses GPS to track the user's location, sending alerts via SMS, email, and social media in case of an emergency. This system demonstrates the potential of mobile technology to enhance personal safety through real-time monitoring and rapid response mechanisms.

The security of mobile devices in educational settings is explored in [205], which presents a mobile security enhancement app designed to promote security awareness among students. The app identifies major security weaknesses, scans for vulnerabilities, and reports any security threats, thereby enhancing the security of mobile devices used for learning.

In the context of mobile social networks, [200] categorizes safety challenges and explores recent solutions. The paper highlights the lack of protective infrastructure in mobile social networks, making them targets for various security threats. It provides a deep exploration of security, privacy, and trust issues in mobile social networks and outlines future research directions.

The security risks associated with mobile device use within organizations are investigated in [198], which uncovers significant security risks that may lead to the leakage of valuable intellectual property or expose the organization to legal conflicts. The paper provides an empirical analysis of mobile devices returned by employees, highlighting examples of corporate policy breaches and offering a foundation for future research.

The integration of mobile devices into vehicular technology, as discussed in [199], presents both opportunities and challenges. The paper evaluates the security of a 2017 Skoda Octavia vRS, considering both physical and remote attacks. It demonstrates the potential for privacy attacks through the infotainment system and highlights the need for robust security measures in vehicular technology.

The security of mobile devices in the context of digital avionics is examined in [201], which evaluates the security and trust challenges presented by mobile devices in avionics networks. The paper provides guidelines for addressing security and trust issues when integrating mobile devices into aircraft networks.

In conclusion, the security and safety of mobile technology require a multi-layered approach that encompasses encryption, multi-factor authentication, application-level security, and real-time monitoring. The references provided offer a comprehensive overview of the challenges and solutions in securing mobile technology, highlighting the need for continuous research and innovation to address emerging threats.

### 4.5 Cognitive Interaction Systems for Older Adults

Cognitive Interaction Systems (CISs) for older adults represent a promising frontier in enhancing the quality of life for this demographic through advanced technological solutions. These systems are designed to learn and interact with humans, extending their capabilities and addressing the cognitive and physical challenges that often accompany aging. One of the key areas of focus in designing CISs for older adults is the integration of multimodal input systems, which can bridge the wide range of physical abilities found in older generations by incorporating inputs such as gesture and speech. Collaborative design approaches have been particularly effective in ensuring that these systems are intuitive and user-friendly. However, the design of multimodal interaction presents several trade-offs, including balancing redundancy of commands, complexity of gesture and voice input, and transparency of system actions.

Dialogue systems, particularly those involving commercial dialogue agents, have shown potential in supporting older adults by providing accessible and intuitive interfaces. However, user studies have revealed that these systems often fall short in meeting the specific needs of older adults, who may require more robust user modeling frameworks to ensure effective interaction. The refinement of Automatic Speech Recognition (ASR) systems for older adults, particularly those with cognitive impairments, has shown that transfer learning can significantly boost system performance, making these technologies more accessible and effective.

Brain-Computer Interfaces (BCIs) represent another innovative approach to cognitive interaction, offering the potential for non-invasive interaction with smart home technologies. Exploratory studies have highlighted both the advantages and drawbacks of BCIs, as well as the features that older adults find most valuable. Similarly, voice assistants have been explored as a means of enhancing interaction for older adults, with studies indicating that these technologies can provide both assistive and social benefits.

The discourse behavior of older adults interacting with dialogue agents has been analyzed to understand how these systems can be optimized for natural and engaging conversations. Results have shown that verbosity and sentiment vary based on the intimacy and difficulty of the topics discussed, suggesting that dialogue systems should be designed to adapt to the emotional and cognitive states of users.

Assistive technologies for activities of daily living (ADLs) have been extensively reviewed, highlighting the need for personalized and user-centered solutions that can adapt to the diverse needs of older adults. Robots that assist older adults through multimodal interaction have also been evaluated, with studies emphasizing the importance of understanding and effecting multimodal actions, as well as taking the initiative in tasks.

The role of older adults in the design process of smart technologies has been increasingly recognized, with advocates calling for their active involvement from ideation to deployment to ensure that these technologies are accessible and useful. Virtual reality (VR) has been explored as a means of enhancing social interaction among older adults, with studies indicating that perceived spatial presence is a central driver of engagement.

The interaction between older adults and socially assistive robots has been studied, with findings suggesting that shared control designs can accommodate the preferences of older adults, fostering a more collaborative interaction. Conversational agents that use backchannels to engage older adults in neurocognitive disorders screening have shown potential in mitigating the clinicians' burden, with proactive backchanneling being more appreciated by participants.

Explanations in conversational AI systems for older adults aging in place have been analyzed, highlighting the need for transparency and understandability in these systems. User requirements for inclusive technology for older adults have been investigated, with a focus on understanding the sociotechnical context of use. The use of voice assistants by older adults has been studied, revealing that these technologies can serve as both assistive and social tools.

Personalized persuasion for social interactions in nursing homes has been explored, with mixed physical-virtual technologies being proposed to stimulate social interactions. The concept of LifeSpan Cognitive Systems (LSCS) has been introduced, emphasizing the need for continuous, high-frequency interactions and long-term retention with accurate recall.

Virtual environments for social engagement in older adults have been designed, with studies indicating that perceived spatial presence and individual personality play significant roles in engagement. Machine learning and wearable device data have been used to assess cognitive function among older adults, providing proof of concept for wearable-based cognitive monitoring systems.

Human-machine co-creativity with older adults has been explored, with a focus on collaborative drawing and painting and the development of explainable dialogues. A framework for a personalized intelligent assistant for elderly people has been proposed, aiming to help them perform activities of daily living in a smart and connected environment.

The interaction of older adults with e-health interfaces based on Explainable Artificial Intelligence (XAI) has been studied, highlighting the importance of intuitive visualization and straightforward explanations. An intelligent assistive system based on augmented reality and serious games has been investigated, with preliminary results showing potential in supporting older adults with mild cognitive impairment.

A multimodal multisensory interactive cognitive assessment tool has been developed, aiming to provide valuable cognitive assistance in healthcare systems. Older adults' perceptions and challenges in using AI-enabled everyday technologies have been explored, with findings indicating mixed views towards AI-enabled products.

Healing Spaces, a multisensory experience for older adults with advanced dementia and their caregivers, has been evaluated, showing potential in ameliorating behavioral and psychological symptoms. A cognitive stimulation dialogue system with multi-source knowledge fusion has been proposed, aiming to generate open-ended responses guided by cognitive stimulation principles and emotional support strategies.

Online group-exercises for older adults of different physical abilities have been designed and validated, with a focus on keeping older adults physically and socially active.

### 4.6 Smart Home Technologies for Aging in Place

Smart home technologies have emerged as a pivotal solution for enabling aging in place, offering a range of functionalities that support independent living for the elderly. These technologies leverage a combination of artificial intelligence (AI), machine learning (ML), the Internet of Things (IoT), and other advanced systems to provide personalized care and enhance the quality of life for older adults [140][2].

One of the key advantages of smart home technologies is their ability to monitor health and environmental conditions unobtrusively. Wearable health monitoring systems, for instance, can track vital signs such as stress, blood pressure, and location within the home, providing real-time data to caregivers and emergency services [236]. This proactive approach to health monitoring can detect potential health issues before they escalate, ensuring timely interventions and reducing the need for hospital visits.

Moreover, smart home technologies can facilitate social interactions and entertainment, which are crucial for maintaining mental well-being among the elderly. These technologies can connect older adults with their families, friends, and caregivers through video calls, social media, and other digital platforms [140]. Additionally, smart home systems can be integrated with entertainment devices to provide personalized content that caters to the interests and preferences of the elderly.

However, the adoption of smart home technologies is not without challenges. One of the primary issues is the usability and accessibility of these systems for older adults, who may have varying levels of digital literacy and technological familiarity [2]. To address this, it is essential to involve older adults in the design and development process, ensuring that the technologies are intuitive and user-friendly [2]. This participatory approach can also help in identifying and addressing the specific needs and preferences of the elderly, leading to more effective and personalized solutions.

Security and privacy concerns are another significant barrier to the widespread adoption of smart home technologies. The integration of IoT devices in smart homes raises concerns about unauthorized access, data breaches, and the potential misuse of personal information [103][235]. To mitigate these risks, it is crucial to implement robust security measures, such as multi-factor authentication, encryption, and regular software updates [103]. Additionally, transparent communication about data usage and privacy policies can build trust and confidence among users.

The design and implementation of smart home technologies also require a holistic approach that considers the broader context of aging in place. For example, the integration of smart home systems with community resources and caregiver networks can enhance the overall support ecosystem for older adults [2]. AI-driven systems can coordinate caregiving resources more efficiently, reducing the burden on caregivers and ensuring that older adults receive timely and appropriate support [2].

Furthermore, the development of smart home technologies should be guided by a clear understanding of the diverse needs and preferences of the elderly. Personalized intelligent assistants, such as those proposed in [232], can adapt to the individual requirements of older adults, providing tailored support for activities of daily living (ADLs). These assistants can analyze user behavior, recommend activities, and adjust the home environment based on the user's current state and preferences.

In conclusion, smart home technologies hold immense potential for supporting aging in place by providing personalized, proactive, and adaptive care. However, to fully realize this potential, it is essential to address the challenges related to usability, security, and the integration of smart home systems with broader care networks. By adopting a user-centered design approach and implementing robust security measures, smart home technologies can become a valuable tool for enhancing the quality of life and independence of older adults.

### 4.7 Social Robots in Promoting Exercise

Social robots have emerged as promising tools for promoting physical exercise among older adults, leveraging their ability to engage, motivate, and provide personalized feedback. These robots can assume diverse roles in exercise scenarios, ranging from companions to coaches, each with distinct implications for user engagement and effectiveness [243]. The design and deployment of these robots must consider user preferences, technological capabilities, and the specific needs of the target population.

One critical aspect of social robot design is the balance between user control and robot guidance. A case study involving a prototype social robot for exercise among older adults revealed that users prefer greater autonomy in selecting exercises and managing their routines [239]. This finding underscores the importance of designing robots that can adapt to individual preferences and provide flexible, user-centered interactions. The necessity for precise motion tracking was also questioned, suggesting that simpler, more intuitive interfaces may be more effective in promoting long-term engagement.

Reinforcement learning (RL) offers a robust framework for developing adaptive social robots capable of learning from interactions and improving over time [240]. RL approaches have been particularly effective in competitive human-robot interaction scenarios, where robots can challenge users to enhance their physical activity levels [237]. The competitive nature of these interactions not only increases motivation but also creates a more dynamic and engaging exercise environment. However, the application of RL in social robotics requires careful design of reward functions to ensure that the robot's behavior aligns with social norms and user expectations.

Personalization is another key factor in the effectiveness of social robots for exercise. A study on a social robot designed for post-stroke rehabilitation demonstrated the benefits of personalized feedback, which can significantly improve user engagement and therapeutic outcomes [241]. The integration of neural network models with rule-based systems allows for real-time assessment and corrective feedback, tailored to the individual's specific needs and abilities. This approach not only enhances the robot's effectiveness but also addresses the heterogeneity of physical conditions among users.

The role of social robots in motor training extends beyond physical assistance to include motivational and emotional support. A study comparing humanoid robots with traditional manipulandum devices found that participants who trained with a humanoid robot reported higher levels of motivation and enjoyment, despite similar performance outcomes [244]. This suggests that the social presence and interaction capabilities of humanoid robots can positively influence the training experience, making them valuable tools for promoting exercise adherence.

Persuasive strategies, such as those based on social power, can further enhance the effectiveness of social robots in promoting exercise [238]. By leveraging expert, reward, and coercion bases, robots can influence user behavior more effectively, particularly in contexts where compliance is crucial. However, the design of persuasive robots must balance the use of social power with user autonomy and satisfaction to avoid potential negative effects.

The design of social robots for exercise must also consider the broader context of human-robot interaction, including the robot's appearance, social capabilities, and relational roles [242]. A comprehensive framework for characterizing social robots highlights the importance of these dimensions in shaping user perceptions and interactions [242]. For instance, the robot's embodiment and social roles can significantly impact user engagement and satisfaction, particularly in exercise scenarios where physical and emotional factors are intertwined.

In conclusion, social robots have the potential to revolutionize the way exercise is promoted and managed among older adults. By leveraging advanced technologies such as RL, personalization, and persuasive strategies, these robots can create engaging, adaptive, and effective exercise environments. However, the design and deployment of social robots must carefully consider user preferences, technological capabilities, and the specific needs of the target population to ensure long-term success and acceptance.

### 4.8 User Feedback and Continuous Improvement

User feedback and continuous improvement are critical components in the development and deployment of age-friendly solutions, as they provide insights into the real-world effectiveness and usability of these technologies. The integration of user feedback into the continuous improvement cycle allows for iterative enhancements that address the specific needs and preferences of older adults, thereby ensuring that the solutions remain relevant and effective over time.

One of the primary challenges in leveraging user feedback is managing the continuous flow of data generated by frequent software updates and interactions. Traditional methods of requirements elicitation and validation are often insufficient in the context of continuous engineering, where the rapid pace of development necessitates more agile and responsive feedback mechanisms. The abundance of usage data and telemetry can provide valuable insights into end-user behavior, but the sheer volume of information can be overwhelming without the right tools and practices in place.

To address these challenges, organizations are increasingly adopting a combination of qualitative and quantitative methods to infer end-user preferences. However, the continuous collection, analysis, and interpretation of user feedback remain problematic, particularly in terms of selecting the right metrics and analysis techniques, resource allocation, and accessing vaguely defined user groups. Practitioners are advised to ensure sufficient resources and effort for the interpretation of feedback, which can be facilitated by telemetry dashboards.

In the context of age-friendly solutions, the ability to continually improve extractive question answering (QA) systems via human feedback is particularly relevant. Deploying an iterative approach where users provide feedback on model-predicted answers can lead to significant improvements in QA models over time. This approach not only enhances the accuracy of the system but also has the potential for domain adaptation, making it more versatile and applicable to a wider range of scenarios.

The automated processing of user feedback is another area where advancements can significantly impact the development of age-friendly solutions. With the increasing availability of user feedback from various sources such as social media, product forums, and app stores, there is a growing need for effective data mining, machine learning, and natural language processing techniques to manage the quantity and quality of feedback. Large Language Models (LLMs) can play a crucial role in this process by providing actionable insights that help software teams better understand user behavior, identify and fix defects, and inspire improvements or new features.

Continuous improvement in age-friendly solutions also involves the optimization of adaptive video streaming with human feedback. Quality of Experience (QoE)-driven adaptive bitrate (ABR) algorithms can be enhanced by leveraging reinforcement learning with human feedback (RLHF) technologies to better align with users' subjective perceptions. This approach considers the relative values of user ratings, which can lead to more accurate and personalized video streaming experiences that cater to the specific needs of older adults.

The integration of user feedback into the development process is not without its challenges. One of the key issues is the potential for overgeneralization when incorporating high-level verbal feedback. To avoid this, methods like Contextualized Critiques with Constrained Preference Optimization (C3PO) have been proposed, which generate synthetic preference datasets to fine-tune models without overgeneralizing the feedback. This approach ensures that the model adheres to the given feedback in relevant scenarios while preserving existing behaviors for other contexts.

In conclusion, user feedback and continuous improvement are essential for the development of effective and user-centric age-friendly solutions. By adopting a combination of qualitative and quantitative methods, leveraging advanced technologies like LLMs, and addressing the challenges of feedback management, organizations can create solutions that are not only technologically advanced but also highly responsive to the needs and preferences of older adults.

### 4.9 Evaluation Tools for Age-Appropriate Software

The evaluation of age-appropriate software is a multifaceted challenge that requires a robust set of tools and methodologies to ensure that digital solutions are both accessible and beneficial to older adults. This subsection critically analyzes and synthesizes the information from the provided references to offer a comprehensive understanding of the current state of evaluation tools for age-appropriate software.

One of the primary tools for assessing age-appropriateness is the evaluation tool developed through a Delphi study, as detailed in [276]. This tool, which exhibits strong internal reliability and content validity, provides a structured approach to evaluating software across three dimensions: user experience, product quality, and social promotion. The 16-item scale derived from this study offers a straightforward and objective mechanism for assessing software's suitability for different age groups, thereby guiding both the design and selection of age-appropriate software.

In contrast, [263] presents a methodology for deriving evaluation criteria tailored to specific industry contexts and domain knowledge. This approach, formalized as a three-layer model, ensures that the evaluation criteria are refined and individualized, starting from a general software-agnostic catalogue. This methodological rigor is particularly valuable in contexts where software solutions must align with specific company strategies and technical tasks, highlighting the importance of context-specific evaluations.

Usability evaluation is another critical aspect, as evidenced by [250], which introduces SUS-Lib, an automated tool for computing Software Usability Scale (SUS) scores. SUS-Lib addresses the need for user-friendly software that can be operated with basic knowledge of Python and command line tools, making it a cost-effective solution for various research setups. This tool's generic nature underscores the importance of usability in ensuring that software is accessible to a broad range of users, including older adults.

The challenges of usability evaluation with children, as explored in [257], highlight the need for specialized methods that account for the developmental differences between children and adults. This study emphasizes that relying on adult-tested methods is insufficient and that more nuanced approaches are required to ensure the usability of software for children. This insight is crucial for designing software that caters to diverse age groups, including older adults who may have unique usability needs.

The evaluation of software product quality metrics, as discussed in [270], provides a broader context for understanding the factors that contribute to software quality. This paper proposes a comprehensive study of metric values in the context of complex, open-source applications, aligning methodology and tooling with existing research to facilitate comparative evaluation. The longitudinal view captured in this study is particularly relevant for understanding how software quality evolves over time, which is essential for maintaining age-appropriate software.

The framework for determining app maturity levels using multimodal large language models, as presented in [275], offers a novel approach to assessing the suitability of software for children. This framework leverages ChatGPT-4 Vision to process multimodal app data and guide the model through a step-by-step reasoning pathway, resulting in more accurate maturity ratings. This method's success underscores the potential of advanced AI technologies in enhancing the evaluation of age-appropriate software.

The comprehensive model for age estimation, verification, and comparability introduced in [274] provides a robust solution for a wide range of applications. This model's advanced learning techniques and probabilistic age ranges enhance its ability to handle ambiguous cases, making it a valuable tool for evaluating software targeted at different age groups.

The CDUR procedure for evaluating research software, as outlined in [252], offers a structured approach to assessing the quality of research software. This protocol, which includes steps for citation, dissemination, use, and research, provides a comprehensive framework for evaluating the impact of research software. This approach is particularly relevant for understanding the long-term viability and impact of software designed for aging populations.

The review of software quality models in [267] highlights the importance of communication aspects in software quality. This perspective is crucial for designing software that is not only functional but also user-friendly and accessible to older adults. The classification of models into basic and tailored quality models provides a useful framework for understanding the evolution of software quality assessment.

The evaluation of software dependability measurement in [265] emphasizes the importance of measuring in-service software dependability. This focus on the operational aspects of software is essential for ensuring that software remains reliable and dependable over time, which is critical for age-appropriate software that must support older adults' needs over extended periods.

The study on the accuracy of underage facial age estimation in [266] provides insights into the factors influencing the accuracy of age estimation techniques. This research highlights the challenges of accurately estimating the age of minors, which is relevant for designing software that requires age verification. The findings underscore the need for robust and accurate age estimation methods to ensure the appropriateness of software for different age groups.

The proposal for different user interfaces in mobile operating systems for different age groups, as discussed in [259], offers a practical solution for making smartphones accessible to all age groups. This approach underscores the importance of designing software with specific user groups in mind, including older adults who may have unique interface needs.

The analysis of age-appropriate design criteria for video sharing and live streaming platforms in [272] provides actionable insights for developers. This study highlights the importance of age verification, parental controls, and transparency in ensuring that software is appropriate for children. The findings suggest that while some criteria provide adequate guidance, others require further clarification to ensure the safety and privacy of children.

The call to reflect on evaluation practices for age estimation in [254] challenges the reliability of published results and proposes a unified benchmark for comparative analysis. This paper's findings underscore the need for consistent and reliable evaluation protocols to ensure the accuracy of age estimation methods. The proposed FaRL model offers a promising solution for improving the accuracy of age estimation.

The user-centric evaluation of code generation tools in [268] provides a method for assessing the usability of large language models. This approach, which includes metadata in test cases and measures quality attributes based on user experiences, offers valuable insights for evaluating the usability of software tools, including those designed for older adults.

The state-of-the-practice release-readiness checklist for generative AI-based software products in [273] offers a comprehensive framework for evaluating the readiness of LLM-based applications. This checklist, which includes considerations for performance, monitoring, and deployment strategies, provides practical guidance for ensuring the reliability and effectiveness of AI-based software.

The evaluation of influencing factors on the accuracy of underage facial age estimation in [266] provides a comprehensive analysis of the performance of cloud age estimation services. This study identifies the most influential factors affecting the accuracy of age estimation, highlighting the challenges of developing robust and accurate age estimation systems.

The introduction of ToolSandbox in [251] provides a comprehensive evaluation framework for assessing the tool-use capabilities of large language models. This framework, which includes stateful tool execution and a built-in user simulator, offers valuable insights into the capabilities of AI models in solving real-world challenges.

The development of Prometheus 2, an open-source language model specialized in evaluating other language models, as described in [271], addresses the need for transparent and controllable evaluation tools. This model's ability to perform direct assessment and pairwise ranking, along with its high correlation with human and proprietary LM judges, underscores the potential of open-source evaluation tools in enhancing the reliability of AI-based software.

The decision support tool for assessing the maturity of software product line process in [269] provides a mechanism for evaluating the current maturity level of software processes. This tool, which implements a fuzzy logic approach to handle imprecise and uncertain variables, offers valuable insights for organizations seeking to improve their software development processes.

The study on the employability of older software developers in [253] highlights the importance of addressing ageism in the software industry. This research underscores the need for strategies to support the continued employability of older developers, including up-to-date skills, specialization, and role transitions.

The challenges in selecting software for reuse, as discussed in [256], emphasize the importance of predicting scientific impact in software selection. This perspective is relevant for understanding the long-term viability and impact of software designed for aging populations.

The systematic literature review on ethical software requirements from user reviews in [264] highlights the importance of identifying and eliciting ethical requirements in software development. This study underscores the need for ethical considerations in designing software that is safe, secure, and trustworthy, particularly for vulnerable populations such as older adults.

The survey on maintainability and evolvability of control software in machine and plant manufacturing in [255] provides insights into the challenges of maintaining and evolving software over long lifecycles. This research highlights the importance of flexible and reusable software that can be easily maintained and evolved, which is critical for software designed for aging populations.

The consideration of software validity as relative to the environment, as discussed in [262], emphasizes the importance of contextual factors in evaluating software quality. This perspective underscores the need for comprehensive and context-specific evaluations of software designed for different user groups, including older adults.

The binary-level software compatibility tool agreement study in [258] provides insights into the challenges of assessing application binary interface (ABI) compatibility. This research highlights the importance of tools that can predict compatibility and inform developers and users about potential issues, which is critical for ensuring the reliability and dependability of software over time.

The pilot software quality-in-use benchmark dataset in [261] offers a valuable resource for evaluating software quality-in-use models. This dataset, which was annotated by experts and reconciled to reduce bias, provides a foundation for developing and evaluating models that assess the quality of software from the user's perspective.

The validation requirements for AI-based intervention-evaluation in aging and longevity research in [260] highlight the importance of using AI tools responsibly in this field. This paper underscores the need for comprehensive, explainable, and context-specific evaluations of AI-based interventions, which is critical for ensuring the safety and effectiveness of software designed for older adults.

## 5 Challenges and Future Directions

### 5.1 Ethical and Societal Considerations

The integration of advanced technologies into age-friendly solutions necessitates a thorough examination of ethical and societal considerations. As human-robot interaction (HRI) and autonomous systems become more prevalent, addressing their ethical implications is crucial. The ethical challenges in HRI, as highlighted in [294], emphasize the need for a consensus on handling potential ethical issues in HRI research. These challenges serve as a foundation for broader discussions within the research community.

Responsible autonomy, discussed in [154], underscores the importance of integrating moral, societal, and legal values into AI technologies. This integration is vital during the design process and in the deliberation algorithms of these systems. The paper proposes alternative ways to ensure ethical behavior by artificial systems, recognizing the context-dependent and often implicit nature of ethics. Methodologies to elicit values from designers and stakeholders are essential for making these values explicit, fostering better understanding and trust in autonomous systems.

Deontic logic, explored in [280], provides a formal framework for ethical reasoning in multi-agent systems, validated using automated reasoning tools like Hyper. However, the complexity of ethical dilemmas and lack of consensus on solutions pose significant challenges. The "prismal view of ethics" in [295] offers a broader perspective, connecting ethics to games and introducing curiosity into the interplay between competing and coordinating entities. This analysis is a first step toward modeling aspects that could be used in AI ethics for integrating modern AI systems into human society.

The development of ethical architectures for robots, described in [289], involves surveying both regular adults and ethics experts to understand human ethical decision-making processes. The surveys reveal conservative attitudes toward deception in high-risk tasks, particularly when dealing with vulnerable populations, highlighting the need for a nuanced approach.

The analysis of ethical approaches in AI, presented in [292], distinguishes between meta-ethics, normative ethics, and applied ethics. The paper argues for a human ethics of AI based on a pragmatic practice of contextual ethics, irreducible to formalization or automated treatment.

Ethical and legal considerations of Information and Communication Technology (ICT), discussed in [279], emphasize addressing both positive and negative impacts on society. As ICT becomes increasingly integrated into various aspects of life, exploring ethical and legal uses of these technologies is crucial to mitigate potential harms.

The representation of humans' soft-ethical preferences as dispositions, proposed in [284], offers a novel approach to integrating ethical considerations into autonomous systems. By examining real-life scenarios involving ethical dilemmas, this approach aims to preserve users' soft-ethical preferences in interactions with autonomous systems.

The multi-party risk-benefit framework for online community research, introduced in [298], provides a structural framework for evaluating the flows of risks and benefits in social systems, impacting the governance of socio-technical systems and making research ethics discussions more commensurable.

The specification of agent ethics in [278] highlights the challenges of defining properties for Machine Ethics systems, particularly in the presence of ethical dilemmas with no agreed-upon solutions. The paper calls for a more systematic approach to this question.

Operationalizing AI ethics principles into practical AI/ML systems, discussed in [287], addresses the theory-practice gap by proposing a framework for managing tensions between underlying AI ethics aspects. This framework includes proactive identification of tensions, prioritization and weighting of ethics aspects, and justification and documentation of trade-off decisions.

The application of Multi-Criteria Decision Analysis (MCDA) to develop a formal Multi-Attribute Impact Assessment (MAIA) questionnaire for examining the social and ethical issues associated with the uptake of AI, described in [299], highlights the importance of addressing relevant social concerns to facilitate the responsible integration of AI systems in society.

The analysis of ethics codes in AI, presented in [277], reveals that these codes often elevate consumers while subordinating the needs of vulnerable populations. The concept of digital differential vulnerability is introduced to explain disproportionate exposures to harm within data technology.

Social deliberation vs. social contracts in self-governing voluntary organizations, discussed in [288], emphasizes the need for agents to be aware of their limitations and the value of compromise in self-organizing their social arrangements.

The examination of robotics rights and ethics rules in [291] underscores the importance of adhering to ethical and social influences when integrating AI systems into society. The paper discusses existing rules of machine and robot ethics and sets an example for the arrangements to be made in the new world order.

The ethical and social aspects of self-driving cars, explored in [293], argue for an applied engineering ethical approach focusing on the analysis of complex real-world engineering problems. This approach emphasizes the importance of software engineering solutions that handle ethical and social considerations.

The thinging schematization for ethical theories in [297] proposes a diagrammatic representation to model the process of making ethical decisions in software engineering, aiming to provide insights into behavior and thought for students and practitioners.

The interrogation of "tech ethics" in [283] highlights the importance of integrating ethics into digital technology research, development, use, and governance. The paper questions whose ethics are being centered and whether "ethics" is the appropriate frame for improving technology.

The multidimensional approach to the ethical implementation of AI in organizations, proposed in [282], combines ethics with regulation, innovation, and education. The approach emphasizes developing detailed ethical frameworks, incorporating ethics in the training of professionals, conducting ethical impact audits, and encouraging stakeholder participation in AI design.

The global landscape of ethics guidelines for AI, analyzed in [290], reveals a convergence around five ethical principles (transparency, justice and fairness, non-maleficence, responsibility, and privacy) with substantive divergence in interpretation and implementation.

The concept of moral behavior for automated vehicles, introduced in [285], argues for the need for research in this area and discusses relevant applications from machine ethics and moral modeling research.

The landscape of machine-implemented ethics, surveyed in [286], highlights the lack of consensus on which ethical theory is best suited for any particular domain and the challenges in validating these implementations.

The holistic approach to quantum ethics education, described in [296], provides an overview of the growing subfield of quantum ethics and introduces the Quantum Ethics Project (QEP). The paper outlines the pedagogical approach being taken in the course design, including key learning outcomes, topic areas, teaching methods, and rationale.

The introduction to ethics in the age of digital communication in [281] provides a brief overview of applied ethics and observes ethics in contemporary professional practice from practical, research, and theoretical perspectives. The paper discusses the impact of emerging technology on these changes.

In conclusion, the development and deployment of age-friendly solutions require a multidisciplinary approach that integrates moral, societal, and legal values with technological advancements. This approach must consider the context-dependent nature of ethics, the limitations of formalization, and the importance of stakeholder participation in the design and implementation of ethical frameworks.

### 5.2 Technological Barriers and Limitations

The integration of advanced technologies into age-friendly solutions presents both opportunities and challenges, particularly in overcoming technological barriers and limitations. One of the primary challenges is the inherent limitations in the language and logic of the Subject-Observer, which can impede the accurate representation and understanding of complex systems [308]. This epistemological barrier is particularly relevant in the development of technologies aimed at enhancing the quality of life for older adults, where nuanced understanding and precise communication are crucial.

Technological barriers in the deployment and operation of 5G networks, as highlighted in [302], pose significant challenges for the implementation of age-friendly solutions. The configuration, deployment, and operation of a 5G network are complex processes that require sophisticated infrastructure and expertise. These challenges are further compounded by the need for continuous experimentation and adaptation to meet the diverse and often specialized needs of older adults. The limitations in existing open-source systems and commercial equipment portfolios also hinder the development of tailored solutions that can effectively address the unique requirements of this demographic.

The diverse requirements of 5G-driven applications, as discussed in [313], further complicate the development of age-friendly technologies. While some applications may require low latency for real-time interactions, others may prioritize high bandwidth for data-intensive tasks. This variability necessitates a flexible network architecture capable of dynamically adapting to fluctuating traffic patterns and accommodating various technologies such as edge computing and virtualization. The challenge lies in developing a unified framework that can seamlessly integrate these diverse technologies to meet the specific needs of older adults.

Socio-technological challenges, as outlined in [307], underscore the need for inclusive and sustainable technological solutions. The rapid pace of technological innovation has led to significant economic growth and increased access to information, but it has also created disparities in access and utilization. For age-friendly solutions to be effective, they must be designed with the physical, cultural, and economic diversity of older adults in mind. This requires a cross-disciplinary approach that prioritizes pervasive connectivity, sustainability, and demographic inclusion.

The evolving nature of 5G cellular networks, as described in [304], introduces new research challenges that impact the development of age-friendly technologies. The envisioned higher data rates, enhanced quality-of-experience, reduced latency, and lower energy consumption necessitate the integration of emerging technologies such as millimeter Wave, Massive-MIMO, and smarter devices. These technologies, while promising, also introduce new complexities and challenges that must be addressed to ensure their effective deployment in age-friendly solutions.

Education 5.0, as explored in [314], represents a paradigm shift in leveraging digital technologies to eliminate barriers to learning and enhance overall well-being. However, the integration of these technologies into educational settings for older adults presents its own set of challenges. The need for ongoing research, collaboration, and innovation in the field is paramount to address the ethical considerations and ensure the effective implementation of Education 5.0 in age-friendly contexts.

Regulatory and technical challenges in the 5.9 GHz spectrum, as analyzed in [300], further complicate the development of age-friendly solutions. The interoperability between DSRC and C-V2X in the ITS spectrum, along with the detection and avoidance of harmful interference, presents significant technical hurdles. These challenges must be addressed to ensure the safe and effective deployment of technologies that enhance mobility and connectivity for older adults.

The limitations and risks associated with large language models (LLMs), as discussed in [315], highlight the need for a critical approach to the development and deployment of AI technologies in age-friendly solutions. The potential harms and risks arising from these limitations underscore the importance of transparency and ethical considerations in the design and implementation of AI-driven technologies for older adults.

The impact of 5G on data management and edge computing, as examined in [309], presents both opportunities and challenges for age-friendly technologies. The increased bandwidth and reduced latency enabled by 5G have the potential to revolutionize the delivery of healthcare and other services to older adults. However, the research challenges and opportunities associated with these advancements must be carefully navigated to ensure their effective integration into age-friendly solutions.

The disruptive technologies identified in [310], such as device-centric architectures and millimeter Wave, offer promising avenues for the development of age-friendly solutions. However, the research challenges associated with these technologies must be addressed to ensure their successful integration and deployment in enhancing the quality of life for older adults.

The physical and technological limitations in the software design of the digital era, as discussed in [305], highlight the intrinsic bounds to technological knowledge. These limitations must be considered in the development of age-friendly solutions to ensure that progress is sustainable and beneficial for older adults.

The challenges in integrating technology into education, as outlined in [306], are particularly relevant in the context of age-friendly solutions. The insufficiency of in-service and pre-service training, content support, and incentive systems pose significant barriers to the effective integration of technology into educational settings for older adults. Addressing these challenges is crucial to ensuring the successful implementation of age-friendly technologies in education.

The cybersecurity challenges in Industry 5.0, as analyzed in [301], underscore the importance of robust cybersecurity measures in the development of age-friendly solutions. The potential threats and corresponding countermeasures must be carefully considered to ensure the secure adoption of Industry 5.0 principles in enhancing the quality of life for older adults.

The recognition, exploration, and articulation of limitations in machine learning research, as discussed in [303], highlight the need for transparency and rigor in the development of AI-driven age-friendly solutions. The REAL ML framework provides a valuable tool for addressing these challenges and ensuring the appropriate interpretation of research findings.

The ultimate physical limits to computation, as explored in [311], underscore the need for a holistic approach to the development of age-friendly technologies. The quantitative bounds on computational power must be considered in the design and implementation of technologies that enhance the quality of life for older adults.

The guidelines for 5G end-to-end architecture and security issues, as provided in [312], are essential for ensuring the security of 5G networks in the context of age-friendly solutions. The comprehensive understanding of the 5G architecture and potential security concerns is crucial for the effective deployment of technologies that enhance the quality of life for older adults.

### 5.3 User-Centric Design and Accessibility

User-centric design and accessibility are critical components in the development of age-friendly solutions, ensuring that technologies and services are inclusive and meet the diverse needs of older adults. The integration of user-centric design principles into the development process is essential for creating solutions that are not only functional but also intuitive and accessible to all users, including those with varying levels of digital literacy and physical abilities.

Cultural differences significantly shape user preferences and interaction methods, as highlighted in [319]. This paper emphasizes the importance of considering cultural contexts when designing digital solutions, particularly in relation to accessibility. The global nature of technology necessitates that accessibility guidelines and resources, often developed in Western contexts, be adapted to fit the diverse cultural practices and expectations of users worldwide. This adaptability is crucial for ensuring that digital solutions are truly inclusive and meet the specific needs of older adults in different regions.

The discussion on human-centric issues in software development, as presented in [318], underscores the importance of considering the characteristics, limitations, and abilities of diverse end-users during the development process. The paper identifies eight categories of human-centric issues, including accessibility, which are frequently discussed by developers on platforms like GitHub. This highlights the ongoing challenges in creating software that is inclusive and accessible to all users, including older adults. The findings suggest that a more comprehensive understanding of these issues is needed to design software that better meets the diverse needs of end-users.

User-centered design methodologies, such as those discussed in [173], emphasize the importance of fulfilling user requirements and needs through iterative design processes. This approach contrasts with traditional waterfall methodologies, which may not adequately address user needs and usability issues. By involving users in the design and evaluation process, user-centered methodologies ensure that the final product is more intuitive and accessible, particularly for older adults who may have varying levels of technical proficiency.

The integration of accessibility into software development is a multifaceted challenge, as evidenced by [321]. This paper reports on a study that reveals substantial gaps between practitioners' direct and indirect experiences with accessibility. These gaps can hinder the quality of accessibility development and design, underscoring the need for guidelines and best practices that raise awareness of accessibility challenges and benefits. The study also proposes remedies to address these gaps, highlighting the importance of continuous education and training for developers.

Emerging technologies, such as those discussed in [317], offer promising avenues for enhancing accessibility through ambient multimodality. This approach leverages advancements in ambient intelligence and ubiquitous computing to create more inclusive and user-friendly environments. By designing new interaction modalities and flexible multimodal user interfaces, these technologies can facilitate easier access to computing resources and information services for older adults, including those with physical disabilities.

In the context of autonomous vehicles, [320] emphasizes the importance of user-centered design principles to ensure that in-vehicle human-computer interaction (HCI) systems are inclusive and accessible. The paper proposes an end-to-end design framework that considers the needs of all passengers, including those with disabilities. This framework underscores the need for inclusive design to ensure that all users can safely and comfortably use autonomous vehicles.

The concept of "User Experience 3.0" (UX 3.0) as proposed in [316] and [322] represents a paradigm shift in user experience design, particularly in the context of intelligent systems. This framework introduces new categories of experiences, such as AI-enabled and human-AI interaction-based experiences, which are essential for designing human-centered AI systems. The UX 3.0 paradigm emphasizes the importance of balancing manual and automatic control, ensuring that users remain comfortable and in control of their interactions with intelligent systems.

Finally, the importance of clear, concise, and effective user interfaces (UI) is highlighted in [173]. A well-designed UI is crucial for ensuring that older adults can navigate and utilize digital solutions with ease. The paper provides suggestions for designing UIs that are robust, concise, and lucid, making it easier for users to access system features and for developers to guide users towards better utilization of the features.

In conclusion, user-centric design and accessibility are integral to the development of age-friendly solutions. By considering cultural contexts, integrating user-centered methodologies, addressing human-centric issues, leveraging emerging technologies, and designing clear and effective UIs, developers can create digital solutions that are inclusive, intuitive, and accessible to older adults.

### 5.4 Economic and Financial Constraints

Economic and financial constraints pose significant challenges to the development and implementation of age-friendly solutions. These constraints are multifaceted, encompassing issues such as borrowing limitations, financial market dynamics, and the interplay between economic forces and physical constraints. By applying theoretical frameworks from both economics and physics, researchers can gain a more nuanced understanding of these challenges and their implications for age-friendly initiatives.

One critical aspect of economic constraints is the impact of borrowing limitations on households and firms. Financially constrained households often exhibit different preferences and behaviors compared to their unconstrained counterparts. This has profound implications for age-friendly solutions, suggesting that interventions aimed at improving the financial well-being of older adults must account for the extensive margin of financial constraints. For instance, policies that provide financial support or access to credit for older adults may need to be tailored to address specific constraints such as limited collateral or low cash flow.

The interplay between economic forces and physical constraints is another key area of concern. Economic constraints can be formalized and modeled using analogies from classical mechanics, allowing for a more dynamic and out-of-equilibrium understanding of economic systems. For example, the differential-algebraic equation framework of General Constrained Dynamics (GCD) can be used to model the impact of austerity measures or financial shocks on older adults, providing a more realistic representation of how these forces interact and evolve over time.

Emerging markets face unique borrowing constraints that can exacerbate economic challenges for older adults. A significant portion of firms' debt in emerging markets is based on cash flows rather than collateralized assets. This suggests that financial interventions in these markets should focus on improving cash flow stability rather than collateral-based lending. Additionally, the greater amplification of foreign interest rate shocks in emerging markets underscores the need for more robust financial systems and policies that can mitigate the impact of external economic shocks on older adults.

The application of physics-based models to economic problems also offers insights into the dynamics of financial risks and economic growth. Dynamic theories of production and distribution can be applied to understand the impact of financial risks on economic growth, particularly in the context of the COVID-19 pandemic. These models can help policymakers design age-friendly solutions that account for the dynamic and often unstable nature of financial markets, ensuring that interventions are both timely and effective.

Furthermore, the concept of financial entropy provides a framework for understanding the complex and often unpredictable nature of financial systems. By applying conservation laws and entropy measures to financial markets, researchers can gain insights into the stability and resilience of economic systems, which is crucial for designing age-friendly solutions that can withstand financial shocks and uncertainties.

In conclusion, economic and financial constraints are significant barriers to the development and implementation of age-friendly solutions. By leveraging theoretical frameworks from both economics and physics, researchers and policymakers can gain a deeper understanding of these constraints and develop more effective interventions. This interdisciplinary approach not only enhances our theoretical understanding but also provides practical guidance for designing age-friendly solutions that are resilient, equitable, and sustainable.

### 5.5 Policy and Regulatory Frameworks

Policy and regulatory frameworks are pivotal in shaping the development and implementation of age-friendly solutions, but they often struggle to keep pace with rapid technological advancements and theoretical innovations. The evolving landscape of technology, including 5G networks, autonomous systems, and data privacy, demands a dynamic and adaptive regulatory environment capable of addressing both current and future needs.

A significant challenge is ensuring security and trust in decentralized systems, such as 5G marketplaces. These frameworks must select reliable third-party providers based on their history and reputation, while incorporating mechanisms for continuous trust score updates in response to security events. Such frameworks are essential for fostering a secure and trustworthy environment, critical for the adoption of age-friendly technologies that rely on multi-party collaborations.

Regulating data protection and privacy, especially in the context of global data flows and advanced technologies like AI, presents another major issue. Current frameworks often fail to balance human rights protection with the need for flexible policy-making. A new approach linking data protection regulations to outcomes and rights, rather than specific data or tools, is needed. This would allow for differential protections based on genuinely high-risk use cases, addressing potential over- or under-regulation.

The intersection of authorization and obligation policies adds further complexity. Frameworks that detect inconsistencies, underspecifications, and ambiguities in policies, particularly when they intersect with obligations, are crucial. Real-time refinement and adaptation of policies ensure age-friendly solutions can respond to changing contexts without compromising security or privacy.

Governance of autonomous and intelligent systems (AIS) requires innovative approaches. The rapid development and deployment of AIS often outpace current governance infrastructures, leading to ethical and legal oversight gaps. A practical multilevel governance framework can map actors onto different decision-making levels and identify governance mechanisms to shape and enforce regulations.

In cybersecurity, transitioning from Industry 4.0 to Industry 5.0 necessitates a new framework prioritizing robust security measures while addressing societal issues. Existing industrial frameworks are inadequate for ensuring a secure transition, highlighting the need for a cybersecurity-centered approach.

Regulatory challenges are compounded by cultural, regulatory, and technical aspects in global system development. Different countries have varying regulations and cultural restrictions, leading to non-compliance, contradictions, and redundancies in requirements specifications. A formal framework for analyzing and optimizing these requirements is necessary for successful deployment of age-friendly solutions across diverse contexts.

Decentralization of regulatory frameworks, particularly in decentralized autonomous organizations (DAOs), is increasingly important. Assessing decentralization in DAOs involves multiple dimensions, including token-weighted voting, infrastructure, governance, escalation, and reputation. A framework for this assessment can help regulators determine when a DAO is sufficiently decentralized to warrant reduced compliance burdens.

In conclusion, developing policy and regulatory frameworks for age-friendly solutions requires a synthesis of theoretical insights and technological advancements. These frameworks must be adaptable, dynamic, and capable of addressing the complexities and interdependencies inherent in modern technological systems, facilitating the secure, ethical, and effective deployment of age-friendly technologies for an aging population.

### 5.6 Interdisciplinary Collaboration and Knowledge Gaps

Interdisciplinary collaboration is essential for addressing the complex challenges of age-friendly solutions, yet it is fraught with significant obstacles and knowledge gaps. The inherent complexities of interdisciplinary research, such as bridging cognitive gaps and balancing transaction costs with collaborative benefits, raise critical questions about the effectiveness of such collaborations. Studies have shown that the diversity of individual researchers' experiences often contributes more to interdisciplinarity than the diversity within collaborative teams. This suggests that fostering individual researchers' exposure to multiple disciplines may be more impactful than merely assembling diverse teams.

The success of interdisciplinary collaborations is also influenced by the nature of team formation and the extent of intergroup mixing. Active researchers who participate in multiple teams exhibit higher academic performance and experience, indicating that intergroup mixing is a key factor in academic success. This finding underscores the importance of creating environments that encourage cross-disciplinary interactions and the sharing of diverse research experiences.

Identifying and measuring interdisciplinarity remains a significant challenge. Traditional methods often rely on disciplinary classifications of co-authors, but these may not fully capture the nuances of interdisciplinary collaboration. Innovative bibliometric approaches, such as those based on the disciplinary affiliation of publication co-authors, can provide a more granular understanding of interdisciplinary interactions. These methods can help inform research policies and management strategies by identifying fields with high potential for interdisciplinary collaboration.

Agent-based models offer another perspective on interdisciplinary interactions, revealing how individual researcher decisions and preferences impact global interdisciplinarity patterns. These models suggest that the organization of research, particularly the balance between vertical and horizontal research, significantly influences the extent of interdisciplinary knowledge integration. This insight has direct applications to research policies, particularly those aimed at fostering bottom-up interdisciplinary interactions.

Characterizing interdisciplinary knowledge flow is another critical aspect of understanding and promoting interdisciplinary research. A contextual framework that considers broadness, intensity, and homogeneity of knowledge exchange can provide a more holistic view of interdisciplinarity. This framework can be applied at both disciplinary and journal levels to uncover different forms of interdisciplinarity and inform science policy practices.

Interdisciplinary research collaborations are often supported through specific funding programs, but there is no universally accepted method for selecting and evaluating such research. Programs that support networks formed through bottom-up integration of expertise from different disciplines have shown success in fostering interdisciplinary synergies. These programs highlight the potential for interdisciplinary collaboration across all disciplines and the need for tailored evaluation methods.

Barriers to interdisciplinary research, such as cognitive and institutional silos, must be addressed to facilitate effective collaboration. Understanding these barriers and developing mechanisms to remove them is crucial for promoting interdisciplinary research. Case studies, such as those in convergent research areas like biology, computer science, engineering, and chemistry, can provide insights into potential solutions.

The impact of interdisciplinary research teams on scientific gains is a subject of ongoing debate. Studies have shown that interdisciplinary collaborations can lead to higher citation impact, particularly when authors from different fields collaborate. However, the benefits are not uniformly distributed, and the nature of interdisciplinary collaboration varies significantly across disciplines.

Collaborative knowledge networks and their emergence for innovation are influenced by various factors, including the balance between formalism and social networks. These networks are essential for maintaining group coherence and ensuring effective information exchange, particularly in virtual collaboration environments.

Knowledge gaps in interdisciplinary research are a significant concern, as they can hinder effective problem-solving and decision-making. Identifying and addressing these gaps is crucial for fostering interdisciplinary collaboration and ensuring that research outputs are comprehensive and impactful.

In conclusion, interdisciplinary collaboration in age-friendly solutions requires a multifaceted approach that addresses cognitive gaps, fosters individual and team diversity, and leverages innovative methods for measuring and promoting interdisciplinary interactions. By understanding and addressing the challenges and knowledge gaps in interdisciplinary research, we can develop more effective and comprehensive age-friendly solutions.

### 5.7 Future Research Directions

Future research directions in age-friendly solutions must be guided by a synthesis of theoretical advancements and technological innovations. The ability to forecast scientific trends, as demonstrated in [161], is crucial for identifying emerging areas of focus that can be applied to age-friendly technologies. Predicting these trends five years in advance can help researchers and funding bodies prioritize areas that are likely to yield significant breakthroughs in improving the quality of life for older adults.

Technological disruptions, such as those outlined in [310] for 5G networks, offer a blueprint for how future research can lead to fundamental changes in the design of age-friendly systems. Device-centric architectures, millimeter Wave technology, Massive-MIMO, smarter devices, and native support for machine-to-machine communication are all areas that could be adapted to create more responsive and efficient age-friendly solutions. For instance, smarter devices could be developed to monitor and assist older adults in their daily activities, while native support for machine-to-machine communication could facilitate seamless integration of various assistive technologies.

The integration of artificial intelligence (AI) into age-friendly solutions, as discussed in [347], presents a promising avenue for research. AI can optimize network performance, allocate resources efficiently, and enhance the physical layer of communication systems, all of which are critical for the development of reliable and effective age-friendly technologies. Research should focus on identifying specific AI applications that can address the unique needs of older adults, such as predictive analytics for health monitoring or personalized communication systems that cater to cognitive decline.

Addressing the challenges of finite density and color superconductivity in QCD, as briefly reviewed in [346], can provide insights into the development of more robust and resilient age-friendly systems. Understanding these complex phenomena can inspire new materials and technologies that are better suited to withstand the physical and environmental stresses that older adults may encounter.

The development of new research facilities, such as the one described in [164], can also play a crucial role in advancing age-friendly solutions. High-altitude locations with exceptional atmospheric conditions are ideal for conducting long-term studies and experiments that can inform the design of technologies tailored to the needs of older adults. These facilities can serve as hubs for interdisciplinary research, bringing together experts from various fields to collaborate on innovative solutions.

Moreover, the Global Environment for Network Innovations (GENI) infrastructure, as envisioned in [350], offers a model for creating distributed research infrastructures that can support the development of age-friendly solutions. By enabling new types of research and discoveries, such infrastructures can facilitate the rapid prototyping and testing of new technologies, ensuring that they are both effective and user-friendly.

The analysis of future works in scientific articles, as conducted in [349], highlights the importance of mining and categorizing future research directions. This approach can guide researchers towards new ideas and areas of exploration that are likely to yield significant advancements in age-friendly technologies. By systematically analyzing the future works sections of scientific papers, researchers can identify emerging trends and prioritize their efforts accordingly.

Finally, the recommendations for enhancing career prospects and fostering diversity among early-career researchers, as outlined in [348], are essential for ensuring that the field of age-friendly solutions benefits from a diverse and inclusive research community. By supporting early-career researchers and promoting diversity, the field can draw on a wider range of perspectives and ideas, leading to more innovative and effective solutions for older adults.

In conclusion, future research directions in age-friendly solutions should be guided by a combination of theoretical advancements, technological innovations, and strategic investments in research infrastructure. By leveraging the insights from various scientific fields and fostering a diverse and inclusive research community, the field can continue to make significant strides in improving the lives of older adults.

### 5.8 Sustainable and Responsible Innovation

Sustainable and responsible innovation in the context of age-friendly solutions is a multifaceted challenge that requires a nuanced understanding of both ethical considerations and technological advancements. The integration of ethics and sustainability into innovation processes is crucial for the long-term viability and acceptance of age-friendly technologies. This subsection critically analyzes the interplay between ethical considerations, technological innovation, and sustainability, drawing on insights from various fields.

Ethical considerations in innovation are paramount, particularly in the context of emerging technologies like artificial intelligence (AI). [353] highlights the need for organizations to cultivate innovation cultures that are not only technologically advanced but also ethically sound. This involves adopting systems thinking approaches to ensure that innovations are developed with a holistic view of their potential impacts on society and the environment. For instance, AI-driven solutions aimed at enhancing the quality of life for older adults must be designed with considerations for privacy, autonomy, and inclusivity.

Sustainability in innovation is not merely about environmental impact but also about ensuring that innovations contribute positively to social and economic development. [356] underscores the importance of identifying actionable levers of innovation that can drive sustainable development. This involves understanding the factors that make a country or organization innovative and tailoring policies and strategies to enhance these factors. In the context of age-friendly solutions, this could mean fostering innovations that not only address the immediate needs of older adults but also contribute to broader societal goals such as reducing healthcare costs and promoting social inclusion.

The role of stakeholders in sustainable innovation cannot be overstated. [354] emphasizes the interdependencies between stakeholders in the development and transformation of business models for sustainability. This is particularly relevant in the context of age-friendly solutions, where multiple stakeholders—including healthcare providers, technology developers, policymakers, and older adults themselves—must collaborate to ensure that innovations are both effective and sustainable. The use of tools like the actor dependency model can help in understanding these interdependencies and in designing more resilient and inclusive solutions.

Responsible AI (RAI) is a critical component of sustainable innovation, especially given the transformative potential and ethical challenges posed by AI technologies. [357] introduces the concept of AI Sustainability, which involves ensuring that AI projects are responsive to their long-term impacts on society. This requires a values-led approach that guides the assessment of potential social and ethical impacts and steers responsible innovation practices. The SUM Values framework and the Stakeholder Engagement Process (SEP) presented in [357] provide practical tools for AI project teams to ensure that their projects are both ethically permissible and socially beneficial.

The integration of sustainability considerations into AI regulation is another critical aspect of responsible innovation. [355] argues for a robust regulatory discourse that addresses the environmental sustainability of AI technologies. This involves not only transparency mechanisms but also more comprehensive regulatory tools such as sustainability-by-design principles and consumption caps. Such regulatory frameworks are essential for ensuring that AI innovations do not exacerbate environmental challenges but instead contribute to sustainable development.

In the context of age-friendly solutions, the responsible and sustainable development of AI technologies must also consider the unique needs and vulnerabilities of older adults. [351] proposes a human-centered framework for responsible AI implementation that emphasizes trust and stakeholder engagement. This framework is particularly relevant for age-friendly solutions, where the successful adoption of AI technologies depends on the trust and active participation of older adults.

Finally, the role of interdisciplinary collaboration in sustainable and responsible innovation cannot be overlooked. [352] highlights the importance of multidisciplinary approaches in RAI research, which often incorporate knowledge from diverse fields. This interdisciplinary nature is crucial for addressing the complex challenges associated with age-friendly solutions, where technological, social, and ethical considerations must be integrated.

In conclusion, sustainable and responsible innovation in the context of age-friendly solutions requires a holistic approach that integrates ethical considerations, stakeholder engagement, and interdisciplinary collaboration. By adopting such an approach, we can ensure that the innovations we develop not only address the immediate needs of older adults but also contribute to broader societal goals of sustainability and social justice.

### 5.9 Community and Caregiver Involvement

In the context of age-friendly solutions, community and caregiver involvement is crucial for the successful implementation and sustainability of these initiatives. The role of communities and caregivers in enhancing the quality of life for older adults extends beyond mere support; it encompasses active participation, mutual assistance, and the creation of inclusive environments. This subsection critically analyzes the theoretical and technological approaches that facilitate community and caregiver involvement, synthesizing insights from the provided references.

The concept of community membership life cycles, as discussed in [359], is particularly relevant. This model describes the roles users can take within a community, from newcomers to leaders, and how these roles evolve over time. Applying this model to age-friendly communities, it becomes evident that older adults can transition through various roles, from passive recipients of care to active participants in community activities. This transition is essential for fostering a sense of belonging and collective efficacy, as highlighted in [364], where caregivers reported higher levels of community trust and belonging when using a mobile app for community oversight.

Technological solutions, such as mobile apps and online platforms, play a significant role in facilitating community and caregiver involvement. The use of such technologies can enhance the efficiency and effectiveness of caregiving, as demonstrated in [364], where caregivers and caregivees both experienced increased self-efficacy and collective efficacy for managing mobile privacy and security. Moreover, these technologies can bridge the gap between formal and informal care systems, allowing for more integrated and coordinated care.

The framework of value exchange and role playing in Web 2.0 websites, as proposed in [363], provides a useful lens for understanding the motivations and behaviors of community members. In age-friendly communities, the values exchanged can range from social support and emotional well-being to practical assistance and information sharing. The roles adopted by community members, such as newcomers, lurkers, and leaders, influence the dynamics of value exchange and the overall health of the community.

Community-based approaches to health care, as advocated in [358], emphasize the importance of elder participation in group activities. The "participant" model, where older adults actively engage in healthcare processes, not only conserves medical resources but also enhances social networks and psychological well-being. This approach aligns with the principles of ambient assisted living (AAL), as discussed in [11], which highlights the need for human participation to make AAL systems effective.

The dynamics of peer support in online health communities, as studied in [361], reveal patterns of mutual support connections between patients and caregivers. These connections are more likely to form and be more interactive when individuals share the same role, suggesting that role-based interventions could enhance peer support networks. Additionally, the study in [362] highlights the importance of instrumental and prayer support in online health communities, indicating that a broader range of support types should be considered in age-friendly solutions.

The integration of chronic disease management with existing acute healthcare systems, as mentioned in [5], underscores the need for comprehensive and coordinated care. This integration requires the active involvement of communities and caregivers, who can provide valuable insights and support for older adults managing chronic conditions. The role of community citizen science (CCS) in promoting social good, as discussed in [360], also suggests that older adults can contribute to scientific knowledge and community well-being through active participation.

In conclusion, community and caregiver involvement in age-friendly solutions is multifaceted, requiring a blend of theoretical models, technological innovations, and practical interventions. By leveraging the roles and behaviors of community members, enhancing the efficiency of caregiving through technology, and fostering active participation, we can create more inclusive and supportive environments for older adults.

### 5.10 Evaluating Effectiveness and Impact

Evaluating the effectiveness and impact of age-friendly solutions is a multifaceted challenge that requires a nuanced approach to ensure that the outcomes align with the goals and objectives set forth. The literature provides a range of methodologies and frameworks for assessing the impact of various interventions, each with its own strengths and limitations.

One approach to evaluating the impact of workshops, which are often used to disseminate knowledge and foster community engagement, is outlined in [382]. This paper proposes ten simple rules for measuring the impact of workshops, emphasizing the need for clear objectives, participant feedback, and follow-up assessments. By adhering to these rules, stakeholders can better understand whether workshops are meeting their intended goals and how they can be improved.

For more structured interventions, such as policy evaluations, [374] introduces flexible methods for assessing causal effects. These methods include randomized controlled trials, quasi-experimental designs, and machine learning approaches to control for confounding variables. The flexibility of these methods allows for a tailored evaluation that can adapt to the specific context and data availability, ensuring a more robust assessment of the intervention's impact.

Performance metrics are crucial for quantitatively evaluating the achievement of objectives and expected outcomes, as highlighted in [393]. This paper provides a comprehensive framework for designing and implementing performance metrics, emphasizing the importance of data collection, interpretation, and presentation. By establishing clear performance metrics, stakeholders can more effectively monitor progress and make informed decisions.

The end-to-end evaluation of research organizations, as discussed in [365], involves separating bibliometric and econometric components. This approach allows for a more nuanced understanding of performance, considering both size-dependent and size-independent indicators. By evaluating performance at various levels, from zeroth-order to second-order, stakeholders can gain a more comprehensive view of the organization's impact.

The Multidimensional Assessment of Scholarly Research Impact, as described in [366], emphasizes the need for a matrix that considers the unit of assessment, research dimension, and policy context. This approach highlights the importance of selecting appropriate metrics based on the specific context, rather than relying on a one-size-fits-all approach. By using a variety of metrics, stakeholders can obtain a more holistic view of the research impact.

Quantitative characterization of components in interventions, such as computer-assisted surgeries, is addressed in [385]. This paper proposes a mathematical framework for weighting the impact of heterogeneous components, allowing for a more precise evaluation of the intervention's effectiveness. By rating surgical events by their importance, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about the acceptance or rejection of certain procedures.

The discipline of evaluatology, as introduced in [371], provides a universal framework for evaluation that encompasses concepts, terminologies, theories, and methodologies. This framework emphasizes the importance of conducting experiments to measure the impact of different subjects, creating evaluation conditions with different levels of equivalency, and establishing reference evaluation models. By applying this framework, stakeholders can ensure a more consistent and rigorous evaluation process.

Measuring impact in research evaluations is a complex task, as discussed in [372]. This paper highlights the challenges associated with impact measurement, including issues of inequality, random chance, and unpredictability. By being aware of these challenges, stakeholders can better interpret bibliometric results and make more informed decisions.

Model-based evaluation of scientific impact indicators, as outlined in [370], uses bibliometric data generated through a model of citation dynamics to compare various indicators. This approach allows for a more controlled evaluation, avoiding biases present in real databases. By using this framework, stakeholders can assess which aspects of the model dynamics and individual researchers a particular indicator reflects.

Quantifying success in science, as reviewed in [387], plays a key role in guiding funding allocations and recruitment decisions. This paper categorizes and reviews current developments in evaluation indices, including paper impact, scholar impact, and journal impact. By understanding the strengths and limitations of these indices, stakeholders can make more informed decisions.

Organizational effectiveness, as discussed in [389], proposes a new strategy for leveraging multisite randomized trials to assess organizational effectiveness. This approach contrasts the performance of a focal organization with those that share similar local ecological conditions, providing a more accurate assessment of effectiveness. By using this strategy, stakeholders can avoid misclassifications and make more equitable decisions.

Usage Impact Factor, as defined in [377], reflects the particular scientific and demographic characteristics of a community. This paper highlights the importance of considering the context when evaluating impact, rather than relying on a single, global measure. By using community-specific assessments, stakeholders can obtain a more nuanced understanding of impact.

Evaluating heuristics for iterative impact analysis, as discussed in [383], focuses on guiding developers to find actual impacted units and decide when the estimated impact is complete. This paper emphasizes the importance of precision and recall in impact analysis, providing a framework for assessing the effectiveness of different heuristics.

Evaluation for change, as argued in [392], highlights the sociological and political dimensions of evaluation. This paper emphasizes the power of evaluation as a force for driving change, advocating for a more aggressive harnessing of evaluation to achieve desired outcomes. By framing evaluation as a force, stakeholders can better understand its potential and limitations.

Promoting target models by potential measures, as outlined in [378], introduces a concrete potential measure for evaluating target models. This approach allows for a more automated evaluation of many different models, providing insights into improvement potential and supporting stretched targets. By using this measure, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about model selection.

Efficiency of research performance, as discussed in [367], emphasizes the importance of measuring scientific efficiency. This paper advocates for the use of size-independent indicators to measure citation impact, providing a more accurate assessment of research performance. By focusing on efficiency, stakeholders can better understand the impact of their research.

Assessment Model for Opportunistic Routing, as proposed in [375], provides an evaluation guideline with performance metrics and experimental setup. This paper emphasizes the importance of fair comparisons when evaluating solutions, providing a framework for assessing the effectiveness of different approaches. By using this model, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about routing strategies.

Evaluating the Capabilities of LLMs for Supporting Anticipatory Impact Assessment, as discussed in [368], highlights the potential of large language models (LLMs) for generating high-quality and diverse impacts. This paper emphasizes the importance of examining the general quality and range of impacts produced by LLMs, providing insights into their potential for supporting anticipatory governance. By using LLMs, stakeholders can better anticipate and mitigate the negative impacts of emerging technologies.

Impacts Towards a Comprehensive Assessment of the Book Impact, as outlined in [369], integrates multiple evaluation sources to assess book impact. This paper emphasizes the importance of using multiple evaluation data to obtain a more comprehensive view of book impact. By integrating internal and external evaluation resources, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about book selection.

Program Controls Effectiveness Measurement Framework & Metrics, as proposed in [391], provides a structured approach to defining a controls measurement framework and creation of effectiveness metrics. This paper highlights the importance of measuring control effectiveness, providing a framework for ensuring a zero-defect program. By using this approach, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about program controls.

A Consistent Multi-User Framework for Assessing System Performance, as discussed in [380], presents a mathematical framework for assessing performance in various applications. This paper emphasizes the importance of considering multiple aspects of performance and user requirements, providing a framework for making reliable assessments. By using this approach, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about system selection.

Reactive Synthesis for Expected Impacts, as outlined in [373], introduces a formal extension of the Business Process Model and Notation (BPMN) that incorporates choices, probabilities, and impacts. This paper emphasizes the importance of precise control in business process management, providing a framework for optimizing decision pathways. By using this approach, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about resource consumption and environmental impacts.

A Process-driven View on Summative Evaluation of Visual Analytics Solutions, as discussed in [384], provides a high-level overview of the process employed in each method. This paper emphasizes the importance of understanding the heterogeneous evaluation practices in the field, providing a guideline for selecting suitable evaluation methods. By using this approach, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about evaluation strategies.

Simulating Policy Impacts: Developing a Generative Scenario Writing Method to Evaluate the Perceived Effects of Regulation, as outlined in [379], uses large language models (LLMs) to evaluate the efficacy of policies. This paper emphasizes the importance of generating high-quality and diverse impacts, providing insights into the potential effectiveness of different policies. By using this method, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about policy selection.

Impact in Informetrics and Beyond, as discussed in [381], studies the concept of impact mathematically. This paper emphasizes the importance of understanding the mathematical foundations of impact, providing a framework for measuring the impact of various objects. By using this approach, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about impact assessment.

A Formal Account of Effectiveness Evaluation and Ranking Fusion, as proposed in [386], models the information provided by retrieval systems in terms of Information Theory. This paper emphasizes the importance of formalizing system effectiveness and ranking fusion, providing a framework for improving traditional metrics. By using this approach, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about system effectiveness.

Decision Making and Productivity Measurement, as discussed in [376], illustrates the concepts of technical efficiency, efficiency, effectiveness, and productivity. This paper emphasizes the importance of standardizing data when firms are not homogenous, providing a framework for measuring technical efficiency and productivity. By using this approach, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about resource allocation.

Author Impact: Evaluations, Predictions, and Challenges, as reviewed in [388], provides an in-depth literature review on author impact evaluation and prediction. This paper emphasizes the importance of understanding the strengths and limitations of different evaluation methods, providing insights into future research directions. By using this approach, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about author impact assessment.

Testing Whether Reported Treatment Effects are Unduly Dependent on the Specific Outcome Measure Used, as discussed in [390], addresses the issue of differential item functioning (DIF) in treatment effects. This paper emphasizes the importance of distinguishing between impact and DIF, providing a framework for testing the robustness of treatment effects. By using this approach, stakeholders can make more informed decisions about treatment selection.


## References

[1] Age-Friendly Route Planner: Calculating Comfortable Routes for Senior  Citizens. https://arxiv.org/abs/2311.11802

[2] Taking Stock of the Present and Future of Smart Technologies for Older  Adults and Caregivers. https://arxiv.org/abs/2104.00096

[3] Implications of ageing for the design of cognitive interaction systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/2009.06272

[4] Opportunities and Challenges of Urban Agetech: from an Automated City to  an Ageing-Friendly City. https://arxiv.org/abs/2408.02072

[5] Trans-NIH/Interagency Workshop on the Use and Development of Assistive  Technology for the Aging Population and People with Chronic Disabilities. https://arxiv.org/abs/2004.12961

[6] User requirements for inclusive technology for older adults. https://arxiv.org/abs/2105.05729

[7] The Rise of Age-Friendly Jobs. https://arxiv.org/abs/2212.03355

[8] Employing Socially Assistive Robots in Elderly Care (longer version). https://arxiv.org/abs/2304.14944

[9] A Review of Assistive Technologies for Activities of Daily Living of  Elderly. https://arxiv.org/abs/2106.12183

[10] The Roles of Familiarity Design in Active Ageing. https://arxiv.org/abs/1601.06869

[11] The Missing Ones: Key Ingredients Towards Effective Ambient Assisted  Living Systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/1401.2657

[12] Fracture num\'erique chez les seniors du 4eme age. Observation d'une  acculturation technique. https://arxiv.org/abs/0906.3101

[13] Network strategies to understand the aging process and help age-related  drug design. https://arxiv.org/abs/0908.4508

[14] Responsible and Inclusive Technology Framework: A Formative Framework to  Promote Societal Considerations in Information Technology Contexts. https://arxiv.org/abs/2302.11565

[15] The Effects of Technology and Innovation on Society. https://arxiv.org/abs/1307.3911

[16] The Potential Impact of Quantum Computers on Society. https://arxiv.org/abs/1712.05380

[17] Interdisciplinary Approaches to Understanding Artificial Intelligence's  Impact on Society. https://arxiv.org/abs/2012.06057

[18] Evaluating the Social Impact of Generative AI Systems in Systems and  Society. https://arxiv.org/abs/2306.05949

[19] Sociotechnical Specification for the Broader Impacts of Autonomous  Vehicles. https://arxiv.org/abs/2205.07395

[20] How Technology Impacts and Compares to Humans in Socially Consequential  Arenas. https://arxiv.org/abs/2211.03554

[21] Diverse End User Requirements. https://arxiv.org/abs/2210.02543

[22] Meaningful XAI Based on User-Centric Design Methodology. https://arxiv.org/abs/2308.13228

[23] Facilitating Asynchronous Participatory Design of Open Source Software:  Bringing End Users into the Loop. https://arxiv.org/abs/2102.12518

[24] Exploring User Acceptance Of Portable Intelligent Personal Assistants: A  Hybrid Approach Using PLS-SEM And fsQCA. https://arxiv.org/abs/2408.17119

[25] How Do Open Source Software Contributors Perceive and Address Usability?  Valued Factors, Practices, and Challenges. https://arxiv.org/abs/2007.06654

[26] Adopting E-commerce to User's Needs. https://arxiv.org/abs/1203.3688

[27] User Acceptance of Usable Blockchain-Based Research Data Sharing System:  An Extended TAM Based Study. https://arxiv.org/abs/2001.00079

[28] Creating inclusive mobility systems: towards age and education sensitive  interventions for enhancing autonomous vehicle acceptance. https://arxiv.org/abs/2311.16780

[29] Usability as a Dominant Quality Attribute. https://arxiv.org/abs/1508.06195

[30] A Community Authorization Service for Group Collaboration. https://arxiv.org/abs/cs/0306053

[31] Off-policy Bandits with Deficient Support. https://arxiv.org/abs/2006.09438

[32] The Community Authorization Service: Status and Future. https://arxiv.org/abs/cs/0306082

[33] An Adaptable System to Support Provenance Management for the Public  Policy-Making Process in Smart Cities. https://arxiv.org/abs/1803.06850

[34] CONSENSUS Project: Identifying publicly acceptable policy  implementations. https://arxiv.org/abs/1509.07698

[35] Snowmass '21 Community Engagement Frontier 6: Public Policy and  Government Engagement: Congressional Advocacy for Areas Beyond HEP Funding. https://arxiv.org/abs/2207.00124

[36] Snowmass '21 Community Engagement Frontier 6: Public Policy and  Government Engagement: Non-Congressional Government Engagement. https://arxiv.org/abs/2207.00125

[37] Snowmass '21 Community Engagement Frontier 6: Public Policy and  Government Engagement: Congressional Advocacy for HEP Funding (The "DC  Trip''). https://arxiv.org/abs/2207.00122

[38] Vital rates from the action of mutation accumulation. https://arxiv.org/abs/0808.3622

[39] Aging as a consequence of misrepair -- a novel theory of aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/0904.0575

[40] The Emergent Aging Model: Aging as an Emergent Property of Biological  Systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/2407.05226

[41] Traditional aging theories: which ones are useful?. https://arxiv.org/abs/1503.07040

[42] Evolution and Ageing. https://arxiv.org/abs/cond-mat/0004072

[43] Demographic Homeostasis and the Evolution of Senescence. https://arxiv.org/abs/q-bio/0602020

[44] Chemical kinetic theory of aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/2303.05585

[45] Aging as a mean to retain an adaptive mutation rate in mutagenesis with  asymmetric reproduction. https://arxiv.org/abs/1402.0275

[46] Thermodynamic Mechanism of Life and Aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/1801.08073

[47] Simple mathematical model of aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/1912.08163

[48] A network model for cellular aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/1305.5784

[49] Thermomechanics of damage and fatigue by a phase field model. https://arxiv.org/abs/1410.7042

[50] Reactive Molecular Dynamics study on the first steps of DNA-damage by  free hydroxyl radicals. https://arxiv.org/abs/1112.2731

[51] A damage model with non-convex free energy for quasi-brittle materials. https://arxiv.org/abs/1001.2087

[52] A Cellular Automaton Model of Damage. https://arxiv.org/abs/0905.3860

[53] Damage Preserving Transformation for Materials with Microstructure. https://arxiv.org/abs/2301.11574

[54] A rate-independent gradient system in damage coupled with plasticity via  structured strains. https://arxiv.org/abs/1511.07996

[55] Progressive damage and rupture in polymers. https://arxiv.org/abs/1707.07736

[56] Sub-critical model of damage evolution as a phase transition. https://arxiv.org/abs/0902.1318

[57] Live Young, Die Later: Senescence in the Penna Model of Aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/1301.1093

[58] Theoretical approach to biological aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/adap-org/9709001

[59] Aging and spin-glass dynamics. https://arxiv.org/abs/math/0304364

[60] Dynamic networks reveal key players in aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/1307.3388

[61] A Bit-String Model for Biological Aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/cond-mat/9503099

[62] A Crash Course on Aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/cond-mat/0504681

[63] Lattice Percolation Approach to Numerical Modeling of Tissue Aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/1504.03576

[64] Life Equations for the Senescence Process. https://arxiv.org/abs/1502.00759

[65] Population dynamics model for aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/2309.17106

[66] Stochastic Penna model for biological aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/cond-mat/0007473

[67] Ageing of the 2+1 dimensional Kardar-Parisi-Zhang model. https://arxiv.org/abs/1312.6029

[68] A New Approach to Understanding Ontogenesis and The Theory of Aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/1208.3018

[69] Measuring and modeling interventions in aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/1805.06681

[70] Extremal Aging For Trap Models. https://arxiv.org/abs/1312.1137

[71] Dynamical network stability analysis of multiple biological ages  provides a framework for understanding the aging process. https://arxiv.org/abs/2309.10005

[72] Aging Concept in Population Dynamics. https://arxiv.org/abs/q-bio/0312037

[73] Introduction and reconciliation of the ROS and aging paradoxes. https://arxiv.org/abs/1710.10391

[74] Modeling of aging processes in the insertion compounds. https://arxiv.org/abs/1312.0196

[75] Microscopic model for aging of biocondensates. https://arxiv.org/abs/2407.21710

[76] The Penna Model of Biological Aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/0706.3101

[77] The potential for complex computational models of aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/2008.00590

[78] Efficient Monte Carlo Simulation of Biological Aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/cond-mat/9503100

[79] Modeling the Evolution of Gene-Culture Divergence. https://arxiv.org/abs/1604.07108

[80] Using Genetic Algorithms to Simulate Evolution. https://arxiv.org/abs/2209.06822

[81] Informations in models of evolutionary dynamics. https://arxiv.org/abs/1504.07761

[82] Evolutionary model with genetics, aging and knowledge. https://arxiv.org/abs/q-bio/0312018

[83] Learngene: Inheriting Condensed Knowledge from the Ancestry Model to  Descendant Models. https://arxiv.org/abs/2305.02279

[84] Model of Interaction between Learning and Evolution. https://arxiv.org/abs/1411.5053

[85] Quantitative Genetics Meets Integral Projection Models: Unification of  Widely Used Methods from Ecology and Evolution. https://arxiv.org/abs/1509.01351

[86] On The Theory of Time dilation in Chemical Kinetics. https://arxiv.org/abs/1203.2510

[87] Distance-as-time in physical aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/2205.07658

[88] Isomorph theory of physical aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/1801.06890

[89] Multi-Strategy Coevolving Aging Particle Optimization. https://arxiv.org/abs/1810.05018

[90] Mathematical link of evolving aging and complexity. https://arxiv.org/abs/1011.2829

[91] Demographics of co-aging complex systems: from sickly worms to chess  engines. https://arxiv.org/abs/2312.11591

[92] Increased Network Interdependency Leads to Aging. https://arxiv.org/abs/1301.6375

[93] Sex and Coevolution. https://arxiv.org/abs/1903.07429

[94] The Accumulation Theory of Ageing. https://arxiv.org/abs/1110.2993

[95] Aging as a process of accumulation of Misrepairs. https://arxiv.org/abs/1503.07163

[96] Coevolutionary games - a mini review. https://arxiv.org/abs/0910.0826

[97] Stochastic frailty models for modeling and forecasting mortality. https://arxiv.org/abs/2109.02584

[98] Smart Home, security concerns of IoT. https://arxiv.org/abs/2007.02628

[99] Health Monitoring in Smart Homes Utilizing Internet of Things. https://arxiv.org/abs/1910.07058

[100] System Design of Internet-of-Things for Residential Smart Grid. https://arxiv.org/abs/1604.04009

[101] Up in the Air: When Homes Meet the Web of Things. https://arxiv.org/abs/1512.06257

[102] Matter: IoT Interoperability for Smart Homes. https://arxiv.org/abs/2405.01618

[103] A Smart Home System based on Internet of Things. https://arxiv.org/abs/2009.05328

[104] Energy Autonomous Wearable Sensors for Smart Healthcare: A Review. https://arxiv.org/abs/1912.02596

[105] Health Guardian: Using Multi-modal Data to Understand Individual Health. https://arxiv.org/abs/2310.01733

[106] Analytical Survey of Wearable Sensors. https://arxiv.org/abs/1208.2376

[107] Internet of Things and Health Care in Pandemic COVID-19: System  Requirements Evaluation. https://arxiv.org/abs/2205.03220

[108] HealthAdvisor: Recommendation System for Wearable Technologies enabling  Proactive Health Monitoring. https://arxiv.org/abs/1612.00800

[109] Software for Wearable Devices: Challenges and Opportunities. https://arxiv.org/abs/1504.00747

[110] Wearable Health Monitoring Using Capacitive Voltage-Mode Human Body  Communication. https://arxiv.org/abs/1705.06674

[111] On Reliability of Android Wearable Health Devices. https://arxiv.org/abs/1706.09247

[112] Toward a Science of Autonomy for Physical Systems: Paths. https://arxiv.org/abs/1609.05814

[113] MIndGrasp: A New Training and Testing Framework for Motor Imagery Based  3-Dimensional Assistive Robotic Control. https://arxiv.org/abs/2003.00369

[114] SCRITA 2023: Trust, Acceptance and Social Cues in Human-Robot  Interaction. https://arxiv.org/abs/2311.05401

[115] Assistive arm and hand manipulation: How does current research intersect  with actual healthcare needs?. https://arxiv.org/abs/2101.02750

[116] Edge Computing based Human-Robot Cognitive Fusion: A Medical Case Study  in the Autism Spectrum Disorder Therapy. https://arxiv.org/abs/2401.00776

[117] Explainable Human-Robot Training and Cooperation with Augmented Reality. https://arxiv.org/abs/2302.01039

[118] Sigma-3: Integration and Analysis of a 6 DOF Robotic Arm Configuration  in a Rescue Robot. https://arxiv.org/abs/2002.11944

[119] A Quantitative Analysis of Activities of Daily Living: Insights into  Improving Functional Independence with Assistive Robotics. https://arxiv.org/abs/2104.03892

[120] Social Assistive Robotics for Autistic Children. https://arxiv.org/abs/2209.12289

[121] 3-Survivor: A Rough Terrain Negotiable Teleoperated Mobile Rescue Robot  with Passive Control Mechanism. https://arxiv.org/abs/2003.05224

[122] From Bit To Bedside: A Practical Framework For Artificial Intelligence  Product Development In Healthcare. https://arxiv.org/abs/2003.10303

[123] A Brief Review of Explainable Artificial Intelligence in Healthcare. https://arxiv.org/abs/2304.01543

[124] Focus Group on Artificial Intelligence for Health. https://arxiv.org/abs/1809.04797

[125] An AI-Enabled Framework Within Reach for Enhancing Healthcare  Sustainability and Fairness. https://arxiv.org/abs/2406.07558

[126] Integrated multimodal artificial intelligence framework for healthcare  applications. https://arxiv.org/abs/2202.12998

[127] Towards a framework for evaluating the safety, acceptability and  efficacy of AI systems for health: an initial synthesis. https://arxiv.org/abs/2104.06910

[128] Reliable and Resilient AI and IoT-based Personalised Healthcare  Services: A Survey. https://arxiv.org/abs/2209.05457

[129] Promises and Challenges of Ambient Assisted Living Systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/1507.05765

[130] Perspectives and solutions towards intelligent ambient assisted living  systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/2102.13173

[131] Ambient Assisted Living technologies from the perspectives of older  people and professionals. https://arxiv.org/abs/1804.07151

[132] Internet of Things for Elderly and Fragile People. https://arxiv.org/abs/2006.05709

[133] Augmented Reality in ICT for Minimum Knowledge Loss. https://arxiv.org/abs/1305.2500

[134] 50 questions on Active Assisted Living technologies. Global edition. https://arxiv.org/abs/2410.16733

[135] Indoor Localization for Personalized Ambient Assisted Living of Multiple  Users in Multi-Floor Smart Environments. https://arxiv.org/abs/2207.09025

[136] Evaluating the Possibility of Integrating Augmented Reality and Internet  of Things Technologies to Help Patients with Alzheimer's Disease. https://arxiv.org/abs/2301.08795

[137] Inclusive Privacy Design for Older Adults Living in Ambient Assisted  Living. https://arxiv.org/abs/2207.09592

[138] Using Feature Models for Distributed Deployment in Extended Smart Home  Architecture. https://arxiv.org/abs/1507.08037

[139] SAGE: Smart home Agent with Grounded Execution. https://arxiv.org/abs/2311.00772

[140] Smart Home Goal Feature Model -- A guide to support Smart Homes for  Ageing in Place. https://arxiv.org/abs/2311.09248

[141] Multi-channel Sensor Network Construction, Data Fusion and Challenges  for Smart Home. https://arxiv.org/abs/2312.16697

[142] Sasha: Creative Goal-Oriented Reasoning in Smart Homes with Large  Language Models. https://arxiv.org/abs/2305.09802

[143] Social Co-OS: Cyber-Human Social Co-Operating System. https://arxiv.org/abs/2110.01861

[144] Reconciling complexities: for a stronger integration of approaches to  complex socio-technical systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/1805.10195

[145] A Self-Integration Testbed for Decentralized Socio-technical Systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/2002.02219

[146] An intelligent sociotechnical systems (iSTS) framework: Enabling a  hierarchical human-centered AI (hHCAI) approach. https://arxiv.org/abs/2401.03223

[147] It Takes a Socio-Technical Ecosystem. https://arxiv.org/abs/1510.04586

[148] Social Technologies for Developing Collective Intelligence in Networked  Society. https://arxiv.org/abs/1406.7549

[149] Smart Communities Internet of Things. https://arxiv.org/abs/1604.02028

[150] Research Agenda in Intelligent Infrastructure to Enhance Disaster  Management, Community Resilience and Public Safety. https://arxiv.org/abs/1705.01985

[151] Building Smart Communities with Cyber-Physical Systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/1201.0216

[152] Value-based Engineering for Ethics by Design. https://arxiv.org/abs/2004.13676

[153] Surveying the Landscape of Ethics-Focused Design Methods. https://arxiv.org/abs/2102.08909

[154] Responsible Autonomy. https://arxiv.org/abs/1706.02513

[155] Future Intelligent Autonomous Robots, Ethical by Design. Learning from  Autonomous Cars Ethics. https://arxiv.org/abs/2107.08122

[156] Towards Moral Autonomous Systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/1703.04741

[157] The Moral-IT Deck: A Tool for Ethics by Design. https://arxiv.org/abs/2007.07514

[158] The Dark Side of Ethical Robots. https://arxiv.org/abs/1606.02583

[159] An Empirical Design Justice Approach to Identifying Ethical  Considerations in the Intersection of Large Language Models and Social  Robotics. https://arxiv.org/abs/2406.06400

[160] Ethical Considerations When Constructing Participatory Design Protocols  for Social Robots. https://arxiv.org/abs/2203.10398

[161] Whats next? Forecasting scientific research trends. https://arxiv.org/abs/2305.04133

[162] New Technologies for Discovery. https://arxiv.org/abs/1908.00194

[163] Exploring the properties of the phases of QCD matter - research  opportunities and priorities for the next decade. https://arxiv.org/abs/1501.06477

[164] Status of the New Research Facilty in Andrate - TO - and prospective for  research. https://arxiv.org/abs/1103.2663

[165] Future prospects. https://arxiv.org/abs/1909.12797

[166] Formal Theory: Status and Outlook. https://arxiv.org/abs/2212.05651

[167] ROOT Status and Future Developments. https://arxiv.org/abs/cs/0306078

[168] Generative Design Ideation: A Natural Language Generation Approach. https://arxiv.org/abs/2204.09658

[169] Memory of past designs: distinctive roles in individual and collective  design. https://arxiv.org/abs/cs/0612016

[170] Guiding Data-Driven Design Ideation by Knowledge Distance. https://arxiv.org/abs/2210.10104

[171] Deep Concept Identification for Generative Design. https://arxiv.org/abs/2410.20061

[172] Conceptual Design Generation Using Large Language Models. https://arxiv.org/abs/2306.01779

[173] Clear, Concise and Effective UI: Opinion and Suggestions. https://arxiv.org/abs/1409.3993

[174] Human-System Interface Style Guide for ACORN Digital Control System. https://arxiv.org/abs/2312.12579

[175] Gesture Based Interaction NUI: An Overview. https://arxiv.org/abs/1404.2364

[176] What is the focus of XAI in UI design? Prioritizing UI design principles  for enhancing XAI user experience. https://arxiv.org/abs/2402.13939

[177] Don't Touch Me! A Comparison of Usability on Touch and Non-Touch Inputs. https://arxiv.org/abs/2107.05408

[178] Distributed Gesture Controlled Systems for Human-Machine Interface. https://arxiv.org/abs/2304.06152

[179] Adaptive App Design by Detecting Handedness. https://arxiv.org/abs/1805.08367

[180] Designing for older adults: review of touchscreen design guidelines. https://arxiv.org/abs/1703.06317

[181] An Overview of Mobile Capacitive Touch Technologies Trends. https://arxiv.org/abs/1612.08227

[182] Inventions on GUI for Touch Sensitive Screens. https://arxiv.org/abs/1404.6761

[183] On the dual nature of adoption processes in complex networks. https://arxiv.org/abs/2104.09349

[184] Interdependence in active mobility adoption: Joint modelling and  motivational spill-over in walking, cycling and bike-sharing. https://arxiv.org/abs/2006.16920

[185] A Methodology for Analyzing Uptake of Software Technologies Among  Developers. https://arxiv.org/abs/1908.11431

[186] Predicting Adoption Probabilities in Social Networks. https://arxiv.org/abs/1309.6369

[187] Integrating behavioral experimental findings into dynamical models to  inform social change interventions. https://arxiv.org/abs/2405.13224

[188] Adoption as a Social Marker: Innovation Diffusion with Outgroup Aversion. https://arxiv.org/abs/1507.04775

[189] Offering Supplementary Network Technologies: Adoption Behavior and  Offloading Benefits. https://arxiv.org/abs/1209.5004

[190] Search and Matching for Adoption from Foster Care. https://arxiv.org/abs/2103.10145

[191] Adoption Factors of Enabling I4.0 Technologies and Benefits in the  Supply Chain. https://arxiv.org/abs/2108.01207

[192] Multilayer modeling of adoption dynamics in energy demand management. https://arxiv.org/abs/1907.13096

[193] Competition of simple and complex adoption on interdependent networks. https://arxiv.org/abs/1605.03479

[194] Product traits, decision-makers, and household low-carbon technology  adoptions: moving beyond single empirical studies. https://arxiv.org/abs/2112.11867

[195] Familiarity Facilitates Adoption: Evidence from Electric Vehicles. https://arxiv.org/abs/2211.14634

[196] Web 3.0 Adoption Behavior: PLS-SEM and Sentiment Analysis. https://arxiv.org/abs/2209.04900

[197] An Approach to Secure Mobile Enterprise Architectures. https://arxiv.org/abs/1304.0076

[198] Investigating Information Security Risks of Mobile Device Use within  Organizations. https://arxiv.org/abs/1309.0521

[199] Cyber-Security Internals of a Skoda Octavia vRS: A Hands on Approach. https://arxiv.org/abs/1910.09410

[200] Safety Challenges and Solutions in Mobile Social Networks. https://arxiv.org/abs/1310.5949

[201] Challenges of Security and Trust of Mobile Devices as Digital Avionics  Component. https://arxiv.org/abs/1605.00446

[202] Application Security framework for Mobile App Development in Enterprise  setup. https://arxiv.org/abs/1503.05992

[203] The Future of Mobile Security. https://arxiv.org/abs/1302.4201

[204] Personal Safety Triggering System on Android Mobile Platform. https://arxiv.org/abs/1208.3138

[205] Enhancing mobile learning security. https://arxiv.org/abs/1610.06046

[206] A Tiered Security System for Mobile Devices. https://arxiv.org/abs/0809.1659

[207] Mobile Technology in Healthcare Environment: Security Vulnerabilities  and Countermeasures. https://arxiv.org/abs/1807.11086

[208] Data Security on Mobile Devices: Current State of the Art, Open  Problems, and Proposed Solutions. https://arxiv.org/abs/2105.12613

[209] A Cognitive Stimulation Dialogue System with Multi-source Knowledge  Fusion for Elders with Cognitive Impairment. https://arxiv.org/abs/2305.08200

[210] Discourse Behavior of Older Adults Interacting With a Dialogue Agent  Competent in Multiple Topics. https://arxiv.org/abs/1907.06279

[211] Conversations On Multimodal Input Design With Older Adults. https://arxiv.org/abs/2008.11834

[212] Using Immersive Virtual Reality to Enhance Social Interaction among  Older Adults: A Multi-site Study. https://arxiv.org/abs/2210.04954

[213] Trade-offs in the Design of Multimodal Interaction for Older Adults. https://arxiv.org/abs/2103.05309

[214] Designing Virtual Environments for Social Engagement in Older Adults. https://arxiv.org/abs/2210.03202

[215] Categorizing Sources of Information for Explanations in Conversational  AI Systems for Older Adults Aging in Place. https://arxiv.org/abs/2406.05111

[216] Personalized Persuasion for Social Interactions in Nursing Homes. https://arxiv.org/abs/1603.03349

[217] Improving the interaction of Older Adults with Socially Assistive Robots  for Table setting. https://arxiv.org/abs/2103.13196

[218] Understanding the Use of Voice Assistants by Older Adults. https://arxiv.org/abs/2111.01210

[219] Evaluating Multimodal Interaction of Robots Assisting Older Adults. https://arxiv.org/abs/2212.10425

[220] Towards LifeSpan Cognitive Systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/2409.13265

[221] Refining Automatic Speech Recognition System for older adults. https://arxiv.org/abs/2011.08346

[222] Towards an Intelligent Assistive System Based on Augmented Reality and  Serious Games. https://arxiv.org/abs/2301.02461

[223] Older Adults and Voice Interaction: A Pilot Study with Google Home. https://arxiv.org/abs/1903.07195

[224] TalkTive: A Conversational Agent Using Backchannels to Engage Older  Adults in Neurocognitive Disorders Screening. https://arxiv.org/abs/2202.08216

[225] Online Group-exercises for Older Adults of Different Physical Abilities. https://arxiv.org/abs/1609.05329

[226] Evaluating Older Users' Experiences with Commercial Dialogue Systems:  Implications for Future Design and Development. https://arxiv.org/abs/1902.04393

[227] Healing Spaces: Feasibility of a Multisensory Experience for Older  Adults with Advanced Dementia and their Caregivers. https://arxiv.org/abs/2007.02083

[228] Older Adults and Brain-Computer Interface: An Exploratory Study. https://arxiv.org/abs/2104.02046

[229] Assessing cognitive function among older adults using machine learning  and wearable device data: a feasibility study. https://arxiv.org/abs/2309.07133

[230] Understanding Older Adults' Perceptions and Challenges in Using  AI-enabled Everyday Technologies. https://arxiv.org/abs/2210.01369

[231] Research on Older Adults' Interaction with E-Health Interface Based on  Explainable Artificial Intelligence. https://arxiv.org/abs/2402.07915

[232] Framework for A Personalized Intelligent Assistant to Elderly People for  Activities of Daily Living. https://arxiv.org/abs/2107.07344

[233] InteraktA Multimodal Multisensory Interactive Cognitive Assessment  Tool. https://arxiv.org/abs/1709.01796

[234] Human-Machine Co-Creativity with Older Adults -- A Learning Community to  Study Explainable Dialogues. https://arxiv.org/abs/2309.07028

[235] Smart Homes: Security Challenges and Privacy Concerns. https://arxiv.org/abs/2010.15394

[236] Wearable Health Monitoring System for Older Adults in a Smart Home  Environment. https://arxiv.org/abs/2107.09509

[237] Motivating Physical Activity via Competitive Human-Robot Interaction. https://arxiv.org/abs/2202.07068

[238] Building Persuasive Robots with Social Power Strategies. https://arxiv.org/abs/2307.06007

[239] Designing Social Robots that Engage Older Adults in Exercise: A Case  Study. https://arxiv.org/abs/2403.04153

[240] Reinforcement Learning Approaches in Social Robotics. https://arxiv.org/abs/2009.09689

[241] Design, Development, and Evaluation of an Interactive Personalized  Social Robot to Monitor and Coach Post-Stroke Rehabilitation Exercises. https://arxiv.org/abs/2305.07632

[242] An extended framework for characterizing social robots. https://arxiv.org/abs/1907.09873

[243] Exercise with Social Robots: Companion or Coach?. https://arxiv.org/abs/2103.12940

[244] A Humanoid Social Agent Embodying Physical Assistance Enhances Motor  Training Experience. https://arxiv.org/abs/2007.05980

[245] RLVF: Learning from Verbal Feedback without Overgeneralization. https://arxiv.org/abs/2402.10893

[246] Optimizing Adaptive Video Streaming with Human Feedback. https://arxiv.org/abs/2308.04132

[247] On the Automated Processing of User Feedback. https://arxiv.org/abs/2407.15519

[248] User Feedback in Continuous Software Engineering: Revealing the  State-of-Practice. https://arxiv.org/abs/2410.07459

[249] Continually Improving Extractive QA via Human Feedback. https://arxiv.org/abs/2305.12473

[250] SUS-Lib: An automated tool for usability evaluation based on the  Software Usability Scale from user feedback. https://arxiv.org/abs/2410.09534

[251] ToolSandbox: A Stateful, Conversational, Interactive Evaluation  Benchmark for LLM Tool Use Capabilities. https://arxiv.org/abs/2408.04682

[252] On the evaluation of research software: the CDUR procedure. https://arxiv.org/abs/2108.06136

[253] Is 40 the new 60? How popular media portrays the employability of older  software developers. https://arxiv.org/abs/2004.05847

[254] A Call to Reflect on Evaluation Practices for Age Estimation:  Comparative Analysis of the State-of-the-Art and a Unified Benchmark. https://arxiv.org/abs/2307.04570

[255] Maintainability and evolvability of control software in machine and  plant manufacturing -- An industrial survey. https://arxiv.org/abs/2212.04328

[256] Challenges in Selecting Software to be Reused. https://arxiv.org/abs/1402.5121

[257] Take Care: A Study on Usability Evaluation Methods for Children. https://arxiv.org/abs/1212.0647

[258] Binary-level Software Compatibility Tool Agreement. https://arxiv.org/abs/2212.03364

[259] Age Based User Interface in Mobile Operating System. https://arxiv.org/abs/1205.1687

[260] Validation Requirements for AI-based Intervention-Evaluation in Aging  and Longevity Research and Practice. https://arxiv.org/abs/2408.15264

[261] Building a Pilot Software Quality-in-Use Benchmark Dataset. https://arxiv.org/abs/1509.05736

[262] Negative Improvements, Relative Validity and Elusive Goodness. https://arxiv.org/abs/1311.5150

[263] A Methodology for Deriving Evaluation Criteria for Software Solutions. https://arxiv.org/abs/2012.01023

[264] Ethical software requirements from user reviews: A systematic literature  review. https://arxiv.org/abs/2410.01833

[265] Software Dependability Measurement at the Age Of 36. https://arxiv.org/abs/2311.10039

[266] Assessing the Influencing Factors on the Accuracy of Underage Facial Age  Estimation. https://arxiv.org/abs/2012.01179

[267] A Review of Software Quality Models for the Evaluation of Software  Products. https://arxiv.org/abs/1412.2977

[268] User Centric Evaluation of Code Generation Tools. https://arxiv.org/abs/2402.03130

[269] A Decision Support Tool for Assessing the Maturity of Software Product  Line Process. https://arxiv.org/abs/1507.06941

[270] Evaluation of Software Product Quality Metrics. https://arxiv.org/abs/2009.01557

[271] Prometheus 2: An Open Source Language Model Specialized in Evaluating  Other Language Models. https://arxiv.org/abs/2405.01535

[272] Age Appropriate Design: Assessment of TikTok, Twitch, and YouTube Kids. https://arxiv.org/abs/2208.02638

[273] A State-of-the-practice Release-readiness Checklist for Generative  AI-based Software Products. https://arxiv.org/abs/2403.18958

[274] JAM: A Comprehensive Model for Age Estimation, Verification, and  Comparability. https://arxiv.org/abs/2410.04012

[275] Multimodal Chain-of-Thought Reasoning via ChatGPT to Protect Children  from Age-Inappropriate Apps. https://arxiv.org/abs/2407.06309

[276] Development of a Evaluation Tool for Age-Appropriate Software in Aging  Environments: A Delphi Study. https://arxiv.org/abs/2402.03933

[277] Whose Side are Ethics Codes On? Power, Responsibility and the Social  Good. https://arxiv.org/abs/2002.01559

[278] Specifying Agent Ethics (Blue Sky Ideas). https://arxiv.org/abs/2403.16100

[279] Ethical, Legal and Social aspects of Information and Communication  Technology. https://arxiv.org/abs/1507.08447

[280] Automated Reasoning for Robot Ethics. https://arxiv.org/abs/1502.05838

[281] Introduction to ethics in the age of digital communication. https://arxiv.org/abs/2308.14421

[282] Hacia una implementaci\'on \'etica e inclusiva de la Inteligencia  Artificial en las organizaciones: un marco multidimensional. https://arxiv.org/abs/2405.00225

[283] Technology Ethics in Action: Critical and Interdisciplinary Perspectives. https://arxiv.org/abs/2202.01351

[284] On Representing Humans' Soft-Ethics Preferences As Dispositions. https://arxiv.org/abs/2408.06355

[285] Machine Ethics and Automated Vehicles. https://arxiv.org/abs/2010.15665

[286] Landscape of Machine Implemented Ethics. https://arxiv.org/abs/2009.00335

[287] Resolving Ethics Trade-offs in Implementing Responsible AI. https://arxiv.org/abs/2401.08103

[288] Social Deliberation vs. Social Contracts in Self-Governing Voluntary  Organisations. https://arxiv.org/abs/2403.16329

[289] Toward Ethical Robotic Behavior in Human-Robot Interaction Scenarios. https://arxiv.org/abs/2206.10727

[290] Artificial Intelligence: the global landscape of ethics guidelines. https://arxiv.org/abs/1906.11668

[291] Robotics Rights and Ethics Rules. https://arxiv.org/abs/1809.08885

[292] Quelle {\'e}thique pour quelle IA ?. https://arxiv.org/abs/2407.17585

[293] Ethical and Social Aspects of Self-Driving Cars. https://arxiv.org/abs/1802.04103

[294] Ethical Challenges in the Human-Robot Interaction Field. https://arxiv.org/abs/2104.09306

[295] Prismal view of ethics. https://arxiv.org/abs/2205.13370

[296] A Holistic Approach to Quantum Ethics Education. https://arxiv.org/abs/2306.00027

[297] Thinging Ethics for Software Engineers. https://arxiv.org/abs/1810.02685

[298] Actually, It's About Ethics in Computational Social Science: A  Multi-party Risk-Benefit Framework for Online Community Research. https://arxiv.org/abs/1511.06578

[299] Toward a Rational and Ethical Sociotechnical System of Autonomous  Vehicles: A Novel Application of Multi-Criteria Decision Analysis. https://arxiv.org/abs/2102.02928

[300] Regulatory Options and Technical Challenges for the 5.9 GHz Spectrum:  Survey and Analysis. https://arxiv.org/abs/1810.04846

[301] Cybersecurity in Industry 5.0: Open Challenges and Future Directions. https://arxiv.org/abs/2410.09538

[302] Open-VERSO: a vision of 5G experimentation infrastructures, hurdles and  challenges. https://arxiv.org/abs/2308.14532

[303] REAL ML: Recognizing, Exploring, and Articulating Limitations of Machine  Learning Research. https://arxiv.org/abs/2205.08363

[304] 5G Cellular: Key Enabling Technologies and Research Challenges. https://arxiv.org/abs/1503.00674

[305] The limits of progress in the digital era. https://arxiv.org/abs/2409.05082

[306] Challenges in Integrating Technology into Education. https://arxiv.org/abs/1904.06518

[307] Socio-Technological Challenges and Opportunities: Paths Forward. https://arxiv.org/abs/2108.06738

[308] Limits and epistemological barriers to the human knowledge of the  natural world. https://arxiv.org/abs/2312.16229

[309] 5G: Agent for Further Digital Disruptive Transformations. https://arxiv.org/abs/1909.10152

[310] Five Disruptive Technology Directions for 5G. https://arxiv.org/abs/1312.0229

[311] Ultimate physical limits to computation. https://arxiv.org/abs/quant-ph/9908043

[312] Guidelines for 5G End to End Architecture and Security Issues. https://arxiv.org/abs/1912.10318

[313] 5G Applications: Requirements, Challenges, and Outlook. https://arxiv.org/abs/1810.06057

[314] Education 5.0: Requirements, Enabling Technologies, and Future  Directions. https://arxiv.org/abs/2307.15846

[315] Amplifying Limitations, Harms and Risks of Large Language Models. https://arxiv.org/abs/2307.04821

[316] User-Centered Design (IX): A "User Experience 3.0" Paradigm Framework in  the Intelligence Era. https://arxiv.org/abs/2302.06681

[317] Ambient Multimodality: an Asset for Developing Universal Access to the  Information Society. https://arxiv.org/abs/0708.3580

[318] How are Diverse End-user Human-centric Issues Discussed on GitHub?. https://arxiv.org/abs/2201.05927

[319] Accessibility Across Borders. https://arxiv.org/abs/2105.01488

[320] Driving Towards Inclusion: Revisiting In-Vehicle Interaction in  Autonomous Vehicles. https://arxiv.org/abs/2401.14571

[321] Accessibility in Software Practice: A Practitioner's Perspective. https://arxiv.org/abs/2103.08778

[322] A "User Experience 3.0 (UX 3.0)" Paradigm Framework: User Experience  Design for Human-Centered AI Systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/2403.01609

[323] Borrowing Constraints in Emerging Markets. https://arxiv.org/abs/2211.10864

[324] Applications of a constrained mechanics methodology in economics. https://arxiv.org/abs/1106.3455

[325] Conservation laws, financial entropy and the Eurozone crisis. https://arxiv.org/abs/1301.5974

[326] Modeling the out-of-equilibrium dynamics of bounded rationality and  economic constraints. https://arxiv.org/abs/2106.00483

[327] How Covid-19 Pandemic Changes the Theory of Economics?. https://arxiv.org/abs/2012.04571

[328] Applications of physics to economics and finance: Money, income, wealth,  and the stock market. https://arxiv.org/abs/cond-mat/0307341

[329] Identifying Preferences when Households are Financially Constrained. https://arxiv.org/abs/2005.02010

[330] A Practical Multilevel Governance Framework for Autonomous and  Intelligent Systems. https://arxiv.org/abs/2404.13719

[331] An ASP Framework for the Refinement of Authorization and Obligation  Policies. https://arxiv.org/abs/2305.13190

[332] When is a DAO Decentralized?. https://arxiv.org/abs/2304.08160

[333] A new framework for global data regulation. https://arxiv.org/abs/2308.12955

[334] Requirements Engineering for Global Systems: Cultural, Regulatory and  Technical Aspects. https://arxiv.org/abs/1910.05008

[335] A Security and Trust Framework for Decentralized 5G Marketplaces. https://arxiv.org/abs/2210.11517

[336] Towards indicating interdisciplinarity: Characterizing interdisciplinary  knowledge flow. https://arxiv.org/abs/2207.10722

[337] Collaborative knowledge networks emergence for innovation: Factors of  success analysis and comparison. https://arxiv.org/abs/1201.4642

[338] Knowledge Ecologies in International Affairs: A New Paradigm for Dialog  and Collaboration. https://arxiv.org/abs/1201.1928

[339] Mixing Patterns in Interdisciplinary Collaboration Networks: Assessing  Interdisciplinarity Through Multiple Lenses. https://arxiv.org/abs/2002.00531

[340] Identifying interdisciplinarity through the disciplinary classification  of co-authors of scientific publications. https://arxiv.org/abs/1812.09184

[341] An agent-based model of interdisciplinary interactions in science. https://arxiv.org/abs/2006.16399

[342] NanoInfoBio: A case-study in interdisciplinary research. https://arxiv.org/abs/1211.5508

[343] Do interdisciplinary research teams deliver higher gains to science?. https://arxiv.org/abs/1810.12637

[344] Removing Barriers to Interdisciplinary Research. https://arxiv.org/abs/1012.4170

[345] Interdisciplinary Research Collaborations: Evaluation of a Funding  Program. https://arxiv.org/abs/1307.6784

[346] QCD at Finite Density and Color Superconductivity. https://arxiv.org/abs/hep-ph/9908290

[347] AI for 5G: Research Directions and Paradigms. https://arxiv.org/abs/1807.08671

[348] Results of the 2022 ECFA Early-Career Researchers Panel survey on career  prospects and diversity. https://arxiv.org/abs/2404.02074

[349] Mining and Analyzing the Future Works in Scientific Articles. https://arxiv.org/abs/1507.02140

[350] The Future of CISE Distributed Research Infrastructure. https://arxiv.org/abs/1803.09886

[351] Responsible AI Implementation: A Human-centered Framework for  Accelerating the Innovation Process. https://arxiv.org/abs/2209.07076

[352] The Impact of Responsible AI Research on Innovation and Development. https://arxiv.org/abs/2407.15647

[353] On the role of ethics and sustainability in business innovation. https://arxiv.org/abs/2404.07678

[354] Stakeholders interdependencies and their role in sustainable business  model innovation. https://arxiv.org/abs/2103.16281

[355] Sustainable AI Regulation. https://arxiv.org/abs/2306.00292

[356] Understanding Innovation to Drive Sustainable Development. https://arxiv.org/abs/1606.06177

[357] AI Sustainability in Practice Part One: Foundations for Sustainable AI  Projects. https://arxiv.org/abs/2403.14635

[358] Participant: A New Concept for Optimally Assisting the Elder People. https://arxiv.org/abs/1401.2782

[359] A Community Membership Life Cycle Model. https://arxiv.org/abs/1006.4271

[360] When Human-Computer Interaction Meets Community Citizen Science. https://arxiv.org/abs/1907.11260

[361] Patterns of Patient and Caregiver Mutual Support Connections in an  Online Health Community. https://arxiv.org/abs/2007.16172

[362] "I Cannot Do All of This Alone": Exploring Instrumental and Prayer  Support in Online Health Communities. https://arxiv.org/abs/2005.11884

[363] A Framework of Value Exchange and Role Playing in Web 2.0 WebSites. https://arxiv.org/abs/1208.0891

[364] Examining Caregiving Roles to Differentiate the Effects of Using a  Mobile App for Community Oversight for Privacy and Security. https://arxiv.org/abs/2409.02364

[365] End-to-end evaluation of research organizations. https://arxiv.org/abs/1605.02132

[366] The Multidimensional Assessment of Scholarly Research Impact. https://arxiv.org/abs/1406.5520

[367] Efficiency of research performance and the glass researcher. https://arxiv.org/abs/1605.09515

[368] Evaluating the Capabilities of LLMs for Supporting Anticipatory Impact  Assessment. https://arxiv.org/abs/2401.18028

[369] Impacts Towards a comprehensive assessment of the book impact by  integrating multiple evaluation sources. https://arxiv.org/abs/2107.10434

[370] Model-based evaluation of scientific impact indicators. https://arxiv.org/abs/1606.04319

[371] Evaluatology: The Science and Engineering of Evaluation. https://arxiv.org/abs/2404.00021

[372] Measuring impact in research evaluations: A thorough discussion of  methods for, effects of, and problems with impact measurements. https://arxiv.org/abs/1410.1895

[373] Reactive Synthesis for Expected Impacts. https://arxiv.org/abs/2410.22760

[374] An introduction to flexible methods for policy evaluation. https://arxiv.org/abs/1910.00641

[375] Assessment Model for Opportunistic Routing. https://arxiv.org/abs/1406.0375

[376] Decision Making and Productivity Measurement. https://arxiv.org/abs/1604.08237

[377] Usage Impact Factor: the effects of sample characteristics on  usage-based impact metrics. https://arxiv.org/abs/cs/0610154

[378] Promoting target models by potential measures. https://arxiv.org/abs/1007.1140

[379] Simulating Policy Impacts: Developing a Generative Scenario Writing  Method to Evaluate the Perceived Effects of Regulation. https://arxiv.org/abs/2405.09679

[380] A consistent multi-user framework for assessing system performance. https://arxiv.org/abs/1011.2048

[381] Impact in informetrics and beyond. https://arxiv.org/abs/2212.07859

[382] Ten simple rules for measuring the impact of workshops. https://arxiv.org/abs/1805.03522

[383] Evaluating Heuristics for Iterative Impact Analysis. https://arxiv.org/abs/1907.08730

[384] A Process-driven View on Summative Evaluation of Visual Analytics  Solutions. https://arxiv.org/abs/1811.00101

[385] Quantitative Characterization of Components of Computer Assisted  Interventions. https://arxiv.org/abs/1702.00582

[386] A Formal Account of Effectiveness Evaluation and Ranking Fusion. https://arxiv.org/abs/1807.04317

[387] Quantifying Success in Science: An Overview. https://arxiv.org/abs/2008.04649

[388] Author Impact: Evaluations, Predictions, and Challenges. https://arxiv.org/abs/2008.04648

[389] Organizational Effectiveness: A New Strategy to Leverage Multisite  Randomized Trials for Valid Assessment. https://arxiv.org/abs/2407.18360

[390] Testing Whether Reported Treatment Effects are Unduly Dependent on the  Specific Outcome Measure Used. https://arxiv.org/abs/2409.03502

[391] Program Controls Effectiveness Measurement Framework & Metrics. https://arxiv.org/abs/2010.04306

[392] Evaluation for Change. https://arxiv.org/abs/2212.11670

[393] Design and Implementation of Performance Metrics for Evaluation of  Assessments Data. https://arxiv.org/abs/1509.04311


